First published by Zero Books, 2014

Zero Books is an imprint of John Hunt Publishing Ltd., Laurel House,
Station Approach,

Alresford, Hants, SO24 9JH, UK

office1@jhpbooks.net

www.johnhuntpublishing.com

www.zero-books.net

For distributor details and how to order please visit the ‘Ordering’
section on our website.

Text copyright: Mark Fisher 2013

ISBN: 978 1 78099 226 6

All rights reserved. Except for brief quotations in critical articles or
reviews, no part of this book may be reproduced in any manner without
prior written permission from the publishers.

The rights of Mark Fisher as author have been asserted in accordance
with the Copyright,

Designs and Patents Act 1988.

A CIP catalogue record for this book is available from the British
Library.

Design: Stuart Davies

Cover photograph by Chris Heppell

Illustrations by Laura Oldfield Ford

Printed and bound by CPI Group (UK) Ltd, Croydon, CR0 4YY

We operate a distinctive and ethical publishing philosophy in all areas
of our business, from our global network of authors to production and
worldwide distribution.



CONTENTS


00: LOST FUTURES

‘The Slow Cancellation of the Future’

Ghosts Of My Life

01: THE RETURN OF THE 70S

No Longer the Pleasures: Joy Division

Smiley’s Game: _Tinker, Tailor, Soldier, Spy_

The Past is an Alien Planet: The First and Last Episodes of _Life on
Mars_

‘Can the World be as Sad as it Seems?’: David Peace and his Adapters

Now Then, Now Then: Jimmy Savile and ‘the 70s on Trial’

02: HAUNTOLOGY

London After the Rave: Burial

Downcast Angel: Interview with Burial

Sleevenotes for The Caretaker’s _Theoretically Pure Anterograde Amnesia_

Memory Disorder: Interview with The Caretaker

Home is where the Haunt Is: _The Shining’s_ Hauntology

Hauntological Blues: Little Axe

Nostalgia for Modernism: The Focus Group and Belbury Poly

The Ache of Nostalgia: The Advisory Circle

Someone Else’s Memories: Asher, Philip Jeck, Black To Comm, G.E.S.,
Position Normal, Mordant Music

‘Old Sunlight From Other Times and Other Lives’: John Foxx’s _Tiny
Colour Movies_

Electricity and Ghosts: Interview with John Foxx

Another Grey World: Darkstar, James Blake, Kanye West, Drake and ‘Party
Hauntology’

03: THE STAIN OF PLACE

‘Always Yearning For The Time That Just Eluded Us’ – Introduction to
Laura Oldfield Ford’s _Savage Messiah_

Nomadalgia: The Junior Boys’ _So This is Goodbye_

Grey Area: Chris Petit’s _Content_

Postmodern Antiques: _Patience (After Sebald)_

The Lost Unconscious: Christopher Nolan’s _Inception_

_Handsworth Songs_ and the English Riots

‘Tremors of an Imperceptible Future’: Patrick Keiller’s _Robinson in
Ruins_

For my wife, Zöe and my son, George

 

Mark Fisher is the author of _Capitalist Realism: Is There No
Alternative?_ (Zer0, 2009). His writing has appeared in many
publications, including Sight & Sound, The Wire, The Guardian, Film
Quarterly and frieze. He is Programme Leader of the MA in Aural and
Visual Cultures at Goldsmiths, University of London, and a lecturer at
the University of East London. He lives in Suffolk.



ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS


Many of the ideas in _Ghosts Of My Life_ were first auditioned on my
blog, k-punk. I’m grateful to the k-punk readers who responded to the
ideas there and helped them to propagate. I’m also grateful to the
publishers who kindly allowed me to reprint material in _Ghosts_, in
particular Rob Winter at _Sight & Sound_ and Tony Herrington at _The
Wire_. Some of the pieces that originally appeared elsewhere have been
altered for inclusion here. Needless to say, all responsibility for the
edits in _Ghosts_ lies with me.

If I were to list everyone who inspired or supported the writing of
_Ghosts Of My Life_, the book would never get started, so I will
concentrate only on those who worked closely on the manuscript. Thanks,
therefore, to Tariq Goddard for his patience, Liam Sprod and Alex Niven
for their attentive copy-editing and proofreading, Laura Oldfield Ford
for allowing me to use her drawings to illustrate the text, Chris
Heppell for the cover photograph, and Rob White for his customarily
insightful and incisive comments.

Lately I’ve been feeling like Guy Pearce in
_Memento_
-Drake



00: LOST FUTURES


[]



‘THE SLOW CANCELLATION OF THE FUTURE’


_‘There’s no time here, not any more’_

The final image of the British television series _Sapphire and Steel_
seemed designed to haunt the adolescent mind. The two lead characters,
played by Joanna Lumley and David McCallum, find themselves in what
seems to be a 1940s roadside café. The radio is playing a simulation of
Glenn Miller-style smooth Big Band jazz. Another couple, a man and a
woman dressed in 1940s clothes, are sitting at an adjacent table. The
woman rises, saying: ‘This is the trap. This is nowhere, and it’s
forever.’ She and her companion then disappear, leaving spectral
outlines, then nothingness. Sapphire and Steel panic. They rifle through
the few objects in the café, looking for something they can use to
escape. There is nothing, and when they pull back the curtains, there is
only a black starry void beyond the window. The café, it seems, is some
kind of capsule floating in deep space.

Watching this extraordinary final sequence now, the juxtaposition of the
café with the cosmos is likely to put in mind some combination of Edward
Hopper and René Magritte. Neither of those references were available to
me at the time; in fact, when I later encountered Hopper and Magritte, I
no doubt thought of Sapphire and Steel. It was August 1982 and I had
just turned 15 years old. It would be more than 20 years later before I
would see these images again. By then, thanks to VHS, DVD and YouTube,
it seemed that practically everything was available for re-watching. In
conditions of digital recall, loss is itself lost.

The passage of 30 years has only made the series appear even stranger
than it did at the time. This was science fiction with none of the
traditional trappings of the genre, no spaceships, no ray guns, no
anthropomorphic foes: only the unraveling fabric of the corridor of
time, along which malevolent entities would crawl, exploiting and
expanding gaps and fissures in temporal continuity. All we knew about
Sapphire and Steel was that they were ‘detectives’ of a peculiar kind,
probably not human, sent from a mysterious ‘agency’ to repair these
breaks in time. ‘The basis of _Sapphire and Steel,’_ the series’s
creator P. J. Hammond explained, ‘came from my desire to write a
detective story, into which I wanted to incorporate Time. I’ve always
been interested in Time, particularly the ideas of J. B. Priestley and
H. G. Wells, but I wanted to take a different approach to the subject.
So instead of having them go backwards and forwards in Time, it was
about Time breaking in, and having set the precedent I realised the
potential that it offered with two people whose job it was to stop the
break-ins.’ (Steve O’Brien, ‘The Story Behind Sapphire & Steel’, The Fan
Can, http://www.thefancan.com/fancandy/features/tvfeatures/steel.html)

Hammond had previously worked as a writer on police dramas such as _The
Gentle Touch_ and _Hunter’s Walk_ and on children’s fantasy shows like
_Ace of Wands_ and _Dramarama_. With _Sapphire and Steel_, he attained a
kind of auteurship that he would never manage to repeat. The conditions
for this kind of visionary public broadcasting would disappear during
the 1980s, as the British media became taken over by what another
television auteur, Dennis Potter, would call the ‘occupying powers’ of
neoliberalism. The result of that occupation is that it is now hard to
believe that such a programme could ever have been transmitted on
prime-time television, still less on what was then Britain’s sole
commercial network, ITV. There were only three television channels in
Britain then: BBC1, BBC2 and ITV; Channel 4 would make its first
broadcast only a few months later.

By comparison with the expectations created by _Star Wars_, _Sapphire
and Steel_ came off as very cheap and cheerful. Even in 1982, the
chroma-key special effects looked unconvincing. The fact that the stage
sets were minimal, and the cast small (most of the ‘assignments’ only
featured Lumley and McCallum and a couple of others), gave the
impression of a theatre production. Yet there was none of the
_homeliness_ of kitchen sink naturalism; _Sapphire and Steel_ had more
in common with the enigmatic oppressiveness of Harold Pinter, whose
plays were frequently broadcast on BBC television during the 1970s.

A number of things about the series are particularly striking from the
perspective of the 21st century. The first is its absolute refusal to
‘meet the audience halfway’ in the way that we’ve come to expect. This
is partly a conceptual matter: _Sapphire and Steel_ was cryptic, its
stories and its world never fully disclosed, still less explained. The
series was much closer to something like the BBC’s adaptation of John Le
Carré’s Smiley novels – _Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy_ had been broadcast
in 1979; its sequel _Smiley’s People_ would begin transmission a month
after _Sapphire and Steel_ ended – than it was to _Star Wars_. It was
also a question of emotional tenor: the series and its two lead
characters are lacking in the warmth and wisecracking humour that is now
so much a taken-for-granted feature of entertainment media. McCallum’s
Steel had a technician’s indifference towards the lives in which he
became reluctantly enmeshed; although he never loses his sense of duty,
he is testy and impatient, frequently exasperated by the way humans
‘clutter their lives’. If Lumley’s Sapphire appeared more sympathetic,
there was always the suspicion that her apparent affection towards
humans was something like an owner’s benign fascination for her pets.
The emotional austerity that had characterised the series from the start
assumes a more explicitly pessimistic quality in this final assignment.
The Le Carré parallels are reinforced by the strong suspicion that, just
as in _Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy_, the lead characters have been
betrayed by their own _side_.

Then there was Cyril Ornadel’s incidental music. As Nick Edwards
explained in a 2009 blog post, this was ‘[a]rranged for a small ensemble
of musicians (predominantly woodwind) with liberal use of electronic
treatments (ring modulation, echo/delay) to intensify the drama and
_suggestion_ of horror, Ornadel’s cues are far more powerfully chilling
and evocative than anything you’re likely hear in the mainstream media
today.’ (‘Sapphire and Steel’,
gutterbreakz.blogspot.co.uk/2009/05/sapphire-steel.html)

One aim of _Sapphire and Steel_ was to transpose ghost stories out of
the Victorian context and into contemporary places, the still inhabited
or the recently abandoned. In the final assignment, Sapphire and Steel
arrive at a small service station. Corporate logos – Access, 7 Up,
Castrol GTX, LV – are pasted on the windows and the walls of the garage
and the adjoining café. This ‘halfway place’ is a prototype version of
what the anthropologist Marc Augé will call in a 1995 book of the same
title, ‘non-places’ – the generic zones of transit (retail parks,
airports) which will come to increasingly dominate the spaces of late
capitalism. In truth, the modest service station in Sapphire and Steel
is quaintly idiosyncratic compared to the cloned generic monoliths which
will proliferate besides motorways over the coming 30 years.

The problem that Sapphire and Steel have come to solve is, as ever, to
do with time. At the service station, there is temporal bleed-through
from earlier periods: images and figures from 1925 and 1948 keep
appearing, so that, as Sapphire and Steel’s colleague Silver puts it
‘time just got mixed, jumbled up, together, making no sort of sense’.
Anachronism, the slippage of discrete time periods into one another, was
throughout the series the major symptom of time breaking down. In one of
the earlier assignments, Steel complains that these temporal anomalies
are triggered by human beings’ predilection for the mixing of artefacts
from different eras. In this final assignment, the anachronism has led
to stasis: time has stopped. The service station is in ‘a pocket, a
vacuum’. There’s ‘still traffic, but it’s not going anywhere’: the sound
of cars is locked into a looped drone. Silver says, ‘there is no time
here, not any more’. It’s as if the whole scenario is a literalisation
of the lines in Pinter’s _No Man’s Land:_ ‘No man’s land, which never
moves, which never changes, which never grows older, which remains
forever icy and silent.’ Hammond said that he had not necessarily
intended the series to end there. He had thought that it would be
rested, to return at some point in the future. There would be no return
– at least, not on network television. In 2004, Sapphire and Steel would
come back for a series of audio adventures; though Hammond, McCallum and
Lumley were not involved, and by then the audience was not the
television-viewing public, but the kind of special interest niche easily
catered for in digital culture. Eternally suspended, never to be freed,
their plight – and indeed their provenance – never to be fully
explained, Sapphire and Steel’s internment in this café from nowhere is
prophetic for a general condition: in which life continues, but time has
somehow stopped.

The slow cancellation of the future

It is the contention of this book that 21st-century culture is marked by
the same anachronism and inertia which afflicted Sapphire and Steel in
their final adventure. But this stasis has been buried, interred behind
a superficial frenzy of ‘newness’, of perpetual movement. The ‘jumbling
up of time’, the montaging of earlier eras, has ceased to be worthy of
comment; it is now so prevalent that is no longer even noticed.

In his book _After The Future_, Franco ‘Bifo’ Berardi refers to the ‘the
slow cancellation of the future [that] got underway in the 1970s and
1980s.’ ‘But when I say “future”’, he elaborates,

I am not referring to the direction of time. I am thinking, rather, of
the psychological perception, which emerged in the cultural situation of
progressive modernity, the cultural expectations that were fabricated
during the long period of modern civilization, reaching a peak after the
Second World War. These expectations were shaped in the conceptual
frameworks of an ever progressing development, albeit through different
methodologies: the Hegel-Marxist mythology of _Aufhebung_ and founding
of the new totality of Communism; the bourgeois mythology of a linear
development of welfare and democracy; the technocratic mythology of the
all-encom-passing power of scientific knowledge; and so on.

My generation grew up at the peak of this mythological temporalization,
and it is very difficult, maybe impossible, to get rid of it, and look
at reality without this kind of temporal lens. I’ll never be able to
live in accordance with the new reality, no matter how evident,
unmistakable, or even dazzling its social planetary trends. _(After The_
Future, AK Books, 2011, pp18-19)

Bifo is a generation older than me, but he and I are on the same side of
a temporal split here. I, too, will never be able to adjust to the
paradoxes of this new situation. The immediate temptation here is to fit
what I’m saying into a wearily familiar narrative: it is a matter of the
old failing to come to terms with the new, saying it was better in their
day. Yet it is just this picture – with its assumption that the young
are automatically at the leading edge of cultural change – that is now
out of date.

Rather than the old recoiling from the ‘new’ in fear and
incomprehension, those whose expectations were formed in an earlier era
are more likely to be startled by the sheer persistence of recognisable
forms. Nowhere is this clearer than in popular music culture. It was
through the mutations of popular music that many of those of us who grew
up in the 1960s, 70s and 80s learned to measure the passage of cultural
time. But faced with 21st-century music, it is the very sense of future
shock which has disappeared. This is quickly established by performing a
simple thought experiment. Imagine any record released in the past
couple of years being beamed back in time to, say, 1995 and played on
the radio. It’s hard to think that it will produce any jolt in the
listeners. On the contrary, what would be likely to shock our 1995
audience would be the very recognisability of the sounds: would music
really have changed so little in the next 17 years? Contrast this with
the rapid turnover of styles between the 1960s and the 90s: play a
jungle record from 1993 to someone in 1989 and it would have sounded
like something so new that it would have challenged them to rethink what
music was, or could be. While 20th-century experimental culture was
seized by a recombinatorial delirium, which made it feel as if newness
was infinitely available, the 21st century is oppressed by a crushing
sense of finitude and exhaustion. It doesn’t feel like the future. Or,
alternatively, it doesn’t feel as if the 21st century has started yet.
We remain trapped in the 20th century, just as Sapphire and Steel were
incarcerated in their roadside café.

The slow cancellation of the future has been accompanied by a deflation
of expectations. There can be few who believe that in the coming year a
record as great as, say, the Stooges’ _Funhouse_ or Sly Stone’s _There’s
a Riot Goin’ On_ will be released. Still less do we expect the kind of
ruptures brought about by The Beatles or disco. The feeling of
belatedness, of living after the gold rush, is as omnipresent as it is
disavowed. Compare the fallow terrain of the current moment with the
fecundity of previous periods and you will quickly be accused of
‘nostalgia’. But the reliance of current artists on styles that were
established long ago suggests that the current moment is in the grip of
a _formal_ nostalgia, of which more shortly.

It is not that nothing happened in the period when the slow cancellation
of the future set in. On the contrary, those 30 years have been a time
of massive, traumatic change. In the UK, the election of Margaret
Thatcher had brought to an end the uneasy compromises of the so-called
postwar social consensus. Thatcher’s neoliberal programme in politics
was reinforced by a transnational restructuring of the capitalist
economy. The shift into so-called Post-Fordism – with globalisation,
ubiquitous computerisation and the casualisation of labour – resulted in
a complete transformation in the way that work and leisure were
organised. In the last 10 to 15 years, meanwhile, the internet and
mobile telecommunications technology have altered the texture of
everyday experience beyond all recognition. Yet, perhaps _because_ of
all this, there’s an increasing sense that culture has lost the ability
to grasp and articulate the present. Or it could be that, in one very
important sense, there is no present to grasp and articulate any more.

Consider the fate of the concept of ‘futuristic’ music. The ‘futuristic’
in music has long since ceased to refer to any future that we expect to
be different; it has become an established style, much like a particular
typographical font. Invited to think of the futuristic, we will still
come up with something like the music of Kraftwerk, even though this is
now as antique as Glenn Miller’s big band jazz was when the German group
began experimenting with synthesizers in the early 1970s.

Where is the 21st-century equivalent of Kraftwerk? If Kraftwerk’s music
came out of a casual intolerance of the already-established, then the
present moment is marked by its extraordinary accommodation towards the
past. More than that, the very distinction between past and present is
breaking down. In 1981, the 1960s seemed much further away than they do
today. Since then, cultural time has folded back on itself, and the
impression of linear development has given way to a strange
simultaneity.

Two examples will suffice to introduce this peculiar temporality. When I
first saw the video for the Arctic Monkeys’ 2005 single ‘I Bet You Look
Good on the Dancefloor’, I genuinely believed that it was some lost
artifact from circa 1980. Everything in the video – the lighting, the
haircuts, the clothes – had been assembled to give the impression that
this was a performance on BBC2’s ‘serious rock show’ _The Old Grey
Whistle Test_. Furthermore, there was no discordance between the look
and the sound. At least to a casual listen, this could quite easily have
been a postpunk group from the early 1980s. Certainly, if one performs a
version of the thought experiment I described above, it’s easy to
imagine ‘I Bet You Look Good On The Dancefloor’ being broadcast on _The
Old Grey Whistle Test_ in 1980, and producing no sense of disorientation
in the audience. Like me, they might have imagined that the references
to ‘1984’ in the lyrics referred to the future.

There ought to be something astonishing about this. Count back 25 years
from 1980, and you are at the beginning of rock and roll. A record that
sounded like Buddy Holly or Elvis in 1980 would have sounded out of
time. Of course, such records were released in 1980, but they were
marketed as retro. If the Arctic Monkeys weren’t positioned as a ‘retro’
group, it is partly because, by 2005, there was no ‘now’ with which to
contrast their retrospection. In the 1990s, it was possible to hold
something like Britpop revivalism to account by comparing it to the
experimentalism happening on the UK dance underground or in US R&B. By
2005, the rates of innovation in both these areas had enormously
slackened. UK dance music remains much more vibrant than rock, but the
changes that happen there are tiny, incremental, and detectable largely
only by initiates – there is none of the dislocation of sensation that
you heard in the shift from Rave to Jungle and from Jungle to Garage in
the 1990s. As I write this, one of the dominant sounds in pop (the
globalised club music that has supplanted R&B) resembles nothing more
than Eurotrance, a particularly bland European 1990s cocktail made from
some of the most flavourless components of House and Techno.

Second example. I first heard Amy Winehouse’s version of ‘Valerie’ while
walking through a shopping mall, perhaps the perfect venue for consuming
it. Up until then, I had believed that ‘Valerie’ was first recorded by
indie plodders the Zutons. But, for a moment, the record’s antiqued
1960s soul sound and the vocal (which on a casual listen I didn’t at
first recognise as Winehouse) made me temporarily revise this belief:
surely the Zutons’ version of the track was a cover of _this_ apparently
‘older’ track, which I had not heard until now? Naturally, it didn’t
take me long to realise that the ‘60s soul sound’ was actually a
simulation; this was indeed a cover of the Zutons’ track, done in the
souped-up retro style in which the record’s producer, Mark Ronson, has
specialised.

Ronson’s productions might have been designed to illustrate what Fredric
Jameson called the ‘nostalgia mode’. Jameson identifies this tendency in
his remarkably prescient writings on postmodernism, beginning in the
1980s. What makes ‘Valerie’ and the Arctic Monkeys typical of postmodern
retro is the way in which they perform anachronism. While they are
sufficiently ‘historical’–sounding to pass on first listen as belonging
to the period which they ape – there is something not quite right about
them. Discrepancies in texture – the results of modern studio and
recording techniques – mean that they belong neither to the present nor
to the past but to some implied ‘timeless’ era, an eternal 1960s or an
eternal 80s. The ‘classic’ sound, its elements now serenely liberated
from the pressures of historical becoming, can now be periodically
buffed up by new technology.

It is important to be clear about what Jameson means by the ‘nostalgia
mode’. He is not referring to psychological nostalgia – indeed, the
nostalgia mode as Jameson theorises it might be said to preclude
psychological nostalgia, since it arises only when a coherent sense of
historical time breaks down. The kind of figure capable of exhibiting
and expressing a yearning for the past belongs, actually, to a
paradigmatically modernist moment – think, for instance, of Proust’s and
Joyce’s ingenious exercises in recovering lost time. Jameson’s nostalgia
mode is better understood in terms of a _formal_ attachment to the
techniques and formulas of the past, a consequence of a retreat from the
modernist challenge of innovating cultural forms adequate to
contemporary experience. Jameson’s example is Lawrence Kasdan’s now
half-forgotten film _Body Heat_ (1981), which, although it was
_officially_ set in the 1980s, feels as if it belongs to the 30s. _‘Body
Heat_ is technically not a nostalgia film,’ Jameson writes,

since it takes place in a contemporary setting, in a little Florida
village near Miami. On the other hand, this technical contemporaneity is
most ambiguous indeed…Technically,…its objects (its cars, for instance)
are 1980s products, but everything in the film conspires to blur that
immediate contemporary reference and to make it possible to receive this
too as nostalgia work – as a narrative set in some indefinable nostalgic
past, an eternal 1930s, say, beyond history. It seems to me exceedingly
symptomatic to find the very style of nostalgia films invading and
colonizing even those movies today which have contemporary settings, as
though, for some reason, we were unable today to focus our own present,
as though we had become incapable of achieving aesthetic representations
of our own current experience. But if that is so, then it is a terrible
indictment of consumer capitalism itself – or, at the very least, an
alarming and pathological symptom of a society that has become incapable
of dealing with time and history. (‘Postmodernism and Consumer Society’
in _The Cultural Turn: Selected Writings on the Postmodern, 1983-1998_,
Verso, 1998, pp9-10.)

What blocks _Body Heat_ from being a period piece or a nostalgia picture
in any straightforward way is its disavowal of any explicit reference to
the past. The result is anachronism, and the paradox is that this
‘blurring of official contemporaneity’, this ‘waning of historicity’ is
increasingly typical of our experience of cultural products. Another of
Jameson’s examples of the nostalgia mode is _Star Wars:_

one of the most important cultural experiences of the generations that
grew up from the 1930s to the 1950s was the Saturday afternoon series of
the Buck Rogers type – alien villains, true American heroes, heroines in
distress, the death ray or the doomsday box, and the cliff-hanger at the
end whose miraculous solution was to be witnessed next Saturday
afternoon. _Star Wars_ reinvents this experience in the form of a
pastiche; there is no point to a parody of such series, since they are
long extinct. Far from being a pointless satire of such dead forms,
_Star Wars_ satisfies a deep (might I even say repressed?) longing to
experience them again: it is a complex object in which on some first
level children and adolescents can take the adventures straight, while
the adult public is able to gratify a deeper and more properly nostalgic
desire to return to that older period and to live its strange old
aesthetic artefacts through once again. (‘Postmodernism and Consumer
Society’, p8)

There is no nostalgia for a historical period here (or if there is, it
is only indirect): the longing of which Jameson writes is a yearning for
a form. _Star Wars_ is a particularly resonant example of postmodern
anachronism, because of the way it used technology to obfuscate its
archaic form. Belying its origins in these fusty adventure series forms,
_Star Wars_ could appear new because its then unprecedented special
effects relied upon the latest technology. If, in a paradigmatically
modernist way, Kraftwerk used technology to allow new forms to emerge,
the nostalgia mode subordinated technology to the task of refurbishing
the old. The effect was to disguise the disappearance of the future as
its opposite.

The future didn’t disappear overnight. Berardi’s phrase ‘the slow
cancellation of the future’ is so apt because it captures the gradual
yet relentless way in which the future has been eroded over the last 30
years. If the late 1970s and early 80s were the moment when the current
crisis of cultural temporality could first be felt, it was only during
the first decade of the 21st century that what Simon Reynolds calls
‘dyschronia’ has become endemic. This dyschronia, this temporal
disjuncture, ought to feel uncanny, yet the predominance of what
Reynolds calls ‘retro-mania’ means that it has lost any _unheimlich_
charge: anachronism is now taken for granted. Jameson’s postmodernism –
with its tendencies towards retrospection and pastiche – has been
naturalised. Take someone like the stupendously successful Adele:
although her music is not marketed as retro, there is nothing that marks
out her records as belonging to the 21st century either. Like so much
contemporary cultural production, Adele’s recordings are saturated with
a vague but persistent feeling of the past without recalling any
specific historical moment.

Jameson equates the postmodern ‘waning of historicity’ with the
‘cultural logic of late capitalism’, but he says little about why the
two are synonymous. Why did the arrival of neoliberal, post-Fordist
capitalism lead to a culture of retrospection and pastiche? Perhaps we
can venture a couple of provisional conjectures here. The first concerns
consumption. Could it be that neoliberal capitalism’s destruction of
solidarity and security brought about a compensatory hungering for the
well-established and the familiar? Paul Virilio has written of a ‘polar
inertia’ that is a kind of effect of and counterweight to the massive
speeding up of communication. Virilio’s example is Howard Hughes, living
in one hotel room for 15 years, endlessly rewatching _Ice Station
Zebra_. Hughes, once a pioneer in aeronautics, became an early explorer
of the existential terrain that cyberspace will open up, where it is no
longer necessary to physically move in order to access the whole history
of culture. Or, as Berardi has argued, the intensity and precariousness
of late capitalist work culture leaves people in a state where they are
simultaneously exhausted and overstimulated. The combination of
precarious work and digital communications leads to a besieging of
attention. In this insomniac, inundated state, Berardi claims, culture
becomes de-eroticised. The art of seduction takes too much time, and,
according to Berardi, something like Viagra answers not to a biological
but to a cultural deficit: desperately short of time, energy and
attention, we demand quick fixes. Like another of Berardi’s examples,
pornography, retro offers the quick and easy promise of a minimal
variation on an already familiar satisfaction.

The other explanation for the link between late capitalism and
retrospection centres on production. Despite all its rhetoric of novelty
and innovation, neoliberal capitalism has gradually but systematically
deprived artists of the resources necessary to produce the new. In the
UK, the postwar welfare state and higher education maintenance grants
constituted an indirect source of funding for most of the experiments in
popular culture between the 1960s and the 80s. The subsequent
ideological and practical attack on public services meant that one of
the spaces where artists could be sheltered from the pressure to produce
something that was immediately successful was severely circumscribed. As
public service broadcasting became ‘marketised’, there was an increased
tendency to turn out cultural productions that resembled what was
already successful. The result of all of this is that the social time
available for withdrawing from work and immersing oneself in cultural
production drastically declined. If there’s one factor above all else
which contributes to cultural conservatism, it is the vast inflation in
the cost of rent and mortgages. It’s no accident that the efflorescence
of cultural invention in London and New York in the late 1970s and early
80s (in the punk and postpunk scenes) coincided with the availability of
squatted and cheap property in those cities. Since then, the decline of
social housing, the attacks on squatting, and the delirious rise in
property prices have meant that the amount of time and energy available
for cultural production has massively diminished. But perhaps it was
only with the arrival of digital communicative capitalism that this
reached terminal crisis point. Naturally, the besieging of attention
described by Berardi applies to producers as much as consumers.
Producing the new depends upon certain kinds of withdrawal – from, for
instance, sociality as much as from pre-existing cultural forms – but
the currently dominant form of socially networked cyberspace, with its
endless opportunities for micro-contact and its deluge of YouTube links,
has made withdrawal more difficult than ever before. Or, as Simon
Reynolds so pithily put it, in recent years, everyday life has sped up,
but culture has slowed down.

No matter what the causes for this temporal pathology are, it is clear
that no area of Western culture is immune from them. The former redoubts
of futurism, such as electronic music, no longer offer escape from
formal nostalgia. Music culture is in many ways paradigmatic of the fate
of culture under post-Fordist capitalism. At the level of form, music is
locked into pastiche and repetition. But its infrastructure has been
subject to massive, unpredictable change: the old paradigms of
consumption, retail and distribution are disintegrating, with
downloading eclipsing the physical object, record shops closing and
cover art disappearing.

Why hauntology?

What has the concept of hauntology to do with all this? It was in fact
with some reluctance that hauntology started to be applied to the
electronic music of the middle of the last decade. I’d generally found
Jacques Derrida, the inventor of the term, a frustrating thinker. As
soon as it was established in certain areas of the academy,
deconstruction, the philosophical project which Derrida founded,
installed itself as a pious cult of indeterminacy, which at its worst
made a lawyerly virtue of avoiding any definitive claim. Deconstruction
was a kind of pathology of scepticism, which induced hedging, infirmity
of purpose and compulsory doubt in its followers. It elevated particular
modes of academic practice – Heidegger’s priestly opacity, literary
theory’s emphasis on the ultimate instability of any interpretation –
into quasi-theological imperatives. Derrida’s circumlocutions seemed
like a disintensifying influence.

It’s by no means irrelevant to point out here that my first encounter
with Derrida took place in what is now a vanished milieu. It came in the
pages of the _New Musical Express_ in the 1980s, where Derrida’s name
would be mentioned by the most exciting writers. (And, actually, part of
my frustration with Derrida’s work came out of disappointment. The
enthusiasm of NME writers like Ian Penman and Mark Sinker for Derrida,
and the formal and conceptual inventiveness it seemed to provoke in
their writing, created expectations which Derrida’s own work couldn’t
meet when I eventually came to read it.) It’s hard to believe this now
but, along with public service broadcasting, the NME constituted a kind
of supplementary-informal education system, in which theory acquired a
strange, lustrous glamour. I had also seen Derrida in Ken McMullen’s
film _Ghost Dance_, shown late at night on Channel 4 in the early days
of the network, at a time before we had a VCR, when I had to resort to
washing my face with cold water to try to keep myself awake.

Derrida coined the term ‘hauntology’ in his _Specters of Marx: The State
of the Debt, the Work of Mourning and the New International_. ‘To haunt
does not mean to be present, and it is necessary to introduce haunting
into the very construction of a concept,’ he wrote. (Jacques Derrida,
_Specters of Marx: The State of the Debt, the Work of Mourning and the
New International_, Routledge, 1994, p202) Hauntology was this concept,
or puncept. The pun was on the philosophical concept of ontology, the
philosophical study of what can be said to exist. Hauntology was the
successor to previous concepts of Derrida’s such as the trace and
_différance;_ like those earlier terms, it referred to the way in which
nothing enjoys a purely positive existence. Everything that exists is
possible only on the basis of a whole series of absences, which precede
and surround it, allowing it to possess such consistency and
intelligibility that it does. In the famous example, any particular
linguistic term gains its meaning not from its own positive qualities
but from its difference from other terms. Hence Derrida’s ingenious
deconstructions of the ‘metaphysics of presence’ and ‘phonocentrism’,
which expose the way in which particular dominant forms of thought had
(incoherently) privileged the voice over writing.

But hauntology explicitly brings into play the question of time in a way
that had not quite been the case with the trace or _différance_. One of
the repeated phrases in _Specters of Marx_ is from _Hamlet_, ‘the time
is out of joint’ and in his recent _Radical Atheism: Derrida and the
Time of Life_, Martin Hägglund argues that it is possible to see all of
Derrida’s work in relation to this concept of broken time. ‘Derrida’s
aim,’ Hägglund argues, ‘is to formulate a general ‘hauntology’
_(hantologie)_, in contrast to the traditional ‘ontology’ that thinks
being in terms of self-identical presence. What is important about the
figure of the specter, then, is that it cannot be fully present: it has
no being in itself but marks a relation to what is _no longer_ or _not
yet’ (Radical Atheism: Derrida and the Time of_ Life, Stanford
University Press, 2008, p82)

Is hauntology, then, some attempt to revive the supernatural, or is it
just a figure of speech? The way out of this unhelpful opposition is to
think of hauntology as _the agency of the virtual_, with the spectre
understood not as anything supernatural, but as that which acts without
(physically) existing. The great thinkers of modernity, Freud as well as
Marx, had discovered different modes of this spectral causality. The
late capitalist world, governed by the abstractions of finance, is very
clearly a world in which virtualities are effective, and perhaps the
most ominous ‘spectre of Marx’ is capital itself. But as Derrida
underlines in his interviews in the _Ghost Dance_ film, psychoanalysis
is also a ‘science of ghosts’, a study of how reverberant events in the
psyche become revenants.

Referring back to Hägglund’s distinction between the _no longer_ and the
_not yet_, we can provisionally distinguish two directions in
hauntology. The first refers to that which is (in actuality is) _no
longer_, but which _remains_ effective as a virtuality (the traumatic
‘compulsion to repeat’, a fatal pattern). The second sense of hauntology
refers to that which (in actuality) has _not yet_ happened, but which is
_already_ effective in the virtual (an attractor, an anticipation
shaping current behaviour). The ‘spectre of communism’ that Marx and
Engels had warned of in the first lines of the _Communist Manifesto_ was
just this kind of ghost: a virtuality whose threatened coming was
already playing a part in undermining the present state of things.

In addition to being another moment in Derrida’s own philosophical
project of deconstruction, _Specters of Marx_ was also a specific
engagement with the immediate historical context provided by the
disintegration of the Soviet empire. Or rather, it was an engagement
with the alleged disappearance of history trumpeted by Francis Fukuyama
in his _The End of History and the Last Man_. What would happen now that
actually existing socialism had collapsed, and capitalism could assume
full spectrum dominance, its claims to global dominion were thwarted not
any longer by the existence of a whole other bloc, but by small islands
of resistance such as Cuba and North Korea? The era of what I have
called ‘capitalist realism’ – the widespread belief that there is no
alternative to capitalism – has been haunted not by the apparition of
the spectre of communism, but by its disappearance. As Derrida wrote:

There is today in the world a dominant discourse…This dominating
discourse often has the manic, jubilatory, and incantatory form that
Freud assigned to the so-called triumphant phase of mourning work. The
incantation repeats and ritualizes itself, it holds forth and holds to
formulas, like any animistic magic. To the rhythm of a cadenced march,
it proclaims: Marx is dead, communism is dead, very dead, and along with
it its hopes, its discourse, its theories, and its practices. It says:
long live capitalism, long live the market, here’s to the survival of
economic and political liberalism! _(Specters of Marx_, p64)

_Specters of Marx_ was also a series of speculations about the media (or
post-media) technologies that capital had installed on its now global
territory. In this sense, hauntology was by no means something rarefied;
it was endemic in the time of ‘techno-tele-discursivity,
techno-tele-iconicity’ ‘simulacra’ and ‘synthetic images’. This
discussion of the ‘tele-’ shows that hauntology concerns a crisis of
space as well as time. As theorists such as Virilio and Jean Baudrillard
had long acknowledged – and _Specters of Marx_ can also be read as
Derrida settling his account with these thinkers – ‘tele-technologies’
collapse both space and time. Events that are spatially distant become
available to an audience instantaneously. Neither Baudrillard nor
Derrida would live to see the full effects – no doubt I should say the
full effects so far – of the ‘tele-technology’ that has most radically
contracted space and time, cyberspace. But here we have a first reason
why the concept of hauntology should have become attached to popular
culture in the first decade of the 21st century. For it was at this
moment when cyberspace enjoyed unprecedented dominion over the
reception, distribution and consumption of culture – especially music
culture.

When it was applied to music culture – in my own writing, and in that of
other critics such as Simon Reynolds and Joseph Stannard – hauntology
first of all named a confluence of artists. The word confluence is
crucial here. For these artists – William Basinski, the Ghost Box label,
The Caretaker, Burial, Mordant Music, Philip Jeck, amongst others – had
converged on a certain terrain without actually influencing one another.
What they shared was not a sound so much as a sensibility, an
existential orientation. The artists that came to be labelled
hauntological were suffused with an overwhelming melancholy; and they
were preoccupied with the way in which technology materialised memory –
hence a fascination with television, vinyl records, audiotape, and with
the sounds of these technologies breaking down. This fixation on
materialised memory led to what is perhaps the principal sonic signature
of hauntology: the use of crackle, the surface noise made by vinyl.
Crackle makes us aware that we are listening to a time that is out of
joint; it won’t allow us to fall into the illusion of presence. It
reverses the normal order of listening according to which, as Ian Penman
put it, we are habituated to the ‘re’ of recording being repressed. We
aren’t only made aware that the sounds we are hearing are recorded, we
are also made conscious of the playback systems we use to access the
recordings. And hovering behind much sonic hauntology is the difference
between analogue and digital: so many hauntological tracks have been
about revisiting the physicality of analogue media in the era of digital
ether. MP3 files remain material, of course, but their materiality is
occulted from us, by contrast with the tactile materiality of vinyl
records and even compact discs.

No doubt a yearning for this older regime of materiality plays a part in
the melancholia that saturates hauntological music. As to the deeper
causes of this melancholia, we need look no further than the title of
Leyland Kirby’s album: _Sadly, The Future Is No Longer What It Was_. In
hauntological music there is an implicit acknowledgement that the hopes
created by postwar electronica or by the euphoric dance music of the
1990s have evaporated – not only has the future not arrived, it no
longer seems possible. Yet at the same time, the music constitutes a
refusal to give up on the desire for the future. This refusal gives the
melancholia a political dimension, because it amounts to a failure to
accommodate to the closed horizons of capitalist realism.

Not giving up the ghost

In Freud’s terms, both mourning and melancholia are about loss. But
whereas mourning is the slow, painful withdrawal of libido from the lost
object, in melancholia, libido remains attached to what has disappeared.
For mourning to properly begin, Derrida says in _Specters of Marx_, the
dead must be conjured away: ‘the conjuration has to make sure that the
dead will not come back: quick, do whatever is needed to keep the
cadaver localised, in a safe place, decomposing right where it was
inhumed, or even embalmed as they liked to do in Moscow’ _(Specters of
Marx_, p120) But there are those who refuse to allow the body to be
interred, just as there is a danger of (over)killing something to such
an extent that it becomes a spectre, a pure virtuality. ‘Capitalist
societies,’ Derrida writes, ‘can always heave a sigh of relief and say
to themselves: communism is finished, but it did not take place, it was
only a ghost. They do no more than disavow the undeniable itself: a
ghost never dies, it remains always to come and to come-back.’
_(Specters of Marx_, p123)

Haunting, then, can be construed as a failed mourning. It is about
refusing to give up the ghost or – and this can sometimes amount to the
same thing – the refusal of the ghost to give up on us. The spectre will
not allow us to settle into/ for the mediocre satisfactions one can
glean in a world governed by capitalist realism.

What’s at stake in 21st century hauntology is not the disappearance of a
particular object. What has vanished is a tendency, a virtual
trajectory. One name for this tendency is popular modernism. The
cultural ecology that I referred to above – the music press and the more
challenging parts of public service broadcasting – were part of a UK
popular modernism, as were postpunk, brutalist architecture, Penguin
paperbacks and the BBC Radiophonic Workshop. In popular modernism, the
elitist project of modernism was retrospectively vindicated. At the same
time, popular culture definitively established that it did not have to
be populist. Particular modernist techniques were not only disseminated
but collectively reworked and extended, just as the modernist task of
producing forms which were adequate to the present moment was taken up
and renewed. Which is to say that, although of course I didn’t realise
it at the time, the culture which shaped most of my early expectations
was essentially popular modernist, and the writing that has been
collected in _Ghosts Of My Life_ is about coming to terms with the
disappearance of the conditions which allowed it to exist.

It’s worth pausing a moment here to distinguish the haunto-logical
melancholia I’m talking about from two other kinds of melancholia. The
first is what Wendy Brown calls ‘left melancholy’. On the face of it,
what I’ve said risks being heard as a kind of leftist melancholic
resignation: _although they weren’t perfect, the institutions of social
democracy were much better than anything we can hope for now, perhaps
the best we can ever hope for_…In her essay ‘Resisting Left Melancholy’,
Brown attacks ‘a Left that operates without either a deep and radical
critique of the status quo or a compelling alternative to the existing
order of things. But perhaps even more troubling, it is a Left that has
become more attached to its impossibility than to its potential
fruitfulness, a Left that is most at home dwelling not in hopefulness
but in its own marginality and failure, a Left that is thus caught in a
structure of melancholic attachment to a certain strain of its own dead
past, whose spirit is ghostly, whose structure of desire is backward
looking and punishing.’ (Wendy Brown, ‘Resisting Left Melancholy’,
_boundary_ 2 26:3, 1999, p26). Yet much of what makes the melancholy
Brown analyses so pernicious is its disavowed quality. Brown’s left
melancholic is a depressive who believes he is realistic; someone who no
longer has any expectation that his desire for radical transformation
could be achieved, but who doesn’t recognise that he has given up. In
her discussion of Brown’s essay in _The Communist Horizon_, Jodi Dean
refers to Lacan’s formula: ‘the only thing one can be guilty of is
giving ground relative to one’s desire’ and the shift that Brown
describes – from a left that confidently assumed the future belonged to
it, to a left that makes a virtue of its own incapacity to act – seems
to exemplify the transition from desire (which in Lacanian terms is the
desire to desire) to drive (an enjoyment through failure). The kind of
melancholia I’m talking about, by contrast, consists not in giving up on
desire but in refusing to yield. It consists, that is to say, in a
refusal to adjust to what current conditions call ‘reality’ – even if
the cost of that refusal is that you feel like an outcast in your own
time…

The second kind of melancholia that hauntological melancholia must be
distinguished from is what Paul Gilroy calls ‘postcolonial melancholia’.
Gilroy defines this melancholia in terms of an avoidance; it is about
evading ‘the painful obligations to work through the grim details of
imperial and colonial history and to transform paralyzing guilt into a
more productive shame that would be conducive to the building of a
multicultural nationality that is no longer phobic about the prospect of
exposure to either strangers or otherness.’ (Paul Gilroy, _Postcolonial
Melancholia_, Columbia University Press, 2005, p99) It comes out of a
‘loss of a fantasy of omnipotence’. Like Brown’s left melancholy, then,
postcolonial melancholia is a disavowed form of melancholia: its
‘signature combination’, Gilroy writes, is that of ‘manic elation with
misery, self-loathing, and ambivalence.’ _(Postcolonial Melancholia_,
p104) The postcolonial melancholic doesn’t (just) refuse to accept
change; at some level, he refuses to accept that change has happened at
all. He incoherently holds on to the fantasy of omnipotence by
experiencing change only as decline and failure, for which, naturally,
the immigrant other must be blamed (the incoherence here is obvious: if
the postcolonial melancholic were really omnipotent, how could he be
harmed by the immigrant?). At first sight, it might be possible to see
hauntological melancholia as a variant of postcolonial melancholia:
another example of white boy whingeing over lost privileges…Yet this
would be to grasp what has been lost only in the terms of the worst kind
of resentment _ressentiment_, or in terms of what Alex Williams has
called negative solidarity, in which we are invited to celebrate, not an
increase in liberation, but the fact that another group has now been
immiserated; and this is especially sad when the group in question was
predominantly working class.

Nostalgia compared to what?

This raises the question of nostalgia again: is hauntology, as many of
its critics have maintained, simply a name for nostalgia? Is it about
pining for social democracy and its institutions? Given the ubiquity of
the formal nostalgia I described above, the question has to be,
_nostalgia compared to what?_ It seems strange to have to _argue_ that
comparing the present unfavourably with the past is not automatically
nostalgic in any culpable way, but such is the power of the
dehistoricising pressures of populism and PR that the claim has to be
explicitly made. PR and populism propagate the relativistic illusion
that intensity and innovation are equally distributed throughout all
cultural periods. It is the tendency to falsely overestimate the past
that makes nostalgia egregious: but, one of the lessons of Andy
Beckett’s history of Britain in the 1970s, _When The Lights Went Out_ is
that, in many ways, we falsely underestimate a period like the 70s –
Beckett in effect shows that capitalist realism was built on a
myth-monstering of the decade. Conversely, we are induced by ubiquitous
PR into falsely overestimating the present, and those who can’t remember
the past are condemned to have it resold to them forever.

If the 1970s were in many respects better than neoliberalism wants us to
remember them, we must also recognise the extent to which the capitalist
dystopia of 21st-century culture is not something that was simply
imposed on us – it was built out of our captured desires. ‘Almost
everything I was afraid of happening over the past 30 years has
happened,’ Jeremy Gilbert has observed. ‘Everything my political mentors
warned might happen, since I was a boy growing up on a poor council
estate (that’s a housing project, if you’re American) in the North of
England in the early 80s, or a high–school student reading denunciations
of Thatcherism in the left press a few years later, has turned out just
as badly as they said it would. And yet I don’t wish I was living 40
years ago. The point seems to be: this is the world we were all afraid
of; but it’s also sort of the world we wanted.’ (Jeremy Gilbert, ‘Moving
on from the Market Society: Culture (and Cultural Studies) in a
Post-Democratic Age’,
http://www.opendemocracy.net/ourkingdom/jeremy-gilbert/moving-on-from-market-society-culture-and-cultural-studies-in-post-democra)
But we shouldn’t have to choose between, say, the internet and social
security. One way of thinking about hauntology is that its lost futures
do not force such false choices; instead, what haunts is the spectre of
a world in which all the marvels of communicative technology could be
combined with a sense of solidarity much stronger than anything social
democracy could muster.

Popular modernism was by no means a completed project, some pristine
zenith that needed no further improvement. In the 1970s, certainly,
culture was opened up to working-class inventiveness in a way that is
now scarcely imaginable to us; but this was also a time when casual
racism, sexism and homophobia were routine features of the mainstream.
Needless to say, the struggles against racism and (hetero)sexism have
not in the meantime been won, but they have made significant hegemonic
advances, even as neoliberalism has corroded the social democratic
infrastructure which allowed increased working class participation in
cultural production. The disarticulation of class from race, gender and
sexuality has in fact been central to the success of the neoliberal
project – making it seem, grotesquely, as if neoliberalism were in some
way a precondition of the gains made in anti-racist, anti-sexist and
anti-heterosexist struggles.

What is being longed for in hauntology is not a particular period, but
the resumption of the _processes_ of democratisation and pluralism for
which Gilroy calls. Perhaps it’s useful to remind ourselves here that
social democracy has only become a resolved totality in retrospect; at
the time, it was a compromise formation, which those on the left saw as
a temporary bridgehead from which further gains could be won. What
should haunt us is not the _no longer_ of actually existing social
democracy, but the _not yet_ of the futures that popular modernism
trained us to expect, but which never materialised. These spectres – the
spectres of lost futures – reproach the formal nostalgia of the
capitalist realist world.

Music culture was central to the projection of the futures which have
been lost. The term music _culture_ is crucial here, because it is the
culture constellated around music (fashion, discourse, cover art) that
has been as important as the music itself in conjuring seductively
unfamiliar worlds. The _destranging_ of music culture in the 21st
century – the ghastly return of industry moguls and boys next door to
mainstream pop; the premium put on ‘reality’ in popular entertainment;
the increased tendency of those in music culture to dress and look like
digitally and surgically enhanced versions of regular folk; the emphasis
placed on gymnastic emoting in singing – has played a major role in
conditioning us to accept consumer capitalism’s model of ordinariness.
Michael Hardt and Antonio Negri are right when they say that the
revolutionary take on race, gender and sexuality struggles goes far
beyond the demand that different identities be recognised. Ultimately,
it is about the dismantling of identity. The ‘revolutionary process of
the abolition of identity, we should keep in mind, is monstrous,
violent, and traumatic. Don’t try to save yourself—in fact, your _self
has_, to be sacrificed! This does not mean that liberation casts us into
an indifferent sea with no objects of identification, but rather the
existing identities will no longer serve as anchors.’ (Michael Hardt and
Antonio Negri, _Commonwealth_, Harvard University Press, 2011, p339)
While Hardt and Negri are correct to warn of the traumatic dimensions of
this transformation, as they are also aware, it also has its joyful
aspects. Throughout the 20th century, music culture was a probe that
played a major role in preparing the population to _enjoy_ a future that
was no longer white, male or heterosexual, a future in which the
relinquishing of identities that were in any case poor fictions would be
a blessed relief. In the 21st century, by contrast – and the fusion of
pop with reality TV is absolutely indicative of this – popular music
culture has been reduced to being a mirror held up to late capitalist
subjectivity.

By now, it should already be very clear that there are different senses
of the word hauntology at play in _Ghosts Of My Life_. There is the
specific sense in which it has been applied to music culture, and a more
general sense, where it refers to persistences, repetitions,
prefigurations. There are also more or less benign versions of
hauntology. _Ghosts Of My Life_ will move amongst these different uses
of the term.

The book is about the ghosts of _my_ life, so there is necessarily a
personal dimension to what follows. Yet my take on the old phrase ‘the
personal is political’ has been to look for the (cultural, structural,
political) conditions of subjectivity. The most productive way of
reading the ‘personal is political’ is to interpret it as saying: the
personal is impersonal. It’s miserable for anyone at all to _be
themselves_ (still more, to be forced to sell themselves). Culture, and
the analysis of culture, is valuable insofar as it allows an escape from
ourselves.

Such insights have been hard won. Depression is the most malign spectre
that has dogged my life – and I use the term depression to distinguish
the dreary solipsism of the condition from the more lyrical (and
collective) desolations of haunto-logical melancholia. I started
blogging in 2003 whilst still in such a state of depression that I found
everyday life scarcely bearable. Some of these writings were part of the
working through of the condition, and it’s no accident that my (so far
successful) escape from depression coincided with a certain
externalisation of negativity: the problem wasn’t (just) me but the
culture around me. It’s clear to me that now the period from roughly
2003 to the present will be recognised – not in the far distant future,
but very soon – as the worst period for (popular) culture since the
1950s. To say that the culture was desolate is not to say that there
weren’t traces of other possibilities. _Ghosts Of My Life_ is an attempt
to engage with some of these traces.



GHOSTS OF MY LIFE: GOLDIE, JAPAN, TRICKY


It must have been 1994 when I first saw Rufige Kru’s ‘Ghosts Of My Life’
on the shelves of a high street record store. The four-track EP had been
released in 1993, but this was a time – before internet hype and online
discographies – when the traces of the underground took longer to
surface. The EP was a prime example of darkside Jungle. Jungle was a
moment in what Simon Reynolds would come to call the ‘hardcore
continuum’: the series of mutations on the British dance music
underground triggered by the introduction of the breakbeat into Rave,
passing from hardcore Rave into Jungle, Speed Garage, 2-step.

I’ll always prefer the name Jungle to the more pallid and misleading
term drum and bass, because much of the allure of the genre came from
the fact that no drums or bass guitar were played. Instead of simulating
the already-existing qualities of ‘real’ instruments, digital technology
was exploited to produce sounds that had no pre-existing correlates. The
function of timestretching – which allowed the time signature of a sound
to be changed, without its pitch being altered – transformed sampled
breakbeats into rhythms that no human could play. Producers would also
use the strange metallic excrescence that was produced when samples were
slowed down and the software had to fill in the gaps. The result was an
abstract rush that made chemicals all but redundant: accelerating our
metabolisms, heightening our expectations, reconstructing our nervous
systems.

It is also worth holding onto the name Jungle because it evokes a
terrain: the urban Jungle, or rather the underside of a metropolis that
was just in the process of being digitalised. It has sometimes seemed as
if the use of the word ‘urban’ is a polite synonym for ‘black’ music.
Yet it’s possible to hear ‘urban’, not as some disavowal of race, but as
an invocation of the powers of cosmopolitan conviviality. At the same
time, however, Jungle was by no means an unequivocal _celebration_ of
the urban. If Jungle celebrated anything, it was the lure of _the dark_.
Jungle liberated the suppressed libido in the dystopian impulse,
releasing and amplifying the jouissance that comes from anticipating the
annihilation of all current certainties. As Kodwo Eshun argued, in
Jungle there was a libidinisation of anxiety itself, a transformation of
fight and flight impulses into enjoyment.

This was deeply ambivalent: at one level, what we were hearing here was
a kind of sonic fictional intensification and extrapolation of the
neoliberal world’s destruction of solidarity and security. Nostalgia for
the familiarity of smalltown life was rejected in Jungle, but its
digital city was devoid of the comfort of strangers: no-one could be
trusted here. Jungle took many of its cues from the Hobbesian scenarios
of 1980s films such as _Blade Runner, Terminator_ and _Predator 2_. It’s
no accident that all three of these films are about hunting. Jungle’s
world was one in which entities – human as well as nonhuman – stalked
each other for sport as well as for sustenance. Yet darkside Jungle was
about the thrill of the chased, about the videogame euphoria–anxiety of
eluding ruthless predators, as much as it was about the exhilaration of
running prey to ground.

At another level, darkside Jungle projected the very future that capital
can only disavow. Capital can never openly admit that it is a system
based on inhuman rapacity; the Terminator can never remove its human
mask. Jungle not only ripped the mask off, it actively identified with
the inorganic circuitry beneath: hence the android/ death’s head that
Rufige Kru used as their logo. The paradoxical identification with
death, and the equation of death with the inhuman future was more than a
cheap nihilist gesture. At a certain point, the unrelieved negativity of
the dystopian drive trips over into a perversely utopian gesture, and
annihilation becomes the condition of the radically new.

I was a postgraduate student in 1994, and I didn’t have either the nerve
or the money to hang around specialist record shops to pick up all the
latest releases. So I would access Jungle tracks in much the same fitful
way that I had followed American comics in the 70s. I would pick them up
where and when I could, usually on CD compilations issued long after
their dubplate freshness had cooled. For the most part, it was
impossible to impose any narrative on Jungle’s relentless flow.
Fittingly for a sound that was so depersonalised and dehumanised, the
names of the acts tended to be cryptic cyberpunk tags, disconnected from
any biography or place. Jungle was best enjoyed as an anonymous
electro-libidinal current that seemed to _pass through_ producers, as a
series of affects and FX that were de-linked from authors. It sounded
like some audio unlife form, a ferocious, feral artificial intelligence
that had been unwittingly called up in the studio, the breakbeats like
genetically-augmented hounds straining to be free of the leash.

Rufige Kru were one of the few Jungle acts about which I knew a little.
Because of Simon Reynolds’ evangelical pieces on Jungle in the now
long-defunct Melody Maker, I was aware that Rufige Kru was one of the
aliases used by Goldie, who, almost uniquely in the anonymity of the
Jungle scene, was already becoming a recognisable face. If there was to
be a face for this faceless music, then Goldie – a mixed race former
graffiti artist with gold teeth – was a strong candidate. Goldie was
formed by hip-hop culture, but irrevocably altered by Rave’s collective
delirium. His career became a parable for a whole series of impasses.
The temptation for any producer emerging from the scenius of the
hardcore continuum was always to renounce the essentially collective
nature of the conditions of production. It was a temptation that Goldie
was unable to resist, but, tellingly, his records declined the very
moment he stopped using impersonal, collective names for his projects,
and started releasing them under the (albeit assumed) name Goldie. His
first album, _Timeless_, smoothed out the anorganic angles of Jungle
with the use of analogue instruments and an alarming jazz-funk
tastefulness. Goldie became a minor celebrity, took a part in the BBC
soap opera _EastEnders_, and only in 2008 released the kind of album
that Rufige Kru should have put out 15 years before. The lesson was
clear: urban British artists can only be successful if they depart from
the scenius, if they leave behind the collective.

The first records Goldie and his collaborators released under the names
Rufige Kru and Metalheads were still high on Rave’s carny buzz. 1992’s
‘Terminator’ was the most epochal: jittery with excitable rave stabs,
its phased and timestretched beats suggested aberrant, impossible
geometries, while its vocal samples – from Linda Hamilton in
_Terminator_ – talked of time paradoxes and fatal strategies. The record
sounded like a commentary on itself: as if the temporal anomalies that
Hamilton described – ‘you’re talking about things that I haven’t done
yet in the past tense’ – were made physical in the vertiginously
imploding sound.

As Rufige Kru progressed their sound became sleeker. Where the early
records put one in mind of an assemblage of dismembered organs that had
been crudely stitched together, the later releases more closely
resembled mutants that had been genetically engineered. The unruly and
volatile Rave elements had gradually drained away, to be replaced by
textures that were starker, moodier. The titles – ‘Dark Rider’, ‘Fury’,
‘Manslaughter’ – told their own story. As you listened, you felt like
you were being pursued through a near-future brutalist arcade. Vocal
samples were cut back, and became more subdued and ominous.
‘Manslaughter’ features one of the most electrifying lines from _Blade
Runner’s_ rogue replicant Roy Batty: ‘If only you could see what I’ve
seen, through your eyes’ – the perfect slogan for Jungle’s new mutants,
engineered by street science to have heightened senses but a shorter
life span.

I bought any Rufige Kru record that I came upon, but ‘Ghosts Of My Life’
brought a special tingle of intrigue because of its title, with its
suggestion of Japan’s 1981 art pop masterpiece, ‘Ghosts’. When I played
the ‘Ghosts Of My Life’ 12’, I quickly realised with a shiver of
exhilaration that the pitched down voice repeating the title phrase did
indeed belong to Japan’s David Sylvian. But this wasn’t the only trace
of ‘Ghosts’. After some atonal washes and twitchy breakbeats, the track
lurched to a sudden halt, and – in a moment that still takes my breath
away when I listen to it now – a brief snatch of the spidery, abstract
electronics instantly recognizable from the Japan record leapt into the
chasm, before being immediately consumed by viscous bass ooze and the
synthetic screeches that were the sonic signatures of darkside Jungle.

Time had folded in on itself. One of my earliest pop fixations had
returned, vindicated, in an unexpected context. Early 80s New Romantic
synthpop, reviled and ridiculed in Britain, but revered in the dance
music scenes of Detroit, New York and Chicago, was finally coming home
to roost in the UK underground. Kodwo Eshun, then at work on his _More
Brilliant than the Sun: Adventures in Sonic Fiction_, would argue that
synthpop played the same founding role for Techno, hip-hop and Jungle as
delta blues did for rock, and it was as if a disavowed part of myself –
a ghost from another part of my life – was being recovered, although in
a permanently altered form.

‘Just when I think I’m winning’

In 1982, I taped ‘Ghosts’ from the radio and chain-listened to it:
pressing play, rewinding the cassette, repeating. ‘Ghosts’ is a record
which, even now, compels you to keep replaying it. Partly, that’s
because of the way the record teems with detail: you never feel you’ve
fully grasped it all.

Nothing else that Japan recorded was like ‘Ghosts’. It as an anomaly,
not only because of its seeming confessionalism, exceptional in the work
of a group which favoured aesthetic poses over emotional expression, but
also because of its arrangement, its texture. Elsewhere on _Tin Drum_ –
the 1981 album from which ‘Ghosts’ came – Japan had developed a plastic
ethno-funk, where electronics flitted through the elasticated rhythmic
architecture created by the bass and drums. On ‘Ghosts’, however, there
are no drums and no bassline. There is only percussion that sounds like
metallic vertebrae being gently struck, and a suite of sounds so
austerely synthetic that they could have come from Stockhausen.

‘Ghosts’ begins with chimes that make you feel like you are inside some
metallic clock. The air is charged, an electrical field through which
unintelligible radio-wave chitterings pass. At the same time, the track
is pervaded by an immense stillness, a poise. Watch the group’s
extraordinary live performance of ‘Ghosts’ on the Old Grey Whistle Test.
They look as if they are tending their instruments rather than playing
them.

Only Sylvian appears animated, and then it’s only his face, half-hidden
by the heavy fringe, that moves. The mannered angst of his vocal sits
oddly with the electronic austerity of the music. Its sense of enervated
foreboding is broken by the only trace of melodrama in the song – the
synth stabs which, simulating the kind of strings you’d hear on a movie
thriller-score, cue in the chorus. _‘Just when I think I’m win-ning/
when I’ve broken every door/ the ghosts of my life/ blow wild-er/ than
the win-d’_…

What, exactly, are the ghosts that haunt Sylvian? The song derives much
of its potency from declining to answer, from its lack of specificity:
we can fill in the blanks with our own spectres. What’s clear is that it
isn’t external contingencies which ruin his wellbeing. Something from
his past – something he wants to have left behind – keeps returning. He
can’t leave it behind because he carries it with him. Is he anticipating
the destruction of his happiness, or has the destruction already
happened? The present tense – or rather the hesitation between past and
present tense – creates an ambiguity, suggesting a fatalistic eternity,
a compulsion to repeat – a compulsion that might be a self-fulfilling
prophecy. The ghosts return because he fears they will…

It’s hard not to hear ‘Ghosts’ as a reflection of sorts on Japan’s
career up to that point. The group was the culmination of a certain
English take on art pop that began with Bowie and Roxy in the early 70s.
They came from Beckenham, Catford, Lewisham the unglamorous conurbation
where Kent joins South London – the same suburban hinterland from which
David Bowie, Billy Idol and Siouxsie Sioux had come. As with most
English art pop, Japan found their environment only a negative
inspiration, something to escape from. ‘There was a conscious drive away
from everything that childhood represented,’ Sylvian has remarked. Pop
was the portal out of the prosaic. Music was only part of it. Art pop
was a finishing school for working class autodidacts, where, by
following up the clues left behind by earlier pioneers – the allusions
secreted in lyrics, in track titles or in interview references – you
could learn about things that weren’t on the formal curriculum for
working class youth: fine art, European cinema, avant-garde
literature…Changing your name was the first step, and Sylvian had traded
his given name (Batt) for one that referred to Sylvain Sylvain from the
New York Dolls, the group whose style Japan had begun by imitating.

By the time of ‘Ghosts’, all of the ersatz Amerikan swagger of this
Dolls phase is long forgotten, and Sylvian has long since perfected his
plastic mass-produced copy of Bryan Ferry. In his analysis of Bryan
Ferry’s voice, Ian Penman argues that its peculiar quality came from an
only partly successful attempt to get his Geordie accent to forge a
classic, timeless Englishness. Sylvian’s singing voice is the faking of
a fake. The almost whinnying quality of Ferry’s angst is retained, but
transposed into a pure styling devoid of emotional content. It is
culture(d), not natural at all; prissy, ultra-affected, and, for that
very reason, strangely lacking in affect. It couldn’t contrast more with
Sylvian’s speaking voice at the time – awkward, tentative, strongly
bearing all the traces of class and South London which his singing voice
had sought to remove. _‘Sons of pioneers/ are hungry men.’_

‘Ghosts’ was paralysed by very English anxieties: you could imagine Pip
from _Great Expectations_ singing it. In England, working class escape
is always haunted by the possibility that you will be found out, that
your roots are showing. You won’t know some crucial rule of etiquette
that you should. You will pronounce something wrongly – mispronunciation
is a constant source of anxiety for the autodidact, because books don’t
necessarily tell you how to _say_ words. Is ‘Ghosts’ the moment when art
pop confronts this fear – that class will out, that one’s background can
never be transcended, that the rude spectres of Lewisham will return no
matter how far East you travel?

Japan had pursued art pop into a sheer superficiality, which exceeded
even their inspirations in its depthless aestheticism. _Tin Drum_, the
1981 album from which ‘Ghosts’ came, was art pop as Barthes pop, a
conspicuous playing with signs for their own seductive sake. The album
cover immediately drew you into their heavily confected world: Sylvian,
his heavily sprayed, peroxided fringe falling artfully over his Trevor
Horn specs, sits in a simulation of a simple Chinese dwelling,
chopsticks in hand, as a Mao poster peels from the wall behind him.
Everything is posed, every Sign selected with a fetishistic
fastidiousness. Check the way his eyeshadow gives his eyelids an almost
opiated heaviness – but, at the same time, everything is so painfully
fragile; his face a Noh-mask, anemically ultra-white, his body posture
ragdoll drained. Here he is, one of the last glam princes, and perhaps
the most magnificent – his face and body rare and delicate works of art,
not extrinsic to, or lesser than, the music, but forming an integral
component of the overall concept. All – social, political, cultural –
meaning seems to be drained from these references. When Sylvian sings
‘Red Army needs you’ on the closing track, ‘Cantonese Boy’, it is in the
same spirit of semiotic orientalism: the Chinese and Japanese Empires of
signs are reduced to images, exploited and coveted for their frission.

By the time of _Tin Drum_, Japan have perfected their transition from
New York Dolls-trash-hounds to gentlemen connoisseurs, from working
class Beckenham youth into cosmopolitan men about town. (Or they’ve
achieved as much as is possible: ‘Ghosts’ suggests that the transition
will never be so successful as to eliminate anxiety: the more you’ve
disguised your background, the more it will hurt when it is exposed.)
_Tin Drum’s_ superficiality is the superficiality of the (glossy)
photograph, the group’s detachment that of the photographer. Images are
decontextualised, then re-assembled to form an ‘Oriental’ panorama that
is strangely abstract: a Far East as surrealist novelist Raymond Roussel
might have reimagined it. Like Ferry, Sylvian remains Subject as well as
Object: not only the frozen Image, but also he who assembles images, not
in any pathological, _Peeping Tom_ sense, but in a coolly detached way.
The detachment, naturally, is a performance, concealing anxiety even as
it sublimates it. The words are little labyrinths, enigmas with no
possible solution – the appearance of enigmas, perhaps – false-fronted
follies decorated with Chinese and Japanese motifs.

Sylvian’s voice belongs to this masquerade. Even on ‘Ghosts’, Sylvian’s
voice does not ask to be taken at face value. It is not a voice that
reveals, or even pretends to reveal, it is a voice to hide behind, just
like the make-up, the conspicuously-worn sino-signs. It’s not only the
fixation on geography that makes Sylvian seem like a tourist, an outside
observer even in his own ‘inner’ life. His voice seems to come entirely
from his head, barely from his body at all.

And after this? Japan would fall apart, while Duran Duran were already
more than half way towards taking a lumpen version of Japan’s schtick
into superstardom. For Sylvian, there was a pursuit of ‘authenticity’,
which was connoted by two things: the turn away from rhythm and the
embracing of ‘real’ instruments. The wiping away of the cosmetics, the
quest for Meaning, the discovery of a Real Self. Yet, until 2003’s
_Blemish_, Sylvian’s solo records seemed as if they were straining
towards an emotional authenticity that his voice could never quite
deliver, only now they lacked the alibi of aestheticism.

_Tin Drum_ was Japan’s final studio album, but it was also one of the
last moments in English art pop. One future had quietly died, but others
would surface.

‘Your eyes resemble mine…’

A fragment of Japan’s ‘Ghosts’ washed up 14 years later, on Tricky’s
first single, ‘Aftermath’. Here it wasn’t sampled, but cited, by
Tricky’s mentor, fellow Bristolian Mark Stewart. In the background of
the track’s loping-shanty rhythms, you can hear Stewart speak-sing the
lines ‘just when I thought I was winning, just when I thought I could
not be stopped…‘ The use of the Japan reference and the presence of
Stewart – a major figure in Bristol postpunk since his time with The Pop
Group in the 1970s – were already powerful clues that Tricky’s
positioning as a ‘trip-hop’ artist was reductive and misleading. Too
often, the label trip-hop would be applied to what was in effect a black
music with the ‘blackness’ muted or excised (hip-hop without rap). The
‘trip’ in Tricky’s music had less to do with psychedelics and more to do
with the fuggy indolence of marijuana. But Tricky pursued ganja inertia
well beyond stoner lassitude into a visionary condition, in which rap’s
aggression and braggadocio weren’t so much removed as refracted in the
heat haze of a dreamy, hydroponic humidity.

On the face of it, Tricky’s ra(s)p could be heard as the British answer
to hip-hop, but, on a more subterranean level, what he was also taking
up and renewing were strands in postpunk and art pop. Tricky counts
postpunk acts like Blondie, The Banshees, The Cure (‘the last great pop
band, I think’, he says) as his precursors. It’s not as simple as
opposing this lineage to the soul, funk and dub references which were so
obvious in Tricky’s earliest music. Postpunk and art pop had already
drawn substantially upon funk and dub. ‘I grew up in a white ghetto,’
Tricky said when I interviewed him in 2008. ‘My Dad’s Jamaican, my
grandmother is white. When I was growing up, till I was about 16,
everything was normal. When I moved to an ethnic ghetto, I had friends
there and my friends would say, “Why do you hang out with those skinhead
guys, the white guys?” and my skinhead friends were like, “Why you
hanging out with those black guys?” I couldn’t get it, I couldn’t
understand it. I could always go to both worlds, I could go to a reggae
club and then a white club and not even notice it because my family is
all different colours, different shades. So at Christmas, you got a
white person, black person, African looking person, Asian looking
person…we didn’t notice it, my family are colour blind. But all of a
sudden things started moving around, learning bad habits, people
whispering to you, like, “Why you hanging around with those white guys?”
These are kids I grew up with since five years old, the guys I grew up
with saying “why you hanging out with those black guys?” Then I see The
Specials on TV, these white and black guys getting together.’

Tricky appeared at the very moment when the reactionary pantomime of
Britpop – a rock which had whitewashed out contemporary black influences
– was moving towards dominance. The phony face-off between Blur and
Oasis which preoccupied the media was a distraction from the real fault
lines in British music culture at the time. The conflict that really
mattered was between a music which acknowledged and accelerated what was
new in the 90s – technology, cultural pluralism, genre innovations – and
a music which took refuge in a monocultural version of Britishness: a
swaggering white boy rock built almost entirely out of forms that were
established in the 1960s and 1970s. This was a music designed to
reassure anxious white males at a moment when all of the certainties
they had previously counted on – in work, sexual relations, ethnic
identity – were coming under pressure. As we now know, Britpop would win
the struggle. Tricky would slink away to become the herald of a future
for British music that never materialised. (A rapprochement of sorts
between Tricky and Britpop was – thank-fully – missed. Blur’s Damon
Albarn was supposed to guest on the album Tricky recorded under the name
Nearly God – alongside The Specials’ Terry Hall, amongst many others –
but the track that the pair recorded together was removed from the album
before it was released.)

When _Maxinquaye_ was released in 1995, Tricky was immediately anointed
as the voice of a mute, depoliticised generation, the wounded prophet
who absorbed and transmitted a decade’s psychic pollution. The extent of
this adulation can be gauged by the origin of the name Nearly God: a
German journalist had asked him ‘what’s it like to be God? Well, nearly
God?’ Instead of taking up his assigned role as the imp of the perverse
in 90s mainstream pop, though, Tricky sidled off into the sidelines, a
half-forgotten figure. So much so, that when he appeared as a guest at
Beyoncé’s 2011 Glastonbury performance, it provoked a gasp of shock – as
if, for a moment, we’d stumbled into some alternative reality where
Tricky was where he deserved to be, a glamorous gargoyle on the edifice
of 21st century pop. All-too-symbolically, however, Tricky’s microphone
didn’t seem to be switched on, and he could barely be heard.

‘On _Maxinquaye,’_ Ian Penman wrote in his landmark March 1995 essay for
_The Wire_ magazine, ‘Tricky sounds like ghosts from another solar
system’. The spectrality of Tricky’s music, the way it refused to _step
up_ or _represent_, the way it slurred between lucidity and
inarticulacy, made for a sharp contrast with the multicoloured brashness
of what Penman called ‘the _Face-_ cover/Talkin Loud/Jazzie B nexus of
groovy One World vibery’. What’s so significant about the version of
multiculturalism that Tricky and Goldie proffered was its refusal of
earnestness and worthiness. Theirs was not a music that petitioned for
inclusion in any kind of ordinariness. Instead, it revelled in its
_otherworld-_ liness, its science-fictional glamour. Like art pop’s
first pioneer, Bowie, it was about identification with the alien, where
the alien stood in for the technologically new and the cognitively
strange – and ultimately for forms of social relations that were as yet
only faintly imaginable. Bowie was by no means the first to make this
identification: loving the alien was a gesture that self-mytholo-gizing
black magi – Kodwo Eshun’s ‘sonic fictional’ canon of Lee Perry, George
Clinton, Sun Ra – had made long before Bowie first did it. Identifying
with the alien – not so much speaking for the alien as letting the alien
speak through you – was what gave 20th century popular music much of its
political charge. Identification with the alien meant the possibility of
an escape from identity, into other subjectivities, other worlds.

There was also identification with the android. ‘Aftermath’ includes a
sample of dialogue from _Blade Runner:_ ‘I’ll tell you about my mother’,
the anti-Oedipal taunt that the replicant Leon throws at his
interrogator-tormentor before killing him. ‘Is it merely coincidence
that the Sylvian quote and the _Blade Runner_ lift converge in the same
song?’, Penman asks.

‘Ghosts’…Replicants? Electricity has made us all angels. Technology
(from psycho-analysis to surveillance) has made us all ghosts. The
replicant (‘YOUR EYES RESEMBLE MINE…‘) is a speaking void. The scary
thing about ‘Aftermath’ is that it suggests that nowadays WE ALL ARE.
Speaking voids, made up only of scraps and citations… contaminated by
other people’s memories…adrift…

When I met Tricky in 2008, he referred unbidden to the line from
‘Aftermath’ that Penman picks up on here. ’My first lyric ever on a song
was ‘your eyes resemble mine, you’ll see as no others can’. I never had
any kids then, so what am I talking about? Who am I talking about? [My
daughter] Maisie wasn’t born. My mother used to write poetry but in her
time she couldn’t have done anything with that, there wasn’t any
opportunity. It’s almost like she killed herself to give me the
opportunity, my lyrics, I can never understand why I write as a female;
I think I’ve got my Mum’s talent, I’m her vehicle. So I need a woman to
sing that.’

Hauntology, then, telepathy, the persistence of the _no longer_…You
don’t have to believe in the supernatural to recognise that the family
is a haunted structure, an Overlook Hotel full of presentiments and
uncanny repetitions, something that speaks ahead of us, instead of
us…From the start – like all of us – Tricky was haunted, and the
crepitational-texture of 21st century hauntology was already being
auditioned on Tricky’s earliest recordings. When I first heard _Burial_
a decade later, I would immediately reach for Tricky’s first album
_Maxinquaye_ as a point of comparison. It wasn’t only the use of vinyl
crackle, so much a signature of both _Maxinquaye_ and _Burial_, that
suggested the affinity. It was also the prevailing mood, the way
suffocating sadness and mumbling melancholy bled into lovelorn eroticism
and dreamspeech. Both records feel like emotional states transformed
into landscapes, but where Burial’s music conjures urban scenes under
_Blade Runner_ perma-drizzle, _Maxinquaye_ feels as if it is taking
place in a desert as delirial and Daliesque as the initiatory space that
the characters pass through in Nic Roeg’s _Walkabout:_ the land is
scorched, cracked and barren, but there are occasional bursts of verdant
lushness (on the queasily erotic ‘Abbaon Fat Tracks’, for instance, we
could have strayed into the ruined pastoral of Talk Talk’s _Spirit of
Eden)_.

‘Your eyes resemble mine…’ From the very beginning, speaking in his dead
mother’s voice, a semi-benign Norman Bates, Tricky was conscious of his
(dis)possession by female spectres. With his predilection for cosmetics
and cross-dressing, he looked like one of the last vestiges of the glam
impulse in British pop: his gender ambivalence a welcome antidote to
Britpop’s lumpen laddishness. It’s clear that gender indeterminacy is no
pantomime mummery for him, but something that goes right to the core of
his music. Saying that Tricky ‘writes from a female point of view’ fails
to capture the uncanniness of what he does, since he also induces women
to sing from what seems to be a male perspective. ‘I like putting women
in a male role, to have the woman play the strength and the man be the
weak. I was brought up, one of my uncles was in jail for 30 years and
the other for 15 years. I didn’t see my dad, I was brought up by my
grandmother and my auntie so I’ve seen my grandmother fight in the
street. I’ve seen my auntie and my grandmother have fistfights, I’ve
seen my grandmother grab my auntie’s arm and close it in the door and
break her arm fighting over meat. So I see women as tough. They fed me,
they clothed me, my grandmother taught me to steal, my auntie taught me
to fight, she sent me to boxing when I was 15. If men go to war, you
stand in one field, I stand in another, we shoot each other, but what’s
the hardest is when you are at home and you gotta listen to kids cry and
you gotta feed ‘em. That’s tough, I’ve seen no men around, I’ve seen my
uncle go jail for seven years, then ten years, my other uncle; my Dad
never rang. Women keep it together, keep the food on the table, defend
us, defend the children, like if anyone fucked with us they would be
down the school. I’ve never seen men do that for me, I’ve never seen men
there for me like that. All I know is women.’

Gender doesn’t dissolve here into some bland unisex mush; instead it
resolves into an unstable space in which subjectivity is continually
sliding from male to female voice. It is an art of splitting which is
also an art of doubling. Through the women who sing for/as him, Tricky
becomes less than one, a split subject that can never be restored to
wholeness. Yet their voicing of his incompleteness also makes him more
than one, a double in search of a lost other half it will never recover.
Either way, what Tricky unsettles – both as a vocalist and as a writer/
producer who coaxes singing from an Other – is the idea of the voice as
a rock solid guarantor of presence and identity. His own weakened,
recessed voice, all those croaks, mumbles and murmurs, has always
suggested a presence that was barely there, something supplementary
rather than centred. But the main – usually female – voice on his songs
also sounds absented and abstracted. What the voices of his female
singers – flat, drained, destitute of ordinary affective cadences – most
resemble is the sound of a medium, a voice being spoken by something
else.

‘So this is the aftermath…’ It is not that Tricky possesses female
singers; more that he induces them into sharing his trance states. The
words that come to him from a lost female source are returned to a
female mouth. ‘I’m already on the other side’, as Martina Topley-Bird
sang on ‘I Be The Prophet’ from the Nearly God LP. Tricky’s upbringing
was particularly gothic. ‘My grandmother used to keep me at home because
my stepgrandfather used to be out working, and she used to watch all
these black and white horror movies, vampire movies, and it was like
growing up in a movie. She used to sit me in the middle of the floor,
cause she lost my mum, her daughter. She’d be playing Billie Holiday,
smoking a cigarette and would say things like “you look like your Mum,”
watching me. I was always my Mum’s ghost. I grew up in a dreamlike
state. One time I’ve seen a suicide off an NCP car park and the police
took me down to see what I saw and the next day in the Evening Post
there was my name in there. I woke up and it was on the fridge, my
grandmother had put it on the fridge like I was famous.’

The one who is possessed is also dispossessed – of their own identity
and voice. But this kind of dispossession is of course a precondition
for the most potent writing and performance. Writers have to tune into
other voices; performers must be capable of being taken over by outside
forces – and Tricky can be a great live performer because of his
capacity to work himself up into a state of head-shaking shamanic
self-erasure. Like the occult, religion provides a symbolic repertoire
which deals with the idea of an alien presence using the tongue, of the
dead having influence on the living, and Tricky’s language has always
been saturated with biblical imagery. _Maxinquaye’s_ purgatorial
landscape was littered with religious signs, while _Pre-Millennium
Tension_ exhibited what seemed like religious mania: ‘I saw a Christian
in Christiansands, a devil in Helsinki.’ ‘Here come the Nazarene/look
good in a magazine…Mary Magdalene that’ll be my first sin.’

When I interviewed Tricky he had just released the single, ‘Council
Estate’. Here, class spectres spoke – but not for the first time in
Tricky’s work. Class rage could be detected smouldering in many of his
tracks from the beginning. ‘Master your language/and until then, I’ll
create my own,’ he warned on 1996’s ‘Christiansands’, casting himself as
the proletarian Caliban plotting revenge on his alleged betters. He is
acutely aware of the way in which class determines destiny. ‘Breaking
into a house or car equals locksmiths, insurance, it’s all making money
off me. The longer I’m in prison you’re making more money. Modern-day
slavery: instead of slaves, they turn them into criminals.’

Tricky called the album from which ‘Council Estate’ came _Knowle West_,
after the area of Bristol in which he grew up. ‘When I was at school,
there was one certain teacher who said, when you go for a job, as soon
as you put your postcode down and they know you’re from Knowle West, you
ain’t gonna get the job. So lie, if you’re going to fill in your
application forms, lie.’

‘Council Estate’ conceived of resentment as a motivating force and
success as revenge. It wasn’t about leaving your past behind, as Sylvian
wanted to, it is about succeeding so that your class origins can be
forced back down the throat of those who said you couldn’t succeed. Like
so many working class pop stars before him – including Sylvian – success
provided vindication for Tricky and gave him access to a world which
both attracted and appalled him. 1996’s ‘Tricky Kid’ was his take on the
theme of class dislocation that has preoccupied British pop since at
least as far back as The Kinks. It was the best song about a working
class male projected out of their milieu into the pleasure gardens of
the hyper–successful since The Associates’ ‘Club Country’ (‘A drive from
nowhere leaves you in the cold…every breath you breathe belongs to
someone there’). With its febrile, _Jacob’s Ladder–like_ vision of
leering hedonism – ‘coke in your nose…everyone wants to be naked and
famous’ – ‘Tricky Kid’ anticipated the way in which, in the first decade
of the 21st century, working class ambitions would be bought off by the
fool’s gold of celebrity culture and reality TV. ‘Now they call me
superstar…,’ it demonically proclaimed, a line echoed in the refrain of
‘Council Estate’. Why is ‘superstar’ such an important word for him?
‘Because it’s such a stupid word in a way. What used to happen is that
you make an album, and if your album’s successful, fame is almost part
of the game. When I was starting off, I just wanted to make a good
album, I wanted to make something that no one’s ever heard before – I
wasn’t interested in anything else.’



01: THE RETURN OF THE 70S


[]



NO LONGER THE PLEASURES: JOY DIVISION


_Adapted from k–punk post, January 9, 2005_

If Joy Division matter now more than ever, it’s because they capture the
depressed spirit of _our_ times. Listen to JD now, and you have the
inescapable impression that the group were cataton-ically channelling
our present, their future. From the start their work was overshadowed by
a deep foreboding, a sense of a future foreclosed, all certainties
dissolved, only growing gloom ahead. It has become increasingly clear
that 1979-80, the years with which the group will always be identified,
was a threshold moment – the time when a whole world (social democratic,
Fordist, industrial) became obsolete, and the contours of a new world
(neoliberal, consumerist, informatic) began to show themselves. This is
of course a retrospective judgement; breaks are rarely experienced as
such at the time. But the 70s exert a particular fascination now that we
are locked into the new world – a world that Deleuze, using a word that
would become associated with Joy Division, called the ‘Society of
Control’. The 70s is the time before the switch, a time at once kinder
and harsher than now. Forms of (social) security then taken for granted
have long since been destroyed, but vicious prejudices that were then
freely aired have become unacceptable. The conditions that allowed a
group like Joy Division to exist have evapo-rated; but so has a certain
grey, grim texture of everyday life in Britain, a country that seemed to
have given up rationing only reluctantly.

By the early 2000s, the 70s was long enough ago to have become a period
setting for drama, and Joy Division were part of the scenery. This was
how they featured in Michael Winterbottom’s _24 Hour Party People_
(2002). The group were little more than a cameo here, the first chapter
in the story of Factory records and its buffoon-genius impresario Tony
Wilson. Joy Division assumed centre stage in Anton Corbijn’s _Control_
(2007), but the film didn’t really connect. For those who knew the
story, it was a familiar trip; for those not already initiated, however,
the film didn’t do enough to convey the group’s sorcerous power. We were
taken through the story, but never drawn into the maelstrom, never made
to feel why any of it mattered. Perhaps this was inevitable. Rock
depends crucially on a particular body and a particular voice and the
mysterious relationship between the two. _Control_ could never make good
the loss of Ian Curtis’s voice and body, and so ended up as arthouse
karaoke naturalism; the actors could simulate the chords, could ape
Curtis’s moves, but they couldn’t forge the vortical charisma, couldn’t
muster the unwitting necromantic art that transformed the simple musical
structures into a ferocious expressionism, a portal to the outside. For
that you need the footage of the group performing, the sound of the
records. Which is why, of the three films featuring the group, Grant
Gee’s 2007 documentary, _Joy Division_, patched together from super-8
fragments, TV appearances, new interviews and old images of postwar
Manchester, was most effective at transporting us back to those
disappeared times. Gee’s film begins with an epigraph from Marshall
Berman’s _All That Is Solid_ _Melts Into Air: The Experience Of
Modernity:_ ‘To be modern is to find ourselves in an environment that
promises us adventure, power, joy, growth, transformation of ourselves
and the world – and, at the same time that threatens to destroy
everything we have, everything we know, everything we are.’ Where
_Control_ tried to conjure the presence of the group, but left us only
with a tracing, an outline, _Joy Division_ is organised around a vivid
sense of loss. It is selfconsciously a study of a time and a place, both
of which are now gone. _Joy Division_ is a roll call of disappeared
places and people – so many dead, already: not only Curtis, but also the
group’s manager Rob Gretton, their producer Martin Hannett and of course
Tony Wilson. The film’s coup, its most electric moment, the sound of a
dead man wandering in the land of the dead: a scratchy old cassette
recording of Ian Curtis being hypnotised into ‘a past life regression’.
_I travelled far and wide through many different times_. A slow, slurred
voice channelling something cold and remote. ‘How old are you?’ ‘28’, an
exchange made all the more chilling because we know that Curtis would
die at the age of 23.

_Asylums with doors open wide_

I didn’t hear Joy Division until 1982, so, for me, Curtis was
always-already dead. When I first heard them, aged 14, it was like that
moment in John Carpenter’s _In the Mouth of Madness_ when Sutter Cane
forces John Trent to read the novel, the hyper-fiction, in which he is
already immersed: my whole future life, intensely compacted into those
sound images – Ballard, Burroughs, dub, disco, Gothic, antidepressants,
psych wards, overdoses, slashed wrists. Way too much stim to even begin
to assimilate. Even they didn’t understand what they were doing. How on
earth could I, then?

New Order, more than anyone else, were in flight from the mausoleum
edifice of Joy Division, and they had finally achieved severance by
1990. The England world cup song, cavorting around with beery, leery
Keith Allen, a man who more than any other personifies the quotidian
masculinism of overground Brit bloke culture in the late 80s and 90s,
was a consummate act of desublimation. This, in the end, was what Kodwo
Eshun called the ‘price of escaping the anxiety of influence (the
influence of themselves)’. On _Movement_ the group were still in
post-traumatic stress, frozen into a barely communicative trance (‘The
noise that surrounds me/ so loud in my head…’)

It was clear, in the best interviews the band ever gave – to Jon Savage,
a decade and a half after Curtis’s death – that they had no idea what
they were doing, and no desire to learn. Of Curtis’
disturbing-compelling hyper-charged stage trance spasms and of his
disturbing-compelling catatonic downer words, they said nothing and
asked nothing, for fear of destroying the magic. They were unwitting
necromancers who had stumbled on a formula for channelling voices,
apprentices without a sorcerer. They saw themselves as mindless golems
animated by Curtis’ vision(s). (Thus, when he died, they said that they
felt they had lost their eyes…)

Above all – and even if only because of audience reception – they were
more than a pop group, more than entertainment, that much is obvious. We
know all the words as if we wrote them ourselves, we followed stray
hints in the lyrics out to all sorts of darker chambers, and listening
to the albums now is like putting on a comfortable and familiar set of
clothes…. But who is this ‘we’? Well, it might have been the last ‘we’
that a whole generation of not-quite-men could feel a part of. There was
an odd universality available to Joy Division’s devotees (provided you
were male of course).

_Provided you were male of course…_ The Joy Division religion was,
self-consciously, a boys’ thing. Deborah Curtis: ‘Whether it was
intentional or not, the wives and girlfriends had gradually been
banished from all but the most local of gigs and a curious male bonding
had taken place. The boys seemed to derive their fun from each other.’
(Deborah Curtis, _Touching from a Distance_, 77) No girls allowed…

As Curtis’s wife, Deborah was barred from rock’s pleasure garden, and
could not pass into the cult of death that lay beyond the pleasure
principle. She was just left to clear up the mess.

If Joy Division were very much a boys’ group, their signature song,
‘She’s Lost Control’ saw Ian Curtis abjecting his own disease, the ‘holy
sickness’ of epilepsy, onto a female Other. Freud includes epileptic
fits – along, incidentally, with a body in the grip of sexual passion –
as examples of the _unheimlich_, the unhomely, the strangely familiar.
Here the organic is slaved to the mechanical rhythms of the inorganic;
the inanimate calls the tune, as it always does with Joy Division.
‘She’s Lost Control’ is one of rock’s most explicit encounters with the
mineral lure of the inanimate. Joy Division’s icy-spined undeath disco
sounds like it has been recorded inside the damaged synaptic pathways of
a brain of someone undergoing a seizure, Curtis’ sepulchral, anhedonic
vocals sent back to him – as if they were the voice of an Other, or
Others – in long, leering expressionistic echoes that linger like acrid
acid fog. ‘She’s Lost Control’ traverses Poe-like cataleptic black holes
in subjectivity, takes flatline voyages into the land of the dead and
back to confront the ‘edge of no escape’, seeing in seizures little
deaths (petil mals as petit morts) which offer terrifying but
exhilarating releases from identity, more powerful than any orgasm.

In this colony

Try to imagine England in 1979 now…

Pre-VCR, pre-PC, pre-C4. Telephones far from ubiquitous (we didn’t have
one till around 1980, I think). The postwar consensus disintegrating on
black and white TV.

More than anyone else, Joy Division turned this dourness into a uniform
that self-consciously signified absolute authenticity; the deliberately
functional formality of their clothes seceding from punk’s tribalised
anti-Glamour, ‘depressives dressing for the Depression’ (Deborah
Curtis). It wasn’t for nothing that they were called Warsaw when they
started out. But it was in this Eastern bloc of the mind, in this slough
of despond, that you could find working class kids who wrote songs
steeped in Dostoyevsky, Conrad, Kafka, Burroughs, Ballard, kids who,
without even thinking about it, were rigorous modernists who would have
disdained repeating themselves, never mind disinterring and aping what
had been done 20, 30 years ago (the 60s was a fading Pathe newsreel in
1979).

Back in ‘79, Art Rock still had a relationship to the sonic
experimentation of the Black Atlantic. Unthinkable now, but White Pop
then was no stranger to the cutting edge, so a genuine trade was
possible. Joy Division provided the Black Atlantic with some sonic
fictions it could re-deploy – listen to Grace Jones’s extraordinary
cover of ‘She’s Lost Control’, or Sleazy D’s ‘I’ve Lost Control’, or
even to Kanye West’s _808s and Heartbreak_ (with its sleeve references
to Saville’s ‘Blue Monday’ cover design, and its echoes of _Atmosphere_
and ‘In A Lonely Place’). For all that, Joy Division’s relationship to
black pop was much more occluded than that of some of their peers.
Postpunk’s break from lumpen punk R and R consisted in large part in an
ostentatiously flagged return-reclaiming of Black Pop: funk and dub
especially. There was none of that, on the surface at least, with Joy
Division.

But a group like PiL’s take on dub, now, sounds a little laborious, a
little literal, whereas, Joy Division, like The Fall, came off as a
white anglo _equivalent_ of dub. Both Joy Division and The Fall were
‘black’ in the priorities and economies of their sound: bass-heavy and
rhythm-driven. This was dub not as a form, but a methodology, a
legitimation for conceiving of sound-production as abstract engineering.
But Joy Division also had a relationship to another super-synthetic,
artily artificial ‘black’ sound: disco. Again, it was they, better than
PiL, who delivered the ‘Death Disco’ beat. As Jon Savage loves to point
out, the swarming syn-drums on ‘Insight’ seem to be borrowed from disco
records like Amy Stewart’s ‘Knock on Wood’.

The role in all this of Martin Hannett, a producer who needs to be
counted with the very greatest in pop, cannot be underestimated. It is
Hannett, alongside Peter Saville, the group’s sleeve designer, who
ensured that Joy Division were more Art than Rock. The damp mist of
insinuating uneasy listening Sound FX with which Hannett cloaked the
mix, together with Saville’s depersonalising designs, meant that the
group could be approached, not as an aggregation of individual
expressive subjects, but as a conceptual consistency. It was Hannett and
Saville who transmuted the stroppy neuromantics of Warsaw into
cyberpunks.

Day in/ Day out

Joy Division connected not just because of what they were, but when they
were. Mrs Thatcher just arrived, the long grey winter of Reagonomics on
the way, the Cold War still feeding our unconscious with a lifetime’s
worth of retina-melting nightmares.

JD were the sound of British culture’s speed comedown, a long slow
screaming neural shutdown. Since 1956, when Eden took amphetamines
throughout the Suez crisis, through the Pop of the 60s, which had been
kicked off by the Beatles going through the wall on uppers in Hamburg,
through punk, which consumed speed like there was no tomorrow, Britain
had been, in every sense, speeding. Speed is a connectivity drug, a drug
that made sense of a world in which electronic connections were madly
proliferating. But the comedown is vicious.

Massive serotonin depletion.

Energy crash.

Turn on your TV.

Turn down your pulse.

Turn away from it all.

It’s all getting

Too much

Melancholia was Curtis’ art form, just as psychosis was Mark E Smith’s.
Nothing could have been more fitting than that _Unknown Pleasures_ began
with a track called ‘Disorder’, for the key to Joy Division was the
Ballardian spinal landscape, the connexus linking individual
psychopathology with social anomie. The two meanings of breakdown, the
two meanings of Depression. That was how Sumner saw it, anyhow. As he
explained to Savage, ‘There was a huge sense of community where we
lived. I remember the summer holidays when I was a kid: we would stay up
late and play in the street, and 12 o’clock at night there would be old
ladies, talking to each other. I guess what happened in the ‘60s was
that the council decided that it wasn’t very healthy, and something had
to go, and unfortunately it was my neighbourhood that went. We were
moved over the river to a towerblock. At the time I thought it was
fantastic; now of course I realise it was an absolute disaster. I’d had
a number of other breaks in my life. So when people say about the
darkness in Joy Division’s music, by age of 22, I’d had quite a lot of
loss in my life. The place where I used to live, where I had my happiest
memories, all of that had gone. All that was left was a chemical
factory. I realised then that I could never go back to that happiness.
So there’s this void.’

Dead end lives at the end of the 70s. There were Joy Division, Curtis
doing what most working class men still did, early marriage and a kid…

_Feel it closing in_

Sumner again: ‘When I left school and got a job, real life came as a
terrible shock. My first job was at Salford town hall sticking down
envelopes, sending rates out. I was chained in this horrible office:
every day, every week, every year, with maybe three weeks holiday a
year. The horror enveloped me. So the music of Joy Division was about
the death of optimism, of youth.’

A requiem for doomed youth culture. ‘Here are the young men/ the weight
on their shoulders,’ went the famous lines from ‘Decades’, on _Closer_.
The titles ‘New Dawn Fades’ and _Unknown Pleasures_ could themselves be
referring to the betrayed promises of youth culture. Yet what is
remarkable about Joy Division is their total acquiescence in this
failure, the way in which, from the start, they set up an Antarctic camp
beyond the pleasure principle.

Set the controls for the heart of the black sun

What impressed and perturbed about JD was the fixatedness of their
negativity. Unremitting wasn’t the word. Yes, Lou Reed and Iggy and
Morrison and Jagger had dabbled in nihilism – but even with Iggy and
Reed that had been ameliorated by the odd moment of exhilaration, or at
least there had been some explanation for their misery (sexual
frustration, drugs). What separated Joy Division from any of their
predecessors, even the bleakest, was the lack of any apparent
object-cause for their melancholia. (That’s what made it melancholia
rather than melancholy, which has always been an acceptable, subtly
sublime, delectation for men to relish.) From its very beginnings,
(Robert Johnson, Sinatra) 20th-century Pop has been more to do with male
(and female) sadness than elation. Yet, in the case of both the bluesman
and the crooner, there is, at least ostensibly, a reason for the sorrow.
Because Joy Division’s bleakness was without any specific cause, they
crossed the line from the blue of sadness into the black of depression,
passing into the ‘desert and wastelands’ where nothing brings either joy
or sorrow. Zero affect.

No heat in Joy Division’s loins. They surveyed ‘the troubles and the
evils of this world’ with the uncanny detachment of the neurasthenic.
Curtis sang ‘I’ve lost the will to want more’ on ‘Insight’ but there was
no sense that there had been any such will in the first place. Give
their earliest songs a casual listen and you could easily mistake their
tone for the curled lip of spiky punk outrage, but, already, it is as if
Curtis is not railing against injustice or corruption so much as
marshalling them as evidence for a thesis that was, even then, firmly
established in his mind. Depression is, after all and above all, a
theory about the world, about life. The stupidity and venality of
politicians (‘Leaders of Men’), the idiocy and cruelty of war (‘Walked
in Line’) are pointed to as exhibits in a case against the world,
against life, that is so overwhelming, so general, that to appeal to any
particular instance seems superfluous. In any case, Curtis expects no
more of himself than he does of others, he knows he cannot condemn from
a moral high ground: he ‘let them use you/ for their own ends’
(‘Shadowplay’), he’ll let you take his place in a showdown (‘Heart and
Soul’).

That is why Joy Division can be a very dangerous drug for young men.
They seem to be presenting The Truth (they present themselves as doing
so). Their subject, after all, is depression. Not sadness or
frustration, rock’s standard downer states, but depression: depression,
whose difference from mere sadness consists in its claim to have
uncovered The (final, unvarnished) Truth about life and desire.

The depressive experiences himself as walled off from the lifeworld, so
that his own frozen inner life – or inner death – overwhelms everything;
at the same time, he experiences himself as evacuated, totally denuded,
a shell: there is nothing except the inside, but the inside is empty.
For the depressive, the habits of the former lifeworld now seem to be,
precisely, a mode of playacting, a series of pantomime gestures (‘a
circus complete with all fools’), which they are both no longer capable
of performing and which they no longer wish to perform – there’s no
point, everything is a sham.

Depression is not sadness, not even a state of mind, it is a
(neuro)philosophical (dis)position. Beyond Pop’s bipolar oscillation
between evanescent thrill and frustrated hedonism, beyond Jagger’s
Miltonian Mephistopheleanism, beyond Iggy’s negated carny, beyond Roxy’s
lounge lizard reptilian melancholy, beyond the pleasure principle
altogether, Joy Division were the most Schopenhauerian of rock groups,
so much so that they barely belonged to rock at all. Since they had so
thoroughly stripped out rock’s libidinal motor – it would be better to
say that they were, libidinally as well as sonically, anti-rock. Or
perhaps, as they thought, they were the truth of rock, rock divested of
all illusions. (The depressive is always confident of one thing: that he
is without illusions.) What makes Joy Division so Schopenhauerian is the
disjunction between Curtis’s detachment and the urgency of the music,
its implacable drive standing in for the dumb insatiability of the
life-Will, the Beckettian ‘I must go on’ not experienced by the
depressive as some redemptive positivity, but as the ultimate horror,
the life-Will paradoxically assuming all the loathsome properties of the
undead (whatever you do, you can’t extinguish it, it keeps coming back).

Accept like a curse an unlucky deal

JD followed Schopenhauer through the curtain of Maya, went outside
Burroughs’ Garden of Delights, and dared to examine the hideous
machineries that produce the world-as-appearance. What did they see
there? Only what all depressives, all mystics, always see: the obscene
undead twitching of the Will as it seeks to maintain the illusion that
this object, the one it is fixated upon NOW, this one, will satisfy it
in a way that all other objects thus far have failed to. Joy Division,
with an ancient wisdom (‘Ian sounded old, as if he had lived a lifetime
in his youth’ – Deborah Curtis), a wisdom that seems pre–mammalian,
pre-multicellular life, pre-organic, saw through all those reproducer
ruses. This is the ‘Insight’ that stopped fear in Curtis, the calming
despair that subdued any will to want more. JD saw life as the Poe of
‘The Conqueror Worm’ had seen it, as Ligotti sees it: an automated
marionette dance, which ‘Through a circle that ever returneth in/ To the
self-same spot’, an ultra-determined chain of events that goes through
its motions with remorseless inevitability. You watch the pre-scripted
film as if from outside, condemned to watch the reels as they come to a
close, brutally taking their time.

A student of mine once wrote in an essay that they sympathise with
Schopenhauer when their football team loses. But the true
Schopenhauerian moments are those in which you achieve your goals,
perhaps realise your long-cherished heart’s desire – and feel cheated,
empty, no, more – or is it less? – than empty, voided. Joy Division
always sounded as if they had experienced one too many of those
desolating voidings, so that they could no longer be lured back onto the
merry-go-round. They knew that satiation wasn’t succeeded by tristesse,
it was itself, immediately, tristesse. Satiation is the point at which
you must face the existential revelation that you didn’t want really
want what you seemed so desperate to have, that your most urgent desires
are only a filthy vitalist trick to keep the show on the road. If you
‘can’t replace the fear or the thrill of the chase’, why stir yourself
to pursue yet another empty kill? Why carry on with the charade?

Depressive ontology is dangerously seductive because, as the zombie twin
of a certain philosophical wisdom, it is half true. As the depressive
withdraws from the vacant confections of the lifeworld, he unwittingly
finds himself in concordance with the human condition so painstakingly
diagrammed by a philosopher like Spinoza: he sees himself as a serial
consumer of empty simulations, a junky hooked on every kind of deadening
high, a meat puppet of the passions. The depressive cannot even lay
claim to the comforts that a paranoiac can enjoy, since he cannot
believe that the strings are being pulled by any one. No flow, no
connectivity in the depressive’s nervous system. ‘Watch from the wings
as the scenes were replaying’, go the fatalistic lines in ‘Decades’, and
Curtis wrote with a depressive’s iron certainty about life as some
pre-scripted film. His voice – from the very start terrifying in its
fatalism, in its acceptance of the worst – sounds like the voice of man
who is already dead, or who has entered an appalling state of suspended
animation, death-within-life. It sounds preternaturally ancient, a voice
that cannot be sourced back to any living being, still less to a young
man barely in his twenties.

A loaded gun won’t set you free – so you say

‘A loaded gun won’t set you free,’ Curtis sang on ‘New Dawn Fades’ from
_Unknown Pleasures_, but he didn’t sound convinced. ‘After pondering
over the words to ‘New Dawn Fades’,’ Deborah Curtis wrote, ‘I broached
the subject with Ian, trying to make him confirm that they were only
lyrics and bore no resemblance to his true feelings. It was a one-sided
conversation. He refused to confirm or deny any of the points raised and
he walked out of the house. I was left questioning myself instead, but
did not feel close enough to anyone else to voice my fears. Would he
really have married me knowing that he still intended to kill himself in
his early twenties? Why father a child when you have no intention of
being there to see it grow up? Had I been so oblivious to his
unhappiness that he had been forced to write about it?’ _(Touching from
a Distance: Ian Curtis and Joy Division_, Faber&Faber, 1995, p85) The
male lust for death had always been a subtext in rock, but before Joy
Division it had been smuggled into rock under libidinous pretexts, a
black dog in wolf’s clothing – Thanatos cloaked as Eros – or else it had
worn pantomime panstick. Suicide was a guarantee of authenticity, the
most convincing of signs that you were 4 Real. Suicide has the power to
transfigure life, with all its quotidian mess, its conflicts, its
ambivalences, its disappointments, its unfinished business, its ‘waste
and fever and heat’ – into a cold myth, as solid, seamless and permanent
as the ‘marble and stone’ that Peter Saville would simulate on the
record sleeves and Curtis would caress in the lyrics to ‘In a Lonely
Place’. (‘In a Lonely Place’ was Curtis’ song, but it was recorded by a
New Order in a zombie state of post-traumatic disorder after Curtis’
death. It sounds like Curtis is an interloper at his own funeral,
mourning his own death: ‘how I wish you were here with me now’.)

The great debates over Joy Division – were they fallen angels or
ordinary blokes? Were they Fascists? Was Curtis’ suicide inevitable or
preventable? – all turn on the relationship between Art and Life. We
should resist the temptation to be Lorelei-lured by either the
Aesthete-Romantics (in other words, us, as we were) or the lumpen
empiricists. The Aesthetes want the world promised by the sleeves and
the sound, a pristine black and white realm unsullied by the grubby
compromises and embarrassments of the everyday. The empiricists insist
on just the opposite: on rooting the songs back in the quotidian at its
least elevated and, most importantly, at its least serious. ‘Ian was a
laugh, the band were young lads who liked to get pissed, it was all a
bit of fun that got out of hand…’ It’s important to hold onto both of
these Joy Divisions – the Joy Division of Pure Art, and the Joy Division
who were ‘just a laff’ – at once. For if the truth of Joy Division is
that they were Lads, then Joy Division must also be the truth of
Laddism. And so it would appear: beneath all the red-nosed
downer-fuelled jollity of the past two decades, mental illness has
increased some 70% amongst adolescents. Suicide remains one of the most
common sources of death for young males.

‘I crept into my parents’ house without waking anyone and was asleep
within seconds of my head touching the pillow. The next sound I heard
was “This is the end, beautiful friend. This is the end, my only friend,
the end. I’ll never look into your eyes again…” Surprised at hearing the
Doors’ ‘The End’, I struggled to rouse myself. Even as I slept I knew it
was an unlikely song for Radio One on a Sunday morning. But there was no
radio – it was all a dream.’ _(Touching From a Distance_, p132)



SMILEY’S GAME: _TINKER, TAILOR, SOLDIER, SPY_


_Film Quarterly, Vol. 65, No. 2, (2011)_

What is the allure of George Smiley? Why does Smiley beguile even
left-wing viewers who, on the face of it, might be expected to see him
as at one point in John le Carré’s 1974 novel he describes himself: ‘the
very archetype of a flabby Western liberal’? The enigma of Smiley’s
appeal is one of many spectres that haunts Tomas Alfredson’s movie
adaptation of _Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy_. The ghost that most
insistently refuses to be exorcised is the 1979 BBC TV version, rightly
remembered as one of the greatest ever British television series.
Re-adapting a novel after so accomplished a version is risky, especially
when you have a mere two hours to play with, as opposed to the series’
more unhurried five.

Pace – and pacing, as in moving around restively while waiting – were
central to the coiling tension of the TV series, which caught the
crab-like convolutions and slowly interlocking rhythms of le Carré’s
narrative exceptionally well. The limitations of television production
actually benefited the sense of expansiveness. Sets and action were
minimal; the drama was often about faces, and about Alec Guinness’s face
in particular, which could suggest a lifetime of regret with the
slightest wince. Guinness’s performance was a masterclass in concision
and nuance – not words one would always associate with Gary Oldman, cast
(emphatically against type) as Smiley in the new _Tinker Tailor_.

When a novel creates as rich a mythworld as le Carré’s does, no single
adaptation will ever completely exhaust it. There is always the
possibility of uncovering hitherto underexplored angles and for those of
us who are fans of the novel, a strong new version would have had the
benefit of liberating the book (and Smiley) from the Guinness portrayal
– a prospect that might explain some of le Carré’s enthusiasm for the
film. Le Carré has said he felt that Guinness took Smiley from him,
making him unable to write the character anymore. When it was announced
that this was Alfredson’s next directing project after the success of
_Let the Right One In_ (2008), hopes for something special were
justifiably high. His brilliant reworking of vampire fiction had a sense
of melancholy, violent lives lived in secret that could have carried
over most effectively to the closed-world intrigues of British spying.
It is thus all the more disappointing that this new _Tinker Tailor_
fails to compellingly reimagine the story, and central to its failure is
the film’s inability to make Smiley alluring.

In the novel le Carré reckoned with the sensational exposures that had
both traumatised and titillated British society in the 1960s when Soviet
double agents Guy Burgess, Donald Maclean, and Kim Philby were revealed
to be operating right at the heart of the intelligence establishment.
The book begins when Smiley is called out of retirement to search for a
deep-cover mole – it was in fact le Carré who popularised this term – in
the Secret Intelligence Service (otherwise known as MI6). _Tinker
Tailor_ follows Smiley’s circuitous pursuit and exposure of the traitor,
who is ultimately revealed to be Smiley’s friend and rival Bill Haydon –
one of many men to have affairs with Smiley’s semi-estranged wife, Ann.
The narrative is suffused with what Paul Gilroy has called ‘postcolonial
melancholia’. Smiley, Haydon, and their contemporaries – notably Jim
Prideaux, the former head of the ‘scalphunters’ section, shot in the
bungled operation that ultimately leads to the mole being uncovered, and
Connie Sachs, the head of intelligence, dismissed when she comes
uncomfortably close to the truth – have watched all the expectations
born of imperial privilege slowly disappearing. ‘Trained to Empire,
trained to rule the waves. All gone, all taken away,’ Sachs laments (Pan
Books, 1979, 102).

Postcolonial melancholia is fed more by hostility towards the US than it
is by fear of the Soviets – Haydon and Smiley’s boss, the irascible
Control, are united in their loathing of Americans. When Control is
maneuvered out of his position by the ambitious (and very pro-US) Percy
Alleline, this seems to consolidate the sense of irreversible decline
which hangs over the novel. England’s glory lies in the past; the future
is American. In the novel and its sequels, it is clear that Smiley’s
victory is temporary; his world is on the brink of disappearing.

Smiley brings to mind English archetypes both ancient and modern. What
is the perpetually cuckolded Smiley, returning to save his ailing
kingdom, if not a Cold War King Arthur? Yet this is Arthur done in the
style of T. S. Eliot’s Prufrock, whose famous self-characterization as
‘an attendant lord’ applies all too acutely to le Carré’s character as
well: ‘Deferential, glad to be of use, / Politic, cautious, and
meticulous; / Full of high sentence, but a bit obtuse; / At times,
indeed, almost ridiculous – / Almost, at times, the Fool’ (‘The Love
Song of J. Alfred Prufrock,’ _The Complete Poems and Plays of T. S.
Eliot_, Faber and Faber, 1969, 16).

While in some respects a pathologically self–blinding figure, Smiley
shares some of Prufrock’s self–consciousness; when, in a scene that is
powerfully played out in both the BBC and the film version, Smiley
recalls his one face-to-face encounter with his counterpart, the Soviet
spy chief Karla, he calls himself a ‘fool.’ Crucially, however, he adds
that he would rather be his kind of fool than Karla’s.

When Smiley recounts the meeting with Karla to his younger protégé Peter
Guillam, he reproaches himself for having talked too much on that
memorable occasion in an Indian jail cell. Karla wins the encounter by
never speaking, by transforming himself into the blank screen that
Smiley cannot on this occasion become – which makes it all the easier
for Smiley to fall into the trap of projecting his own anxieties and
preoccupations onto the impassive Karla. In the novel, Smiley affects to
disdain the psychoanalytic language of ‘projection’ but, tellingly, he
cannot resist using these terms to describe himself; appropriately, for
in the normal run of things Smiley’s art consists in cultivating a
particular kind of silence – not the mere absence of chatter, but the
authoritative, probing silence of the psychoanalyst. The face can’t give
anything away, yet at the same time it has to invite confidence. Those
who don’t want to talk must be drawn into confiding. And isn’t that a
large part of Smiley’s appeal to those of us from a more adolescent,
more compulsively loquacious time: his grownup capacity to engender
respect, and to quietly solicit our need for his approval? Speaking
after a London critics’ screening of _Tinker Tailor_ in September,
Oldman said that, by contrast with the Guinness version, no-one would
want to hug his Smiley. Yet the suggestion that we would want to hug
Guinness’s Smiley is absurd. Surely what we find ourselves craving from
Smiley is a word, a gesture, the merest hint of approbation. But it is a
mistake to see the avuncular seductions of Guinness’s performance as if
they were in opposition to the ruthlessness which Oldman emphasises in
his rendition of Smiley, for Smiley’s merciless, unblinking hunting down
of his prey depends upon this very capacity to draw people out.

Oldman’s reading of Smiley’s blankness is far less sophisticated than
Guinness’s. Le Carré’s Smiley is famously corpulent; Oldman’s is
angular, stiff, dyspeptic. We can’t imagine ever wanting to confide in
him. Oldman’s Smiley is simply an inexpressive mask: forbidding,
impassive, unyielding. It is as if Oldman is giving us his shallow
reading of his grandparents’ generation: aloof, distanced, bottled-up.
They kept it all inside; they didn’t know how to have a good time. For
Oldman, Smiley’s restraint plays as repression and a certain malicious
self-satis-faction – his silence is a simple lack of demonstrativeness,
or a merely inverted demonstrativeness.

Speaking on BBC Radio 4’s _Today_, le Carré himself identified Oldman’s
performance of repression as one of the highlights of this new version.
‘You couldn’t really imagine Alec [Guinness] having a sex life,’ he
said. ‘You couldn’t imagine a kiss on the screen with Alec, not one that
you believed in. Whereas Oldman has quite obviously a male sexuality
that he represses, like all his other feelings, in this story. Oldman is
a Smiley waiting patiently to explode. I think the air of frustration,
of solitude that he is able to convey is something that really does take
me back to a novel I wrote 37 years ago.’ Sadly, this remark suggests
less a new way of seeing Smiley than a certain coarsening of
understanding brought about, no doubt, by the dissemination of a
therapeutic wisdom which insists that the truth of a character is to be
found in their (narrowly defined) sexuality.

To say that Smiley is waiting patiently to explode is a very curious
take on a character defined rather by a _lack_ of heat. When Oldman
shouts at Haydon ‘what are you then, Bill?’ at the climax of the film,
this is an abandonment of emotional decorum quite out of keeping with
Smiley’s character, for whom the English ruling-class habit of
transposing aggression into the chill of superficially polite discourse
comes as second nature. Anger is one of the emotions that the Smiley of
the novel feels at the moment of Haydon’s exposure, yet it is not the
dominant one: Smiley

saw with painful clarity an ambitious man born to the big canvas,
brought up to rule, divide and conquer, whose vision and vanities all
were fixed, like Percy’s, upon the world’s game; for whom the reality
was a poor island with scarcely a voice that would carry across the
water. Thus Smiley felt not only disgust; but, despite all that the
moment meant to him, a surge of resentment against the institutions he
was supposed to be protecting’ (297).

Thus, the tone of triumphalism with which the film ends – Smiley
gloriously restored to his place of honour in MI6 – strikes another
false note.

The Smiley in Alfredson’s film is a figure who is far less _queer_ than
the Smiley of the novel or the television series. Homosexual desire is
widespread in _Tinker Tailor_ – most notably in Prideaux’s betrayed love
for the flamboyantly polysexual Haydon – but there is no suggestion that
Smiley shared these passions. The Smiley of novel and series is queer in
the more radical sense that a ‘normal’ sexuality cannot be assigned to
him. Smiley’s is not a fluid, indeterminate sexuality like, say, that of
Patricia Highsmith’s Tom Ripley. His perversity is renunciation itself.
At the preview, Oldman referred approvingly to le Carré’s comments on
Guinness’s lack of sexuality; but he also characterised Smiley as
masochistic (repeatedly subjecting himself to adulterous humiliations)
and sadistic (the way he pursues his prey goes far beyond professional
duty). Yet the idea that Smiley is sadomasochistic quite clearly
contradicts the idea that he is repressed. For sadomasochism entails
enjoyment, not repression. Far from being repressed, it’s clear that
Smiley is _driven_ – driven by something which will not allow him to
ever recline into happy retirement any more than he could settle into
the pleasures of conjugal life, were they available to him.

From his earliest appearances in le Carré’s fiction – in the novels
_Call for the Dead_ and _A Murder of Quality –_ Smiley is on the edge of
things. In most of the novels which feature Smiley, he rarely appears as
_officially_ a member of MI6. He is called out of retirement, or
pretending to be retired; and when, after _Tinker Tailor_, he is not
only restored to the organization but made chief, it is in a temporary
caretaker capacity. One of the paradoxes of Smiley’s character is that
he seems to stand for the solidity – and stolidity – ascribed to a
certain model of Englishness, yet he is himself an outsider, an
interloper, a voyeur. This is the spy’s vocation, and le Carré
repeatedly insists on it, nowhere more passionately than in the bitter
outburst of the agent Alec Leamas at the end of _The Spy who Came in
from the Cold_, so memorably performed by Richard Burton in the 1965
film adaptation.

‘What do you think spies are, moral philosophers measuring everything
they do against the word of God or Karl Marx? They’re not, they’re just
a bunch of seedy, squalid bastards like me,’ Burton’s Leamas tells his
lover, Liz, after it has been revealed that they were pawns in a complex
plot hatched by Control and Smiley. It is the beyond-good-and-evil
agent, the one who acts without performing complex moral calculations,
the one who cannot belong to the ‘normal’ world, who allows ordinary
folk to sleep easily. Yet duty is only the pretext; there is also the
matter of the deep libidinal lure of this no-man’s-land for outsiders
like Leamas and Smiley. Like writers, they listen and observe; like
actors, they play parts.

But, for spies, there are no limits to these roles; one cannot simply
step out of them and return to the warm, because everything – including
inner life itself, all its wounds and private shames – starts to feel
like cover, a series of props. There is a revelatory passage towards the
end of the second Smiley novel, A _Murder of Quality_, first published
in 1962. At the end of the novel – a strange whodunit thriller – Smiley
confronts the murderer, but, as in the later confrontation with Karla,
he ends up talking about himself:

And there are some of us – aren’t there? – who are nothing, who are so
labile that we astound ourselves; we’re the chameleons. I read a story
once about a poet who bathed himself in cold fountains so that he could
recognise his own existence in the contrast of it…The people like that,
they can’t feel anything inside them: no pleasure or pain, no love or
hate…They have to feel that cold water. Without it, they’re nothing. The
world sees them as showmen, fantasists, liars, as sensualists perhaps,
not for what they are: the living dead (Coronet, 1994, 174).

There is a clear implication in this slide from first person (‘some of
us’) to third person (‘people like that’): the Cold Warrior Smiley is
himself one of the ‘living dead.’ In psychoanalytic terms, Smiley is
less a ‘sadomasochist’ than an obsessional neurotic. (Lacan in fact
argues that the question posed by the obsessional is ‘am I alive or am I
dead?’) At the end of _Smiley’s People_, when Smiley has defeated Karla
and has the possibility of winning Ann back, Smiley is very far from
being elated. There is little sense of this in Oldman’s Smiley: his
‘sadomasochism’ is too crude to approximate the baroque mechanisms of
self-decep-tions and self-torturings which govern Smiley’s psyche. Yet
another false note is struck in Alfredson’s film when Smiley sees Ann
being embraced by Haydon at the MI6 Christmas party; he throws himself
against the wall in a spasm of agony. In other respects, the party scene
adds something which wasn’t there in the BBC version, a sense of the
camaraderie within the department, but it is hard to imagine Smiley
engaging in so public and so spontaneous display of emotion. More
troublingly, to suggest that Smiley would straightforwardly feel pain
when confronted with Ann’s infidelities is to betray the very idea that
he is masochistic. When confronted about Ann in the novel and TV
adaptation, Smiley’s preferred pose is one of weary resig-nation; but
this conceals the secret satisfaction that he experiences in Ann playing
her assigned role as impossible object. But where the masochist would
organise his enjoyment around this impossible object, for Smiley, the
function of Ann’s unattainability is to keep her at a safe distance. His
enjoyment is not organised around Ann – or sexuality – at all, and when
she is safely unattainable she cannot trouble him.

Unlike in the TV series, we never see the faces of either Ann or Karla,
Smiley’s other Other, in the film. This rightly suggests that both
figures are at least partially absent for Smiley, filled in with his
fantasies. But what’s missing is an account of the _way_ that Smiley
fills in these fantasy screens, and any sense of discrepancy between the
fantasy figures that Smiley projects and their real-life counterparts.
In the film, Smiley cannot remember what Karla looked like; in the novel
he gives a detailed description of his adversary. Defined externally by
his struggle against Karla, Smiley’s internal struggle consists of his
necessarily thwarted attempts to refuse any identification with his
Soviet counterpart. Smiley’s attempts to distance himself from the
‘fanatic’ Karla, his attempts to position himself outside politics
itself, are the exemplary gestures of a very English ideology, which
appeals to a preor post-political notion of ‘common humanity.’ Yet,
ironically, what Smiley and Karla have in common is their inhumanity,
their exile from any sort of ‘normal’ world of human passions. When they
meet in Delhi, Smiley is baffled, frustrated but also fascinated by
Karla’s refusal of the appeal, unable to fathom a commitment to an
abstract ideology, especially when – in Smiley’s view – it has
self-evidently failed. ‘The irony in le Carré’s fiction,’ writes Tony
Barley, ‘is that a sound basis for commitment is always either sought or
mourned for its absence, and yet when genuine commitment appears
(invariably in communism) it is treated as incomprehensible. Communism
becomes fanaticism, not a strength but a weakness’ _(Taking Sides: The
Fiction of John le Carré_ (Open University Press, 1986, 95). Barley
rightly argues that Smiley cannot be read as a cipher for liberal
ideology because the incoherencies and impasses of his own position are
never resolved. Behind the manifest content of Smiley’s entreaties to
Karla – come and join us, give up your dead generalities, enjoy the
particularities of the lived world – the latent message is that all
Britain has to offer is disillusionment, the impossibility of belief.
(Smiley tells Guillam that ‘fanaticism’ will be the undoing of Karla: in
fact, when Karla is defeated in _Smiley’s People_, it is because of his
failure to be _sufficiently_ ‘fanatical’.) Very little of this comes out
in Alfredson’s depoliticised film, in which Smiley is simply a wronged
hero who ultimately attains justice, Haydon is simply a traitor, and
communism is simply an exotic period reference. The nickname for MI6,
‘The Circus,’ in fact openly acknowledges the aberrant enjoyment
available to those who have crossed into this fictional Cold World. The
multivalent origin of the nickname – in addition to hinting at the way
the spies play their deadly game in a spirit of mordant, laconic
cynicism, it is also a near homonym of ‘service,’ and a play on the
location in the novel of MI6’s offices: Cambridge Circus, central London
– tells you a great deal about the world in which Smiley operates. Much
of the power of the television version derived from the way it threw us
directly into this world. Guinness’s Smiley incarnated a model of BBC
paternalism: he guided us through his world, but he had high
expectations of us. Very little was explained – we had to pick up le
Carré’s invented nomenclature (scalphunters, lamplighters) on the fly.
The work slang invoked the exoticism of a rarefied form of labour, while
also suggesting the routinisation of espionage for those involved in it
on a daily basis. It all contributed to the feeling that the Circus was
a lived-in world. One of the major problems with Alfredson’s _Tinker
Tailor_, by contrast, is that its world doesn’t feel lived-in at all.
Gratifyingly, the film does not talk down to audiences; just as in the
TV series, we are required to orientate ourselves in the Circus’s
intrigues. But the combination of Oldman’s inexpressiveness and the
compression brought about by having to tell so complicated a story in
such a short time results in something that is strangely uninvolving.
The film is almost entirely lacking in tension or paranoia; in the TV
series, the scene where Guillam steals a file from the Circus is almost
unbearably tense. In the film, the same scene plays out in a curiously
distanced way. Then there is the question of period, and the film’s
striving to create a sense of London in the 1970s. I was too often
reminded of _Life on Mars_, which evoked the decade with a series of
clumsily placed period signifiers. As with _Life on Mars_, much of
Alfedson’s film looks like a 1970s theme park. Rather than discreetly
constituting a period background, branded goods (Trebor mints, Ajax
household cleaner) are distractingly pushed to the foreground of our
attention, details that we are invited to approvingly note. But where
the details matter, this new version is lacking. Eras produce certain
voices, certain faces. What’s missing in Alfredson’s version is
something like the _grain_ of the 1970s. Too often, the actors seem like
21st-century moisturised metrosexuals in 1970s drag – and bad drag at
that. Presented with photographs of people from the 1970s, the clichéd
but accurate observation is that people looked so much older then. But
the preposterously fresh-faced likes of Benedict Cumberbatch (who plays
Guillam) and Tom Hardy (in the role of rogue agent Ricki Tarr) aren’t
nearly weathered enough to convince as 1970s secret agents. The skin,
the hair are too good. The faces are without the sallow, harrowed,
harried look that Michael Jayston and Hywel Bennett brought to the roles
in the 1970s production; their voices unable to convey any sense of the
bitter and brutalising effects of the spy’s life. John Hurt’s Control,
at least, has the right weatherbeaten complexion and cynical-playful
cadences. Accents are a severe problem in the film. Oldman plays Smiley
as generically posh, but at the same time he sounds like no one you’ve
ever heard; at points there’s an oddly Scottish lilt to his accent. The
accent of Toby Jones’s Percy Alleline, meanwhile – played as Scottish in
keeping with the novel – keeps drifting southward. Kathy Burke is
hopelessly miscast as Connie Sachs: she sounds like a schoolgirl taking
on the part of a posh woman in the school play. The problem here isn’t
just one of authenticity; it’s that the wayward accents once again
undermine the sense of a lived-in world. There is too much conspicuous
_effort_ going into this 1970s simulation. Throughout, you can
practically hear Gary Oldman straining to hold back the Estuary English.
In the BBC version, the Circus was an unprepossessing space –
functional, dreary corridors leading into cramped offices. In
Alfredson’s version, Control’s office looks more like something from a
nightclub than what you would expect to see in MI6. One wants to escape
the 1970s version, but Alfredson doesn’t give us nearly enough to do
that. There is much that is different, but nothing that is strong enough
to displace the television version in the memory. The casting of Colin
Firth as Haydon, however, at least allows us to see the character in a
different way. The face of Ian Richardson – who would go onto play the
Tory grandee and Machiavel in the BBC television series _House of Cards
–_ provided a grey-eminence image of British power in the 1970s and 80s.
I don’t know who it was who said that Colin Firth looks like the midway
point between the current British prime minister David Cameron and his
deputy Nick Clegg, but the observation is very astute. The face of the
British Establishment no longer has the hawk-like puckishness of
Richardson; it has the rumpled, casual youthfulness of Firth. One of the
major problems with Alfredson’s film is that it assumes the ruling
values of the neoliberal world governed by youth and consumerism (isn’t
this what ‘American’ codes for in the Smiley novels?). Richard Sennett
has argued that the chronic short-termism of neoliberal culture has
resulted in a ‘corrosion of character’ _(The Corrosion of Character: The
Personal Consequences of Work in the New Capitalism_, W. W. Norton,
1999): a destruction of permanence, loyalty, and the capacity to plan.
Isn’t Smiley’s allure tied up with the possibilities of character
itself? In the 1970s, Smiley showed up all the inadequacies, squalid
compromises, and subterranean brutalities of social democracy. Then,
Smiley’s doubts and his failings prompted us to imagine a better world
even as we struggled to resist Smiley’s blankly and perversely
comforting avuncularity; now, when that better world seems if anything
further away, it takes all our effort to resist the lure of nostalgia
for the social-democratic world of which Smiley was both the conscience
and the dirty secret.



THE PAST IS AN ALIEN PLANET: THE FIRST AND LAST EPISODES OF _LIFE ON MARS_


_k-punk post January 10, 2006_

_Life On Mars_ is symptomatic enough to be interesting. Symptomatic of
what? Well, of a culture that has lost confidence not just that the
future will be good, but that any sort of future is possible. And also:
_Life On Mars_ suggests that one of the chief resources of recent
British culture – the past – is reaching the point of exhaustion.

The scenario is that Sam Tyler (John Simm), a detective from 2006, is
hit by a car and finds himself back in 1973. The game that you can’t
help playing as you watch is: how convincing is the simulation of 1973?
You’re constantly on the look out for period anachronisms. The answer is
that it isn’t very convincing. But not because of anachronisms. The
problem is that this is a 73 that doesn’t feel lived in. The actual
post-psychedelic, quasi-Eastern Bloc seediness of the 70s is
unretrievable; kitsch wallpaper and bell bottoms are transformed
instantly into Style quotations the moment the camera falls upon them.

(There must be some technical reason – maybe it’s the film stock they
use – that accounts for why British TV is no longer capable of rendering
any sense of a lived-in world. No matter what is filmed, everything
always looks as if it has been thickly, slickly painted in gloss, like
it’s all a corporate video. That remains my problem with the new _Dr
Who_ as it happens: the contemporary British scenes look like a theme
park, a very stagey stage-set, too well lit.)

‘Look Out There’s a Thief About’ public information films on black and
white TV, Open University lecturers with preposterous moustaches and
voluminous collars, the test card…Everything is so iconic, and the thing
with icons, after all, is that they evoke nothing. The icon is the very
opposite of the Madeleine, Chris Marker’s name – rhyming Hitchcock and
Proust – for those totemic triggers that suddenly abduct you into the
past. The point being that the Madeleine can only manage this
time-snatching function because it has avoided museumification and
memorialisation, stayed out of the photographs, been forgotten in a
corner. Hearing T-Rex now doesn’t remind you of 73, it reminds you of
nostalgia programmes about 1973.

And isn’t part of our problem that every cultural object from 1963 on
has been so thoroughly, forensically, mulled over that nothing can any
longer transport us back? (A problem of digital memory: Baudrillard
observes somewhere that computers don’t really remember because they
lack the ability to forget.)

_k-punk post, April 13, 2007_

In the end, the science fiction elements of _Life On Mars_ consisted
solely in an ontological hesitation: is this real or not? As such, _Life
On Mars_ fell squarely into Todorov’s definition of the Fantastic as
that which hesitates between the Uncanny (that which can ultimately be
explained naturalistically) and the Marvellous (that which can only be
accounted for in supernatural terms). The predicament that _Life On
Mars_ explored was: is Sam Tyler in a coma, and the whole 1970s world in
which he is lost some kind of unconscious confabulation? Or has he, by
some means not yet understood, been transported back into the real 1973?
The show maintained the equivocation until the end (the final episode
was ambivalent to the point of being cryptic).

Simm has wryly observed that the show’s central conceit lets the
production off the hook. If Tyler was in a coma, then any of _Life On
Mars’s_ historical inaccuracies could be explained away as gaps in the
character’s recollections of the period. No doubt the enjoyment of _Life
On Mars_ derived from its imperfect recollection, not of 1973 itself,
but of the television of the 1970s. The programme was mitigated
nostalgia, I Love 1973 as a cop show. I say cop show, because it is
clear that the SF elements of _Life On Mars_ were little more than
pretexts; the show was a meta-cop show rather than meta-SF. The time
travel conceit permitted the showing of representations which would
otherwise be unacceptable, and beneath the framing ontological question
(is this real or not?), there was a question about desire and politics:
do we want this to be real?

As the avatar of the present, Sam Tyler became the bad conscience of the
70s cop show, whose discontent with the past permitted us to enjoy it
again. Simm, as the modern, enlightened ‘good cop’, was less the
anti-type of antediluvian ‘bad cop’ Gene Hunt than the postmodern
disavowal which made possible our enjoyment of Hunt’s invective and
violence. Hunt, played by Philip Glenister, became the show’s real star,
beloved of the tabloids who adored quoting his streams of abuse,
carefully constructed by the writers so that they could come across as
comic rather than inflammatory. Hunt’s ‘no-nonsense policing’ was
presented with enough ‘grit’ to make us wince, but never so much
violence that it would invoke disgust. (In this respect, the programme
was the cultural equivalent of a blow to a suspect that would not show
up under later medical examination.)

Undoubtedly, although perhaps unintentionally, the show’s ultimate
message was reactionary; in the end, rather than Tyler educating Hunt,
it was he would come to an accommodation with Hunt’s methods. When, in
the final episode, Tyler is faced with a choice between betraying Hunt
or staying loyal (at this point in the narrative, it appears that
Tyler’s betrayal of Hunt is the requisite price Tyler must pay in order
to return to 2007), this also became a choice between 1973 and the
present day that amounted to a decision, not about collar lengths or
other cultural preferences, but about policing styles. Audience sympathy
is managed such that, however much we disapprove of Hunt, we are never
supposed to lose faith in him, so that Tyler’s betrayal seemed far worse
than any of Hunt’s many misdemeanours. Tyler’s (apparent) return to 2007
underscores this by presenting the modern environment as sterile,
drearily worthy, ultimately far less real than the rough justice of
Hunt’s era. Modern wisdom (‘how can you maintain the law by breaking the
law?’) is set against Hunt’s renegade-heroic identification of himself
with the law (‘I am the law, so how can I break it?’) The deep libidinal
appeal of Hunt derives from his impossible duality as upholder of the
Law and he who enjoys unlimited jouissance. The two faces of the Father,
the stern lawgiver and Pere Jouissance, resolved: the perfect figure of
reactionary longing, a charismatic embodiment of everything allegedly
forbidden to us by ‘political correctness’.



‘CAN THE WORLD BE AS SAD AS IT SEEMS?’: DAVID PEACE AND HIS ADAPTERS


David Peace’s four Red Riding novels were acts of exorcism and
excavation of the near-past, a bloody riposte to I Love The 1970s
clipshow nostalgia. They stalk the West Yorkshire that Peace grew up in,
transforming real events – the framing and intimidation of Stefan Kisco;
the incompetent police operation to catch the Yorkshire Ripper – into
background for brutal and unrelenting fictions that possess an
apocalyptic lyricism.

Peace has always been dogged by comparisons with James Ellroy. There’s
no doubt that encountering Ellroy liberated something in Peace, but in
the end Peace is the better writer. Peace has called the experience of
reading Ellroy’s _White Jazz_ his ‘Sex Pistols moment’. But Peace builds
upon what Ellroy achieved much in the way that the postpunk groups leapt
into the space that the Pistols had blown open. Peace extrapolates a
pulp modernist poetics from Ellroy’s experiments in telegraphic
compression, and while Ellroy’s pugilistic prose has a pump-action
amphetamine drive, Peace’s writing is hypnotic and oneiric; its
incantatory repetitions delaying and veiling plot revelations rather
than rushing headlong towards resolution. Despite presenting seemingly
similar worlds – in which the police are routinely corrupt, journalists
are venal and co-optable, and the wealthy are vampiric exploiters –
their political orientations are very different. Ellroy is a Hobbesian
conservative, who evinces a macho pragmatism that accepts violence,
exploitation and betrayal as inevitable. The same phenomena are
oppressively omnipresent in Peace’s world, but there is no sense of
acceptance: instead, his novels read like howls of agony and calls for
retribution, divine or otherwise.

Peace, who has said that he aimed to produce a Crime fiction which is no
longer entertainment, has written Crime works that are hauntological in
a triple sense. The Crime genre is of course well suited to explore the
(moral, existential, theological) problems posed by what Quentin
Meillassoux called ‘odious deaths’: the deaths ‘of those who have met
their end prematurely, whose death is not the proper conclusion of a
life but its violent curtailment’; and as they moved away from the
uneasy combination of fanciful genre trappings, period signifiers, Angry
Young Man homage and brutality that characterised _1974_, the novels of
the Red Riding Quartet were simultaneously drawn towards actuality and
theology, as if the proximity of the one entailed the other. Readers are
put into the position of spectral mourners by the voices of those who
have died odiously, the Ripper’s victims, heard in the visionary
‘Transmissions’ which preface each of the chapters in _1980_, sections
which combine the actual (gleaned from reportage and biography) with the
spectral.

The novels are hauntological in another sense, a sense that is closer to
the way in which we have used it in relation to music, but not quite the
same. Peace is not at all interested in the problems of degraded memory
which preoccupy The Caretaker, Burial or Basinski. His is a past without
crackle, rendered in the first person and in a tense that is very nearly
present. The occlusions in the narrative are due, not to faulty
recording devices or memory disorders (cultural or personal) but to the
self-blindings of his characters, who see themselves (and the events of
which they are a part) only through a glass darkly. In the end,
everything – narrative, intelligibility – succumbs to total murk; as the
characters begin to disassociate, it becomes difficult to know what is
happening, or what has happened; at a certain point, it is unclear as to
whether we have crossed over into the land of the dead.

Hunter, the senior Manchester detective assigned to investigate the West
Yorkshire police force in _1980_, finds himself caught in a world in
which _things don’t add up; they don’t fit together_. It’s a Gnostic
terrain. The Gnostics thought that the world was made of a corrupt
matter characterised by heavy weight and impenetrable opacity: a murky,
muddy mire in which fallen angels – one of the persistent images in the
Red Riding books – are trapped. There is no question of Hunter, or
solicitor John Piggott in _1983_ – or even Peace – being able to
completely illuminate what has happened. This is a world in which, as
Tony Grisoni, the screenwriter who adapted the novels for Channel 4,
puts it, ‘narratives disappear into the dark’.

The libidinal orientation towards the past is also markedly different in
the case of Peace and sonic hauntology: whereas hauntological music has
emphasised the unexplored potentials prematurely curtailed in the
periods it invokes, Peace’s novels are driven by the unexpiated
suffering of Yorkshire at the end of the 70s. And Peace’s writing is
also hauntological in its intuition that particular places are stained
by particular occurrences (and vice versa). As he has insisted in many
interviews, it is no accident that Sutcliffe was the _Yorkshire_ Ripper.
Peace’s books are avowedly anti-nostalgic, the _anti-Life On Mars_, with
its ambivalence towards police brutality (and its media representation).
There is no such vindication in Peace’s novels, no suppressed yearning
for a time in which coppers could beat suspects with impunity. After
all, it is corruption, rather than criminality per se, that is the focus
of the Red Riding Quartet.

Music in Peace’s books functions as a hauntological trigger. He’s
remarked that he uses music, including music he doesn’t like, to take
him back to the feel, the grain, of a period. Musical references are
embedded in the text either diegetically, as background sound, or more
esoterically, as cryptic-epigraphic ciphers and repeated incantations: a
portal effect that gratifyingly echoes (in reverse) the way in which
music of the 1970s, especially postpunk, would direct listeners to
fiction. _1980_ is haunted in particular by Throbbing Gristle,
especially the phrase that they took from another killer, Charles
Manson: ‘can the world be as sad as it seems?’ In Peace’s hands, this
question becomes an urgent theological enquiry, the very relentlessness
of the sadness and misery he recounts calling forth an absent God, a God
who is experienced as absence, the great light eclipsed by the world’s
unending tears. The world, the sad, desolated world, is full of angels
whose wings have either been shorn off, reduced to stubble, or which
have grown into gigantic, dirty monstrosities…addict angels hooked on
alcohol, casual but incessant lusts, and the trash of the consumer
society that is struggling to be born out of the wreckage of the social
democratic consensus…angels whose ultimate response to the world is
puking (everyone pukes in Peace’s books), throwing up the whiskies and
the undercooked crispy pancakes, but never being able to purge any of
it, never being able to take flight.

The religious elements in the books become increasingly foregrounded as
the Quartet develops, until the deeply ambiguous, hallucinatory ending
of _1983_ becomes a quasi-Gnostic treatise on evil and suffering. The
final section of the novel, ‘Total Eclipse Of The Heart’ (that
transfiguration of pop cultural reference into epigraph being one of
Peace’s signature techniques), explicitly posits the idea that, far from
undermining the existence of God, evil and suffering entail that God
must exist. Eclipse implies something that is eclipsed, a hidden source
of light that produces all this shadow. In the philosophy of religion,
the problem of evil maintains that suffering, particularly suffering
visited upon the innocent, means that the theistic God could not exist,
since a benevolent, omnipotent and omniscient being would not
countenance undeserved suffering. With his inventory of wretched child
abuse cases, Dostoyevsky’s Ivan Karamazov makes the most famous, and
most passionate, statement of this position. Yet if there is no God, the
suffering remains, only now there is no possibility of its expiation; if
there can be no justice to come, the universe is permanently blighted,
irrevocably scarred by atrocity, abuse and torture.

The Red Riding novels inspired Channel 4 into making the kind of
television dramas that some of us had long since ceased hoping could
ever be made in Britain again. The three films, broadcast in 2009, were
the most striking British dramas of the first decade of the 21st
century, towering above all the facile costume epics, routine police
procedurals and emotional pornography which clogged the schedules.
Moreover, in their use of setting and landscape, in the epiphanic power
of their images, the Red Riding films attained a visual poetry and an
expressionist naturalism that exceeded practically anything British
cinema has achieved in the past 30 years.

As Nick James observed in his preview of the Red Riding films for Sight
& Sound, nothing in the previous career of the Red Riding’s three
directors – Julian Jarrold for _1974_, James Marsh for _1980_, and Anand
Tucker for _1983_ – gave any hints that they could produce work of this
quality. In many ways, it is as if the auteur of these films was Peace
himself, and the three directors succeed so consummately because they
allowed themselves to be channels of his infernal vision. It was
inevitable that some compression occurred in the transition from page to
screen; indeed, one whole novel from Peace’s Red Riding sequence –
_1977_ – was never filmed, but Tony Grisoni deserves immense credit for
the way that he weaved the three films into a symphonic coherence that
nevertheless refused easy closure and intelligibility.

Peace’s equivalent of Ellroy’s anti-hero Dudley Smith, the corrupt
detective who justifies his own running of drugs and vice operations as
‘containment’, is Maurice Jobson, the whey-faced policeman who features
in all three of the films. Where Smith (as masterfully played by James
Cromwell in the best Ellroy adaptation to date, _LA Confidential_
[1997]) is charming, charismatic and flamboyantly loquacious, Jobson (as
played by David Morrissey in the C4 adaptations) is taciturn,
abstracted, immobile, blank, in a semi-fugue state of disassociation
from the atrocities he participates in. Morrissey’s is one of many
excellent performances in the trilogy: all of them masterpieces of
measure and controlled power, proper television/ film acting, far from
the braying thespery that the British theatrical tradition often turns
out. Rebecca Hall is damaged and dangerous as Paula Garland, Maxine
Peake, angular yet vulnerable as Helen Marshall. Sean Harris manages to
make Robert Craven plausibly loathsome without tripping over into grand
guignol grotesquerie; while Paddy Considine brings a flinty resolution
to the role of Peter Hunter, one of the few lightbringers in the Red
Riding’s North, an inverted world in which evil enjoys carnivalesque
licence and the police and the powerful are free to ‘do what they want’.

The film adaptation of Peace’s extraordinary novel _The Damned Utd_
lived down to expectations to just about the same extent that the
Channel 4 films exceeded them. The team tasked with adapting the novel
looked unpromising. Before _The Damned Utd_, Director Tom Hooper
(drafted in after Stephen Frears left the project) had a background in
fairly unremarkable television (he would later go on to make _The King’s
Speech)_, while the shtick of screenwriter Peter Morgan and lead actor
Michael Sheen – as established in _The Queen_ and _Frost/ Nixon_ –
didn’t have any obvious fit with Peace’s fractured and abrasive
modernism. In the end, Hooper and Morgan didn’t adapt Peace; they
eliminated him. Hooper’s film returns us to the found object-narrative –
Brian Clough’s bitter 44-day stint as manager of Leeds United in 1974 –
that Peace used as the raw material for his ‘fiction based on a fact’.
What’s missing is everything that Peace brought to the facts: the bite
of a Real that will always elude (bourgeois) realism; and the shaping
power of a Gnostic mythography, in which the most malign entity is the
cursed land of Yorkshire itself.

It can be tiresome to criticise a film adaptation simply for the ways it
differs from its source novel. In this case, however, a close comparison
of the two versions of _The Damned Utd_ is instructive, for two reasons.
First, because, in erasing Peace’s signature, the film in effect
_competes_ with his rendition of the Clough/ Leeds story; and second,
because Peace’s pulp modernism precisely offers British culture an
escape from the kind of good humoured, well balanced, middle of the
road, middlebrow realism that Hooper and Morgan trade in.

At the press screening, Morgan said that when he read _The Damned Utd_,
it brought a nostalgia rush ‘like eating Farley’s rusks’. Yet surely
even the most guileless of the readers of Peace’s novel could see that
it tastes not of the warm mush of baby food but of bile, scotch and
refluxed stomach acid. In Hooper and Morgan’s hands, Clough’s story is
reduced to all of the givens, all the off-the-shelf narrative and
thematic pegs: he was a ‘misunder-stood genius’, struggling against an
establishment represented by puffed-up provincial patriarchs like the
Derby County chairman, Sam Longson (well played by Jim Broadbent); he
was self-destructive, and he needed his partner Peter Taylor (Timothy
Spall) to curb his excesses; he was locked into an oedipal struggle with
the man he replaced at Leeds, Don Revie. Even this is told more than it
is shown, and throughout, the audience treated as if it is witless:
dialogue is too often used for clumsy plot exposition or to crudely
telegraph Themes. Not only do Hooper and Morgan fail to evoke Peace’s
existential terrain, his blighted vision of Yorkshire, they also convey
little of his intense sense of territoriality. In the novel, Leeds’s
Elland Road ground is the site of a struggle over space in which Clough
is up against both the spectre of Don Revie and the animal aggression of
the players he has left behind. (A striking image from the novel – of
Clough chopping up and burning Revie’s desk in an attempt to exorcise
the absent father’s ghost – inexplicably never made it to screen.) The
film also misses the purgatorial rhythm of sport which Peace caught so
acutely. As every sports fan – never mind about coach – knows, the
jouissance of sport is essentially masochistic. _‘The Damned Utd_ shows
what Clough’s tragedy was,’ Chris Petit put in his review of the novel,
‘deep down, he knew that winning was only loss deferred.’ The intense
fear that colours everything in Peace’s novel is dissolved in a tone
that is frequently _jaunty_.

Then there is Michael Sheen. The problem with Sheen’s now well
established approach to historical characters is that it deprives the
film’s world of any autonomous reality – everything is indexed to a
reality external to the film, judged only by how well it matches our
already existing image of the character, whether that be Clough, Kenneth
Williams, Blair or Frost. (And there are bizarre bleed-throughs between
the characters – at one point, it felt as if Sheen’s campy Clough had
morphed into Kenneth Williams.) Certainly, Peace has an advantage over
the film-makers here: written fiction can move beyond received
television images of figures from recent history far more quickly than
film can but an actor with more courage and presence than Sheen might
have reached beyond physical appearances to reach a truth of Clough not
accessible via the TV footage. Instead, Sheen offers his usual tracing
of mannerisms and verbal tics, competent enough as far as it goes, but
devoid of any of the tortured inner life that Peace gave to his Clough.
Even if the acting were uniformly superb, it would have needed far more
than Hooper provides in order to summon the dread and misery of Peace’s
world; but the indifferent photography and the often appalling
soundtrack make Hooper’s _The Damned Utd_ feel more like a dramatisation
of actual events than a film of Peace’s novel.



NOW THEN, NOW THEN: JIMMY SAVILE AND ‘THE 70S ON TRIAL’


_July 2013_

The turn that events took had all the look of some kind of ritual
assassination. The killing not of a body – the body was already dead –
but of a name. It was as if some kind of deal had been struck – you’ll
get to live out your life with your reputation intact (or as intact as
it could be), but a year after your death, it will all be destroyed.
Nothing, absolutely nothing, will survive. Your headstone will be
dismantled. The penthouse in which you lived will be demolished. Your
name will become synonymous with evil.

September 2012, and it all starts to come up. Like a build-up of
effluent that could no longer be contained, first seeping, then surging
out. Jimmy Savile, the nation’s favourite grotesque, the former DJ and
children’s entertainer, is exposed as a serial sex abuser and
paedophile. You can’t say it comes as a surprise, and that’s one of the
most unsettling aspects of the whole affair. How out in the open it all
was…We all read the text purporting to be the transcript of an
unbroadcast scene from the BBC’s satirical programme, _Have I Got News
For You_, in which Savile is openly accused of being a child sex abuser,
and took it at face value (it seems now that the transcript was a fake,
but it was an astonishingly convincing simulation…The rhythm of the
interaction between the panellists…The way the verbal sparring escalates
into aggression…The name of the supposed victim, Sarah Cornley…it all
had a ring of authenticity – the signature of a Real, perhaps, that
could not at then be recognised except in fiction…)

Yes, in a certain way, it was all out in the open – _we all knew_, or
felt that we knew – but it mattered that the abuse was never
acknowledged in his lifetime. For while the story remained unofficial
Savile would not only go unpunished, he could continue to comport
himself as a celebrated entertainer, a knight of the realm, stalwart
charity fundraiser. No doubt Savile took a sociopathic delight in being
able to get away with it in plain sight. In his 1974 autobiography, _As
It Happens_, Savile had boasted about having sex with an underage
runaway. The police wouldn’t dare touch him, he taunted. Neither, it
seemed, would the media. Occasionally, a journalist would attempt to
breach his defences. Louis Theroux did his trademark gentle probing of
Savile about the paedophilia allegations in 2000 BBC documentary, but of
course there was no question of the old man cracking.

By the end of 2012, the 70s was returning, no longer as some bittersweet
nostalgia trip, but as a trauma. The phrase _it’s like something out of
David Peace_ has become something of a commonplace in the past few
years. Strangely for fiction that is about the past, Peace’s work has
actually gained in prophetic power since its publication. Peace wasn’t
predicting the future – how could he be, when he was writing about the
70s and the 80s? – so much as he had fixated on those parts of the past
which were about to resurface. The Fritzl case had echoes of the
underground lair in which children are kept prisoner in the Red Riding
novels. And everything that came to light about conspiracies amongst the
English power elite – all the murk and tangle of Murdoch and
Hillsborough – seemed to throw us back into Peace’s labyrinths of
corruption and cover-up. Murdoch, Hillsborough, Savile…Pull on one
thread and it all started to connect, and, wherever you looked, there
was the same grim troika – police, politicians, media…Watching each
other’s backs (partly for fear that they will be stabbed in their own
back)…Having the goods on each other, the best kind of insurance policy,
the ruling class model of solidarity…

After his death, Savile increasingly started to look like something
Peace had dreamt up. We were drawn to a certain kind of fiction because
consensual reality, the commonsense world that we like to think we live
in, wasn’t adequate to a figure like Savile. At the same time, it became
clear that the elements in Peace’s writing that previously seemed most
melodramatically excessive were those which ended up rhyming with the
new revelations. It’s as if melodramatic excess is built into the Real
itself, and the sheer implausibility of corruption and abuse itself
forms a kind of cloak for the abuser: _surely this can’t be happening?_

Savile’s stomping ground was right in the heart of Peace’s territory…in
Leeds…where the entrepreneur-DJ started to build his empire, and where,
knowing that abuse is easier to get away with when it comes disguised as
care, he volunteered as a hospital porter… _A spoonful of sugar helps
the medicine go down_…Incredibly, Savile was for a time a suspect in the
Yorkshire Ripper investigation – members of the public had named Savile,
and the body of one of the Ripper’s victims, Irene Richardson, had been
found very near to his flat. Then there was the infamous photograph of
Savile, Peter Sutcliffe and Frank Bruno at Broadmoor in 1991 – Savile,
toting his signature cigar, brokering a meeting between a serial killer
and a troubled former celebrity boxer. The grinning Sutcliffe looks like
he’s wearing one of Savile’s shell-suits. The insanity of a society and
of an era – all their occult complicities between celebrity, psychosis
and criminality – is screamingly exposed here. Ritual inversion: light
(entertainment) transforming into the darkest horror. By the end of
2012, Savile’s name was so irretrievably sullied that his old friend
Peter Sutcliffe felt the need to speak up for him.

Savile was the kind of figure who came to dominate popular culture
without inspiring much affection. You couldn’t say he was ever loved.
Someone writing in to the London Review of Books dug up the BBC’s
audience research reports on Savile’s first appearances on Top of the
Pops. _‘10 December 1964_. Jimmy Savile, who introduced the programme on
this occasion, was obviously disliked by a large number of the sample
audience. Many indicated their aversion to this artist by remarking that
anything they had to say about him would be “quite unprintable”, whilst
comment by those who freely expressed their feelings was liberally
larded with such terms as “this nutcase”; “this obnoxious ‘thing’”; and
“this revolting spectacle”.’ You don’t have to be loved, or even liked,
to be a _popular figure_. Savile didn’t even have the love-to-hate
appeal of a national pantomime villain such as Simon Cowell. His ticket
to fame was his grotesquerie itself (and this grotesquerie meant that
one of the most initially unnerving things about the revelations was
being forced to think of Savile as _any_ kind of sexual being). As
Andrew O’Hagan argued in his piece on Savile for the London Review of
Books, what mattered in the new world of television light entertainment
was not likeability, or talent, but a certain larger-than-life aura –
call it eccentricity, or call it derangement – which Savile easily
possessed as his birthright. Even those who found Savile creepy could
accept that he ‘belonged’ on television. After all, where else could he
possibly belong? The problem was that, after the 60s, if you belonged on
television, there was nowhere that wasn’t open to you. We now know that
Savile was given keys to the Broadmoor hospital for the criminally
insane, so that he could wander around the institution – just one
example of the freedoms that Savile’s celebrity and power would acquire
for him. We hear that Savile molested paraplegic patients in their
hospital beds, and I’m reminded of Dennis Potter’s 1976 television play,
_Brimstone and Treacle_, in which the lead character, the unctuous
Martin, rapes a severely brain-damaged young woman while pretending to
care for her. The BBC withdrew the play just before it was due to be
broadcast – presumably at around the same time that Savile was appearing
on Saturday night kids’ TV while raping helpless patients in private.

As Savile’s reputation descended into the mire, it pulled others’ with
it. The police investigation prompted by the scandal, Operation Yewtree,
went after a whole slew of former household names with (surely) more to
come. Someone, I don’t remember who, says _it’s like the 70s have gone
on trial_. Yes, but it’s a very particular strand of the 70s that is
under investigation – not the officially debauched rock ‘n’ roll 70s,
not Zeppelin or Sabbath, but the family entertainment 70s.

As the stories mounted up, Savile came to seem more and more
unbelievable. Taken together, even facts that were already known about
Savile before his death came to look as if they couldn’t possibly be
true. Could it really be the case, for instance, that Savile had taken
part in negotiations between the Israeli and the Egyptian governments in
the 70s? That he had mediated between Prince Charles and Princess Diana
as their marriage started to fail? (And how mad, how desperate, would
you have to be to take _Jimmy Savile’s_ advice on your marriage?) That
he had spent Christmas after Christmas with Margaret Thatcher? (Thatcher
had tried four times to ennoble Savile, but was repeatedly rebuffed by
her advisers, and only succeeded in knighting him at the fag-end of her
period as Prime Minister.)

Murdoch and the Daily Mail wasted no time in pushing the idea that the
abuse was an institutional pathology – it was the BBC, and, more
broadly, the paternalistic media culture of the 60s and 70s, which had
incubated Savile’s corruption. The BBC, now in a permanent state of
confusion about its role in a neoliberal world, duly went into a
neurotic, narcissistic collapse. Its judgement was shot; it had failed
to broadcast a report about Savile’s abuse, and the crisis over Savile
would push it into moving too hastily when, a few months later, a Tory
peer was wrongly named in another abuse scandal. Murdoch and the Mail
crowed on about how the Savile revelations demonstrated the importance
of press freedom – but the question that they neatly evaded was, where
were _their_ brave hacks? Why didn’t they expose Savile when it
mattered, when he was alive?

When the question started to be asked about how he’d got away with it,
we already knew the answer. He had connections at the very top. The very
top. And he took care to make friends with those in power and authority
at lower levels, too. Police officers regularly attended Savile’s now
notorious Friday Morning Club meetings at his home in Leeds.

Savile’s ascent to his unlikely position of power and influence required
immense amounts of hard work. One thing you could never accuse him of
was slacking. A forensically researched post on the Sump Plug blog
details how infernally busy Savile was in the early days of his career:

The Plaza [Ballroom in Manchester] was just one of many dance halls and
clubs that Savile oversaw, managed, diskjockeyed at, wielded shadowy
control over or had some kind of undeclared stake in, not only in
Manchester but also on the other side of the Pennines —in Bradford, in
Wakefield, in Halifax, over on the coast in Scarborough and Whitby, and
especially in Leeds. In his hometown the joints he presided over
included the Cat’s Whiskers and the Locarno Ballroom in the County
Arcade, known by locals simply as ‘the Mecca’ (later rebranded as the
Spinning Disc). That’s where, in 1958, his predilection for underage
girls first came to the attention of the police. The matter was swiftly
resolved by peeling a few hundred quid off the big roll of twenties that
he always carried, right up until he died.

Meanwhile, in Manchester on any given night in the late 50s and early
60s, if you couldn’t find Savile at the Plaza at lunchtime, he’d surely
be at the Ritz later on. Or, if not, try the Three Coins in Fountain
Street. He didn’t even rest on Sundays; that was when he span the
platters for upwards of two thousand jivers and twisters at his Top Ten
Club at Belle Vue.

The man was everywhere —at practically every major dance hall and
nightclub in the North’s heaving conurbations, as much of a fixture as
the rotating mirror ball.

Savile’s empire quickly spread down south too, down to the Ilford
Palais, and to Decca Records, who would pay him to play their latest
releases. Up North, Savile’s rackets were protected by a gang of
bodybuilders, boxers, and wrestlers, including – improbably for those of
us who came to know him as the comically fat wrestler Big Daddy, cuddly
mainstay of Saturday afternoon television – Shirley Crabtree. The roots
of 70s television were here, in these ballrooms and dancehalls, their
seediness waiting to be transubstantiated into light entertainment.

But, a year after Savile’s death, the transubstantiation would go into
extreme reverse. _Now then, now then_ – one of Savile’s catchphrases
started to assume an ominous significance. Only a few months previously,
the BBC had broadcast a number of programmes celebrating his life and
work. Now, condemnation is not enough: all traces of his existence must
be removed. Not only is the headstone taken away, but we hear – can this
possibly be true? It’s impossible to tell in the fevered atmosphere –
that the family of a child buried near to Savile had requested that
Savile’s remains be disinterred – as if he were some medieval devil, a
noxious cloud of malignancy that can corrupt even the dead. More
farcically, CBeebies, one of the BBC’s children’s channels, was censured
because it broadcasted a repeat of an episode of the programme the
Tweenies, in which one of the characters impersonated Savile.

Now then, now then…

At the time when Savile was abusing, the victims were faced, not with
Jimmy Savile _the monster_, Jimmy Savile _the prolific abuser of
children_, but with Jimmy Savile _OBE_ – _Sir_ Jimmy Savile – Jimmy
Savile, _Knight Commander of the Pontifical Equestrian Order of Saint
Gregory the Great_. When we ask how Savile got away with it all, we must
remember this. Naturally, fear played a part in keeping Savile’s victims
quiet. _Who’s going to believe your word against the word of a
television entertainer, someone who has raised millions for charity?_
But we also need to take seriously the way that power can warp the
experience of reality itself. Abuse by the powerful induces a cognitive
dissonance in the vulnerable – _this can’t possibly be happening_. What
has happened can be pieced together only in retrospect. The powerful
trade on the idea that abuse and corruption used to happen, but not any
more. Abuse and cover–up can be admitted, but only on condition that
they are confined to the past. That was _then_, things are different
_now_…



02: HAUNTOLOGY


[]



LONDON AFTER THE RAVE: BURIAL


_k-punk post April 14, 2006_

_Burial_ is the kind of album I’ve dreamt of for years; literally. It is
oneiric dance music, a collection of the ‘dreamed songs’ Ian Penman
imagined in his epochal piece on Tricky’s _Maxinquaye_. _Maxinquaye_
would be a reference point here, as would Pole – like both these
artists, Burial conjures audio-spectres out of crackle, foregrounding
rather than repressing sound’s accidental materialities. Tricky and
Pole’s ‘cracklology’ was a further development of dub’s materialist
sorcery in which ‘the seam of its recording was turned inside out for us
to hear and exult in’ (Penman). But rather than the hydroponic heat of
Tricky’s Bristol or the dank caverns of Pole’s Berlin, Burial’s sound
evokes what the press release calls a ‘near future South London
underwater. You can never tell if the crackle is the burning static off
pirate radio, or the tropical downpour of the submerged city out of the
window.’

Near future, maybe…But listening to Burial as I walk through damp and
drizzly South London streets in this abortive Spring, it strikes me that
the LP is very London Now – which is to say, it suggests a city haunted
not only by the past but by lost futures. It seems to have less to do
with a near future than with the tantalising ache of a future just out
of reach. _Burial_ is haunted by what once was, what could have been,
and – most keeningly – what could still happen. The album is like the
faded ten year-old tag of a kid whose Rave dreams have been crushed by a
series of dead end jobs.

_Burial_ is an elegy for the hardcore continuum, a _Memories From the
Haunted Ballroom_ for the Rave generation. It is like walking into the
abandoned spaces once carnivalised by Raves and finding them returned to
depopulated dereliction. Muted air horns flare like the ghosts of Raves
past. Broken glass cracks underfoot. MDMA flashbacks bring London to
unlife in the way that hallucinogens brought demons crawling out of the
subways in _Jacob’s Ladder’s_ New York. Audio hallucinations transform
the city’s rhythms into inorganic beings, more dejected than malign. You
see faces in the clouds and hear voices in the crackle. What you
momentarily thought was muffled bass turns out only to be the rumbling
of tube trains.

Burial’s mourning and melancholia sets it apart from dubstep’s emotional
autism and austerity. My problem with dubstep has been that in
constituting dub as a positive entity, with no relation to the Song or
to pop, it has too often missed the spectrality wrought by dub’s
subtraction-in-process. The emptying out has tended to produce not space
but an oppressive, claustrophobic flatness. If, by contrast, Burial’s
schizophonic hauntology has a 3D depth of field it is in part because of
the way it grants a privileged role to voices under erasure, returning
to dub’s phono-decentrism. Snatches of plaintive vocal skitter through
the tracks like fragments of abandoned love letters blowing through
streets blighted by an unnamed catastrophe. The effect is as
heartbreakingly poignant as the long tracking shot in Tarkovsky’s
_Stalker_ (1979) that lingers over sublime objects-become trash.

Burial’s London is a wounded city, populated by ecstasy casualties on
day release from psychiatric units, disappointed lovers on night buses,
parents who can’t quite bring themselves to sell their Rave 12 inches at
a carboot sale, all of them with haunted looks on their faces, but also
haunting their interpas-sively nihilist kids with the thought that
things weren’t always like this. The sadness in the Dem 2 meets _Vini
Reilly-era_ Durutti Column ‘You Hurt Me’ and ‘Gutted’ is almost
overwhelming. ‘Southern Comfort’ only deadens the pain. Ravers have
become deadbeats, and Burial’s beats are accordingly undead – like the
tik-tok of an off-kilter metronome in an abandoned Silent Hill school,
the klak-klak of graffiti-splashed ghost trains idling in sidings. 10
years ago, Kodwo Eshun compared the ‘harsh, roaring noise’ of No
U-Turn’s ‘hoover bass’ with ‘the sound of a thousand car alarms going
off simultaneously’. The subdued bass on Burial is the spectral echo of
a roar, burned-out cars remembering the noise they once made.

Burial reminds me, actually, of paintings by Nigel Cooke. The morose
figures Cooke graffitis onto his own paintings are perfect visual
analogues for Burial’s sound. A decade ago, jungle and hip hop invoked
devils, demons and angels. Burial’s sound, however, summons the
‘chain-smoking plants and sobbing vegetables’ that sigh longingly in
Cooke’s painting. Speaking at the Tate, Cooke observed that much of the
violence of graffiti comes from its velocity. There’s something of an
affinity between the way that Cooke re-creates graffiti in the ‘slow’
medium of oil paints and the way in which Burial submerges (dubmerges?)
Rave’s hyperkinesis in a stately melancholia. _Burial’s_ dilapidated
Afro NoFuturism does for London in the 00s what Wu Tang did for New York
in the 90s. It delivers what Massive Attack promised but never really
achieved. It’s everything that Goldie’s _Timeless_ ought to have been.
It’s the Dub City counterpart to Luomo’s _Vocalcity. Burial_ is one of
the albums of the decade. Trust me.



DOWNCAST ANGEL: INTERVIEW WITH BURIAL


_The Wire 286, December 2007_

With his self-titled debut LP last year, Burial established himself as
an extraordinary sonic mythographer, a sound poet capable of
articulating the existential malaise of an era and a place using only
sampled voices, broken breakbeats and musique concrète sound effects.
_Burial_ was a vivid audio portrait of a wounded South London, a
semi-abstract sound painting of a city’s disappointment and anguish.
Burial’s was a sound saturated in dance music, but his unsequenced beats
were too eccentric to dance to. His sound was too out of step to fit
into dubstep, the genre his records were most likely to be filed under
because they were released on Kode9’s Hyperdub label. Burial’s sound
might have fallen between the cracks, but it wasn’t some eclectic
melange of existing forms. What was most impressive about it – and no
doubt one of the reasons that it was _The Wire’s_ Record Of The Year for
2006 – was the consistency of its sonic concept. There was an impersonal
quality to Burial’s desolate elegies, a quality reinforced by his doing
only a few interviews and refusing to allow a photograph of his face to
be used in any promotion. Swarming rumours filled the hype-vacuum. Many
didn’t believe he actually existed, attributing the record’s production
to Basic Channel, The Bug, Kode9 himself – a massive backhanded
compliment to how fully realised Burial’s (syn)aesthetic was. In fact,
his sound has been gestating slowly, semi-secretly, for at least half a
decade. The tracks on the first album had been selected from recordings
Burial had made since 2001. His first appearance on vinyl was the track
‘Broken Home’ on Wasteland’s Vulture Culture Mix 2 in 2004. And the 12’
EP _South London Boroughs_, which trailed some of the most potent tracks
from the first LP, followed a year later.

Burial’s refusal to ‘be a face’, to constitute himself as a subject of
the media’s promotional machine, is in part a temperamental preference,
and in part a resistance to the conditions of ubiquitous visibility and
hyper-clarity imposed by digital culture – ‘It’s like a ouija board,
it’s like letting someone into your head, behind your eyes. It lets
randoms in,’ he says of the internet.

‘I’m just a well low key person,’ he admits. ‘I want to be unknown,
because I’d rather be around my mates and family, but there’s no need to
focus on it. Most of the tunes I like, I never knew what the people who
made them looked like, anyway. It draws you in. You could believe in it
more.’ Burial doesn’t DJ or play live, so photographs of him can’t even
be surreptitiously taken and circulated. ‘I just want to be in a symbol,
a tune, the name of a tune,’ he explains. ‘It’s not like it’s a new
thing. It’s one of the old underground ways and it’s easier.’ Burial is
more sensitive than most to the way in which people are shaped by
impersonal forces. ‘When you are young you are pushed around by forces
that are nothing to do with you,’ he says. ‘You’re lost; most of the
time you don’t understand what’s going on with yourself, with anything.’
He knows that his sound does not come from anything with a face.

Without being chauvinistic, Burial is fiercely loyal to the British
Hardcore continuum from which his sound has emerged. ‘If you’re well
into tunes, your life starts to weave around them,’ he says. ‘I’d rather
hear a tune about real life, about the UK, than some US hip-hop ‘I’m in
the club with your girl’-type thing. I love R&B tunes and vocals but I
like hearing things that are true to the UK, like drum ‘n’ bass and
dubstep. Once you’ve heard that underground music in your life, other
stuff just sounds like a fucking advert, imported.’ Indeed, one track on
his new album _Untrue_ is called ‘UK’; another, one of the most
sorrowful, is called ‘Raver’. Burial’s London seems to be a city
populated by dejected Ravers, returning to the sites of former revels
and finding them derelict, forced to contrast the quotidian compromises
of their post-Rave life with the collective ecstasy they once lived out.
Burial’s is a re-dreaming of the past, a condensation of relics of
abandoned genres into an oneiric montage. His sound is a work of
mourning rather than of melancholia, because he still longs for the lost
object, still refuses to abandon the hope that it will return. ‘A lot of
those old tunes I put on at night and I hear something in the tune that
makes me feel sad,’ he says. ‘A few of my favourite producers and DJs
are dead now too – and I hear this hope in all those old tracks, trying
to unite the UK. But they couldn’t, because the UK was changing in a
different direction, away from us. Maybe the feeling of the UK in clubs
and stuff back then, it wasn’t as artificial, self-aware or created by
the Internet. It was more rumour, underground folklore. Anyone could go
into the night and they had to seek it out. Because you could see it in
people, you could see it in their eyes. Those Ravers were at the edge at
their lives, they weren’t running ahead or falling behind, they were
just right there and the tunes meant everything. In the 90s you could
feel that it had been taken away from them. In club culture, it all
became like superclubs, magazines, Trance, commercialised. All these
designer bars would be trying to be like clubs. It all got just taken.
So it just went militant, underground from that point. That era is gone.
Now there’s less danger, less sacrifice, less journey to find something.
You can’t hide, the media clocks everything.’ He checks his pessimism:
‘But [dubstep nights] DMZ and FWD have that deep atmosphere and real
feeling. The true underground is still strong, I hear good new tunes all
the time.’

After a statement as definitive as his first LP, it was difficult to
imagine where Burial would go next. But _Untrue_ substantially modifies
the sound auditioned on _Burial_. The most obvious difference from the
first record is the amount and type of vocal on the new LP. His mentor
Kode9 describes it as ‘weird soul’ and, if the reference points for the
debut were early to mid-90s Rave and Jungle, the touchstones on _Untrue_
are late 90s Garage and 2-step. The cut-up and pitchshifted voices –
looped fragments of longing – make _Untrue_ even more addictive and even
more keeningly moving than _Burial_. Burial had in fact produced a whole
album’s worth of material in another style – ‘more technical, all the
tunes sounded like some kind of weapon that was being taken apart and
put back together again’ – but he scrapped it. ‘I was worrying,’ he
recalls, ‘I’d made all these dark tunes and I played them to my mum, and
she didn’t like them. I was going to give up, but she was sweet, telling
me, ‘Just do a tune, fuck everyone off, don’t worry about it.’ My dog
died and I was totally gutted about that. She was just like, ‘Make a
tune, cheer up, stay up late, make a cup of tea.’ And I rang her mobile
20 minutes later and I’d made that ‘Archangel’ tune [on Untrue], and I
was like, ‘I’ve made the tune, the tune you told me to make.”

Burial’s treatment of voice has always been crucial to his sound. Too
much dub-influenced music is content to simply erase the voice and turn
up the echo, but Burial instinctively knew that dubbing is about veiling
the song, about reducing it to a tantalising tissue of traces, a virtual
object all the more beguiling because of its partial
desubstantialisation. The drizzly crackle that has become one of his
sonic signatures is part of the veiling process. Self-deprecatingly, he
claims that he initially used the crackle to conceal ‘the fact that I
wasn’t very good at making tunes’. But he is not so much influenced by
dub as by the ‘vocal science’ developed by Jungle, Garage and 2-step
producers. When he and his brothers would listen to darkside Jungle,
Burial found himself increasingly drawn to the vocal tracks. ‘I’d love
these vocals that would come in, not proper singing but cut-up and
repeating, and executed coldly. It was like a forbidden siren. I was
into the cut-up singing as much as the dark basslines. Something happens
when I hear the subs, the rolling drums and vocals together. So when I
started doing tunes, I didn’t have the kit and I didn’t understand how
to do it properly, so I couldn’t make the drums and bass sound massive,
so as long as it had a bit of singing in it, it forgave the rest of the
tune. Then I couldn’t believe that I’d done a tune that gave me that
feeling that proper records used to, and the vocal was the one thing
that seemed to take the tune to that place. My favourite tunes were
underground and moody but with killer vocals: ‘Let Go’ by Teebee, ‘Being
With You Remix’ by Foul Play, Intense, Alex Reece, Digital, Goldie,
Dillinja, EL-B, D-Bridge, Steve Gurley. I miss being on the bus to
school listening to DJ Hype mixes.’

New Labour Britain is intoxicated by consensual sentimentality, hooked
on disposable simulated emotion. With the ubiquity of TV talent shows,
religiose emoting has become a fast track to media recognition, secular
UK’s equivalent of sanctification and salvation. In this process,
singing has become almost incidental – it’s lachrymose back stories that
the media really hungers for. Burial’s strategy with singing is exactly
contrary to this: he removes voices from biography and narrative,
transforming them into fluttering, flickering abstractions, angels
liberated from the heavy weight of personal history. ‘I was listening to
these Guy Called Gerald tunes,’ he says. ‘I wanted to do vocals but I
can’t get a proper singer like him. So I cut up a cappellas and made
different sentences, even if they didn’t make sense, but they summed up
what I was feeling.’ In the process of changing the pitch of the vocals,
buried signals come to light. ‘I heard this vocal and it doesn’t say it
but it sounds like ‘archangel’,’ says Burial. ‘I like pitching down
female vocals so they sound male, and pitching up male vocals so they
sound like a girl singing.’ This is apt, as angels are supposed to be
without gender. ‘Well that works nice with my tunes, kind of half boy
half girl,’ he enthuses. ‘I understand that moody thing, but some dance
music is too male. Some Jungle tunes had a balance, the glow, the
moodiness that comes from the presence of both girls and boys in the
same tune. There’s tension because it’s close, but sometimes perfect
together. I look like her. I am her.’

Kode9 describes the album as ‘downcast euphoria’, and that seems to fit.
‘I wanted to make a half euphoric record,’ Burial agrees. ‘That was an
older thing that UK underground music used to have. Old Rave tunes used
to be the masters of that, for a reason, to do with the Rave, half human
endorphins and half something hypnotised by drugs. It was stolen from us
and it never really came back. Mates laugh at me because I like whale
songs. But I love them, I like vocals to be like that, like a night cry,
an angel animal.’

Angels, again. On _Untrue_, Burial’s Ravers appear as downcast angels,
beings of light exiled into the dull weight of the worldly. _Untrue_ is
like German director Wim Wenders’s _Wings Of Desire_ (1987) relocated to
the UK: an audio vision of London as a city of betrayed and mutilated
angels, their wings clipped. But angels also hover above the hopeless
and the abandoned here. ‘My new tunes are about that,’ Burial agrees,
‘wanting an angel to be watching over you, when there’s nowhere to go
and all you can do is sit in McDonalds late at night, not answering your
phone.’

As you might expect, Burial’s attunement to angels, demons and ghosts
goes back to childhood. ‘My dad when I was really little,’ he says,
‘sometimes he used to read me MR James stories. On the South Bank last
year, I bunked off from my day job and I found a book of MR James ghost
stories. The one that fucked me up when I was little was “Oh, Whistle
And I’ll Come To You, My Lad”. Something can betray how sinister it is
even at a distance. Something weird happens with MR James, because even
though it’s in writing, there’ll be a moment when the person meets the
ghost, where you can’t quite believe what you’ve read. You go cold, just
for those few lines when you glimpse the ghost for a second, or he
describes the ghost face. It’s like you’re not reading any more. In that
moment it burns a memory into you that isn’t yours. He says something
like, “There’s nothing worse for a human being than to see a face where
it doesn’t belong.” But if you’re little, and you’ve got an imagination
which is always messing you up and darking you out, things like that are
almost comforting to read.

‘Also,’ he continues, ‘there is nothing worse than not recognising
someone you know, someone close, family, seeing a look in them that just
isn’t them. I was once in a lock-in in a pub and the regulars there and
some mates started telling these fucked-up ghost stories from real life,
maybe that had happened to them, and I swear if you heard them…One girl
told me the scariest thing I ever heard. Some of these stories would
stop a few words earlier than seemed right. They don’t play out like a
film, they’re too simple, too everyday, slight. Those stories ring true
and I never forgot them. Sometimes maybe you see ghosts. On the
underground with an empty Costcutters plastic bag, nowhere to go, they
are smaller, about 70 per cent smaller than a normal person, smaller
than they were in life.’

Burial makes the most convincing case that our zeitgeist is essentially
hauntological. The power of Derrida’s concept lay in its idea of being
haunted by events that had not actually happened, futures that failed to
materialise and remained spectral. Burial craves something he never
actually experienced firsthand. ‘I’ve never been to a festival, a Rave
in a field, a big warehouse, or an illegal party,’ he says, ‘just clubs
and playing tunes indoors or whatever. I heard about it, dreamed about
it. My brother might bring back these records that seemed really adult
to me and I couldn’t believe I had them. It was like when you first saw
Terminator or Alien when you’re only little. I’d get a rush from it, I
was hearing this other world, and my brother would drop by late and I’d
fall asleep listening to tunes he put on.’ It was his older brother who
made Rave a kind of ‘present absence’ in Burial’s life, a space to be
filled with yarns and yearnings. ‘He loved tunes, Rave tunes, Jungle,’
Burial tells me. ‘He lived all that stuff, and he was gone, he was on
the other side of the night. We were brought up on stories about it:
leaving the city in a car and finding somewhere and hearing these tunes.
He would sit us down and play these old tunes, and later on he’d play us
‘Metropolis’, Reinforced, Paradox, DJ Hype, Foul Play, DJ Crystl, Source
Direct and Techno tunes.’

The Rave relics feed a hunger for escape. ‘I respect working hard but I
dread a day job,’ asserts Burial. ‘Or a job interview. I’ve got a truant
heart, I just want to be gone. I’d be in the kitchens, the corridors at
work, and I’d be staring at the panels on the roof, clocking all the
maintenance doors, dreaming about getting into the airducts. A portal.
As a kid I used to dream about being put in the bins, escaping from
things, without my mum knowing she’d put me out in the bins. So I’m in a
black plastic bag outside a building and hearing the rain against it,
but feeling all right, and just wanting to sleep, and a truck would take
me away.’ A too quick psychoanalytic reading would hear this as a thinly
coded wish to return to the womb – and Burial’s warm bass certainly
feels enwombing – but that would be to ignore the desire to flee that is
also driving this fantasy. Burial wants out, but he cannot positively
characterise what lies beyond. ‘We all dream about it,’ he says. ‘I wish
something was there. But even if you fight to see it, you never see
anything. You don’t have a choice. You’d be on the way to a job, but
you’re longing to go down this other street, right there, and you walk
past it. No force on Earth could make you go down there, because you’ve
got to traipse to wherever. Even if you escape for a second, people are
on your case, you can’t go down old Thames side and throw your mobile
in.’

But there are always flickers and flashes of the other side.
After-images. ‘I used to get taken away to the middle of nowhere, by the
sea,’ concludes Burial. ‘I love it out there, because when it’s dark,
it’s totally dark, there’s none of this ambient light London thing. We
used to have to walk back and hold hands and use a lighter. See the
light, see where you were and then you’d walk on, and the image of where
you’ve just been would still be on your retina.



SLEEVENOTES FOR THE CARETAKER’S _THEORETICALLY PURE ANTEROGRADE AMNESIA_


_May 2006_

Could it be said that we _all_ now suffer from a form of theoretically
pure anterograde amnesia?

Oliver Sacks’ _The Man who Mistook his Wife for a Hat_ and Christopher
Nolan’s _Memento_ (2000) have made the features of the condition –
referred to, misleadingly, as short-term memory loss – well-known. In
fact, sufferers _do_ produce new memories, but they are not retained.
There is no long-term encoding. This type of amnesia is anterograde
rather than retrograde because it does not affect any memories formed
before the onset of condition. _Theoretically:_ in practice, it is
likely that even the old memories will undergo some degradation.

On _Theoretically Pure Anterograde Amnesia_ the album, a tendency in the
Caretaker’s music has reached a kind of culmination. The theme was once
homesickness for the past. Now, it is the impossibility of the present.

_Selected Memories From The Haunted Ballroom_ was a kind of replicant
mnemonic implant, a false memory of the tearoom pop of the twenties and
thirties. For those of us haunted by the lambent ache of Al Bowlly’s
croon in _The Shining_ and _Pennies From Heaven_, that kind of Total
Recall trip was irresistible. The ghosts were so glamorous, their bob
haircuts and pearls glistening in the candlelight, their dance moves oh
so elegant.

An occulted reference might have been _The Invention of Morel_ (an
influence upon _Last Year at Marienbad_ (1961) and therefore also upon
_The Shining_ (1980)), Adolfo Bioy Casares’ science fictional lovesong
to Louise Brooks. Casares imagined a world we live in it where the
spectres of the beautiful and the damned are preserved forever, their
little gestures and banal conversations transformed, by repetition, into
holy artefacts. The simulation machine on Morel’s island is film, of
course, and who has not at some time wanted to do as Casares’ hero does
and pass beyond the screen, so as to finally be able to talk with the
ghosts you have for so long mooned over? It is the same temptation that
Jack yields to in _The Shining_ when he enters into the consensual
hallucination of The Overlook. The Gold Room, in which the Scott
Fitzgerald-era elite forever cavort in a ceaseless whirl of wit, cocaine
and wealth, is perfectly heavenly. But you know what the price of the
ticket to heaven is, don’t you Jack?

_Don’t you?_

It is that grave-damp, mildewed odour which the perfume and the
preservative never quite covered up which has always made The
Caretaker’s music uneasy, rather than easy, listening. Queasy listening,
actually. It has never been possible to ignore the shadows lurking at
the periphery of our audio-vision; the trip down memory lane was
deliciously intoxicating but there was a bitter undertaste. A faint
horror, something like the dim but insistent awareness of plague and
mortality that must have nagged at the entranced-dancers in Poe’s ‘The
Masque of the Red Death’.

That’s not all.

Something else was wrong.

The sepia and the soft focus were photoshopped in, we knew that. These
thick carpets and china tea-sets weren’t really there. And they never
were, not for us. We were in a simulation of _another’s_ mind’s eye. The
mottled, honeyed, slurred and reverbed quality of the sound alerted us
to the fact that this was not the object itself but the object as it is
for someone else’s memory.

On _Theoretically Pure Anterograde Amnesia_, things have worsened
immeasurably. It is as if the Overlook simulation has run out of steam.
The lights have gone out. The hotel is rotten, a burned out wreck long
since gutted, the band is pale and very nearly translucent.

The threat is no longer the deadly sweet seduction of nostalgia. The
problem is not, any more, the longing to get _to_ the past, but the
inability to get _out_ of it. You find yourself in a grey black drizzle
of static, a haze of crackle. Why is it always raining here? Or is that
just the sound of the television, tuned to a dead channel?

Where were we?

You suppose that you could be in familiar territory. It’s difficult to
know if you’ve heard this before or not. There’s not much to go on. Few
landmarks. The tracks have numbers, not names. You can listen to them in
any order. The point is to get lost. That’s easy in this ill-seen, late
Beckett landscape. You extemporise stories they call it confabulation –
to make sense of the abstract shapes looming in the smoke and fog.

Who is editing the film, and why all the jump–cuts?

By now, very little a few haunting refrains lingering at the back of
your mind separates you from the desert of the real.

Let’s not imagine that this condition afflicts only a few unfortunates.
Isn’t, in fact, theoretically pure anterograde amnesia the postmodern
condition par excellence? The present – broken, desolated is constantly
erasing itself, leaving few traces. Things catch your attention for a
while but you do not remember them for very long. But the old memories
persist, intact…Constantly commemorated … _I love 1923…_

Do we really have more substance than the ghosts we endlessly applaud?

The past cannot be forgotten, the present cannot be remembered.

Take care. It’s a desert out there…



MEMORY DISORDER: INTERVIEW WITH THE CARETAKER


_The Wire 304, June 2009_

‘I have always been fascinated by memory and its recall especially where
sound is concerned,’ writes James Kirby via email. ‘Some things we
remember easily and others we never seem to grasp. That idea was
developed more on the boxset I did [2006’s _Theoretically Pure
Anterograde Amnesia]_ which was based around a specific form of amnesia
where sufferers can remember things from the past but are unable to
remember new things. To recreate that in sound was a challenge that I
relished really. I realised the only way was to make a disorientating
set with very few reference points. Fragments of melody breaking out of
this monotonous tone and audio quagmire. Even if you listen over and
over to all the songs you still can’t remember when these melodies will
come in. You have no favourite tracks, it’s like a dream you are trying
to remember. Certain things are clear but the details are still buried
and distant.’

Kirby’s description perfectly captures the unsettling experience of
listening to _Theoretically Pure Anterograde Amnesia_. With the release
of the six CD boxset, his project The Caretaker crossed over from being
an exercise in atmospheric nostalgia to being a harrowing investigation
of memory disorder. The box set is more like a sonic installation than a
record, a work whose conceptual and textural richness puts much sound
art to shame. The first three Caretaker records – _Selected Memories
From The Haunted Ballroom_ (1999), _A Stairway To The Stars_ (2001) and
_We’ll All Go Riding On A Rainbow_ (2003) – swathed sampled British
tearoom pop in a gaslit halo of reverb and crackle. On _Theoretically
Pure Anterograde Amnesia_ the effects and the surface noise take over,
so that instead of a gently dub–dilapidated pop, there is an unnavigable
murk, as abstract and minimal as a Beckett landscape. Echoes and
reverberations float free of any originating sound source in a sea of
hiss and static. If the earlier records suggested spaces that were
mildewed but still magnificent – grand hotels gone to seed, long
abandoned ballrooms – _Theoretically Pure Anterograde Amnesia_ invokes
sites that have deteriorated into total dereliction, where every
unidentified noise is pregnant with menace. The 72 tracks – all of them
numbered rather than named – simulate the amnesiac condition, and the
few fragments of well known tunes that occasionally flare in the gloom
are intermittent islands of familiarity in a world that has become
hostile and unrecognisable.

‘Maybe it’s a dark humour, a kind of an audio black comedy,’ Kirby says
of The Caretaker, but the solemnity of the project belies Kirby’s
reputation as a prankster. His label V/Vm notoriously released a version
of Lieutenant Pigeon’s ‘Mouldy Old Dough’ just after appearing on the
cover of _The Wire_ 176 under the headline ‘Harder! Faster! Louder!’,
one of a series of manglings of mainstream music – tracks by Chris de
Burgh, John Lennon and Elton John were also butchered and reassembled –
that V/Vm issued.

It is the focus on cultural memory that holds together all of Kirby’s
work, including the V/Vm mash–ups. If the V/Vm (sub)versions of pop come
from the brash side of postmodern pastiche, then The Caretaker is about
the dark side of cultural retrospection. _Theoretically Pure Anterograde
Amnesia_ was in many ways an act of diagnosis of a cultural pathology.
It might seem strange to describe a culture that is so dominated by past
forms as being amnesiac, but the kind of nostalgia that is now so
pervasive may best be characterised not as a longing for the past so
much as an inability to make new memories. Fredric Jameson described one
of the impasses of postmodern culture as the inability ‘to focus our own
present, as though we have become incapable of achieving aesthetic
representations of our own current experience.’ The past keeps coming
back because the present cannot be remembered. Memory disorders have
recurred as themes in the popular cinema in the past decade or so: it is
theoretically pure anterograde amnesia that afflicts Leonard, the lead
character in _Memento_, while the massively successful Bourne films were
preoccupied with memory loss. It is not surprising that anxieties about
memory should continually surface in late capitalism, where, as Jameson
and others have argued, perpetual economic instability and the rapid
turnover of ephemeral images leads to a breakdown in any coherent sense
of temporality.

Kirby has approached the failure of the future from a different angle on
another of his projects, 2006’s _The Death Of Rave_. Here, Rave is
desubstantialised, stripped of all bass weight and drum propulsion,
reduced to shimmer and haze. The tracks sound like they are being heard
from outside a club: a horribly accurate sonic metaphor, perhaps, of our
current state of exile from the future-shocking rate of innovation that
dance music achieved in the 80s and 90s. ‘Yeah, that project really is
in its infancy,’ Kirby says. ‘It came about as part of the V/Vm 365
project where the aim was to make one audio track a day. I used to go
Raves when I was younger, went through that whole explosion in
electronic music from 1987 to around 1992-93 when it seemed like there
was a new genre every single week. It was an amazing time in music to
hear so many things happening and so many new possibilities opening up
and to see and feel the energy of new music exploding on dancefloors and
in clubs. I think _The Death Of Rave_ is about the loss in that spirit
and a total loss of energy in most electronic musics across the board. I
feel sorry these days for people when I go to clubs as that energy isn’t
there any more. I mean we have some so called very cool clubs in Berlin
such as Watergate and Berghain, but you compare them to those back in
the late 80s and early 90s in Manchester and it really is no comparison.
Of course new things pop up but the difference now really is that if
something explodes then before it can grow naturally people have
strangled it to death with parodies online and often a scene or new
style is dead before it even surfaces. House and Techno for instance
took a long time to mature in Chicago and Detroit, now there is no time,
once an idea is out of the rabbit’s hat it’s copied ad infinitum until
the energy is gone. That is the key word – ‘energy’, it’s the one thing
I have always been inspired by. For me those _Death Of Rave_ tracks are
about stripping Rave music from all its energy and spirit of fun –
taking the audio from the Rave to the grave, if you like.’ The tracks
are like energy flashbacks, frail figments of Rave reconstructed in a
serotonin-depleted brain.

Kirby’s other project The Stranger is organised around space rather than
time. ‘The Stranger really is a darker version of The Caretaker,’ Kirby
says, ‘and is its closest relative. The Stranger is about creating a
physical location in sound. The last album for example [2008’s
_Bleaklow]_ was about the site of Bleaklow which is in the Peak
District, it can be a grim place on the dark grey days but also
beautiful on sunny days. Weirdly I had a few people get in touch with me
who walk up there and they told me I captured the atmosphere perfectly
and they used it as they were walking up there. I guess the odd glint of
sunshine coming through that slate northern grey sky could be heard
aurally.’

Kirby himself now lives in Berlin. ‘I moved to Berlin as it has the
atmosphere and opportunities of the big city but also there’s a lot of
space here to think more and also it’s easy to hide away on the dark
streets here. Also it’s not as brutal as Manchester here, there is more
of an openess as people don’t follow the media and news so much.’ Like
The Stranger, though, The Caretaker remains a project rooted in
Britishness – ‘it’s often only British music which has been used as
source material.’ A parallel for The Caretaker’s excavation of pre-rock
British pop is Dennis Potter’s musical drama for television, _Pennies
From Heaven_. ‘The use of audio in _Pennies From Heaven_ is amazing
along with its vibrancy and colour and of course the way Dennis Potter
uses the sadness in the lyrics to keep telling the story is also special
as these songs really are stories in themselves. John Clifford and Herk
Harvey’s film _Carnival of Souls_ (1962) was also a point of reference,
the closing scenes in that film could even be audio from _A Stairway To
The Stars_. I only saw that film after people had mentioned it to me. It
works a lot that way, people will draw a line to something and I will
then investigate that too.’

But of course the main initial impetus for The Caretaker was Kubrick’s
_The Shining_. The name ‘the caretaker’ was taken from the role that
Jack Torrance is condemned to forever play in the haunted Overlook hotel
(‘you’ve always been the caretaker’, Torrance is told in one of the
film’s most chilling moments). The conceit was simple: inspired by ‘the
haunting sequences which feature the ballroom music which is playing
only in Jack’s mind’, Kirby thought, why not make a whole album of
material that might also have played in the Overlook? _The Shining_
soundtrack includes two tracks by Al Bowlly, the between-the-wars
crooner whose songs features in many of Potter’s dramas, and Kirby
sought out music in a similar vein. ‘I spent a lot of time searching out
music from that era over a two or three year period and constantly
started to play around with this source material. The interesting thing
for me is the fact that most of that music is about ghosts and loss as
it was recorded between both the world wars. It’s of a totally different
era and had more or less been forgotten. Titles inspired new ideas as
did the audio itself. I was fortunate as there was a great record shop
near where I was in Stockport which was ran by two old guys and it
specialised in 78s. I would take in audio and ask then what was similar
and they would scuttle off into the back of the shop and dig out some
old catalogue from the 1930s and then pull out vinyls for me. It was an
amazing resource sadly which is no longer there as one of the guys
passed away and the other decided to close the shop. It was like a
timewarp in there, like going back 30 or 40 years. They would hand write
receipts and half of their stock was in this backroom you were denied
access too. They had no idea what I was doing in there buying these
records, though one of them told me one time ‘You were born in the wrong
era as nobody is interested in this music who is your age.”

Kirby has tuned to more recent history for an upcoming project. ‘It has
been in my mind for a while to work on a Scragill/Thatcher project and
this is the perfect time for this now as we approach the 25th
anniversary of the Miners Strike. A lot has been written elsewhere about
this conflict and its outcome and legacy, I have been scouring online
and also have picked up some amazing footage to reprocess. It will link
closely to The Caretaker in terms of its style as it will be like
watching a half remembered version due to the processing. Some of the
footage is totally ghostlike as it was recorded on VHS tapes from Miners
back in 1984, so there is a real loss in quality and the sound fails to
match the visuals. It’s looking like a dream version maybe. This will be
mainly video work with also an incredibly limited vinyl release
featuring audio from these videos and some exclusive audio work.’ This
will fit into a series of re-stagings of the Miners Strike this decade,
including Jeremy Deller and Artangel’s _The Battle Of Orgreave_ and
David Peace’s _GB84_.

Kirby decided to close V/Vm down last year. ‘V/Vm was a vehicle for a
lot of the work I have done but I think now as music consumers we have
reached a point where labels are not so important, what is more
important is delivery and availability of work.’ It is partly the
possibilities for the online distribution of music, which Kirby has
always been enthusiastic about, that led him to end V/Vm, but he ‘also
found I was using the name V/Vm less and less when it comes to new
works. I’ve been working on a very personal album in terms of moods I
want to convey and I guess I may use my own name for that.’ In fact, the
album, entitled _History Always Favours The Winners_, will come out
under the name Leyland Kirby (‘Leyland is my grandather’s and my middle
name. There are already too many James Kirby’s making music out there,
if I believe Google. Now I’m only competing with a glamour model from
Sheffield in the Google search.’) The Leyland Kirby music was made
without the use of samples, but it has clearly been informed by Kirby’s
time in the vaults. The tracks have an eerily untimely quality, a
stately grace, a filmic scope. On ‘When Did Our Dreams And Futures Drift
So Far Apart’, a doleful, echo-refracted piano desolately tracks through
subdued electronic textures. ‘The Sound Of Our Music Vanishing’ is a
more violent exercise in thwarted recall – here it as if the memories
are rushing in and being obliterated at the same time, like Basinski if
the tapes were being violently shredded instead of gently
disintegrating. The epic ‘When We Parted My Heart Wanted To Die’,
meanwhile, has a swelling, magisterial melancholy that recalls Angelo
Badalamenti.

The Caretaker project continues, however. ‘I have started to play shows
finally as The Caretaker, usually I just like to let the music just
creep out of the speakers as if it’s actually the venue playing the
audio or that the sounds are in your own mind. I played in Athens last
week in a pitch black room which worked well, maybe I can work some
visuals into the live process but they would have to add to the audio
and not distract the listening process. I am always of course interested
in playing more relevant locations, so for instance Blackpool Tower
would be amazing as the ballroom there is a great Victorian example and
perfect for this particular audio recall.’

‘More than anything it’s all about research and mood when making the
albums,’ Kirby replies when I ask him how he makes The Caretaker
records. ‘Knowing the source material, maybe hearing a lyrical phrase
which opens up an idea in my mind or indeed just reading something, such
as with the _Anterograde_ boxset which sparked off another idea and
offered a different tangent and possibility. Without going into the
specifics, things are reworked totally in a digital realm until the
right mood surfaces. It’s very important too that I am in the right mood
mentally to make that music which I think comes across certainly in the
later albums, as opposed maybe to the first album. I am getting better
at realising the days when I get the best results now when working on a
specific project. It’s strange really because there is a full range of
emotions in the music when I listen back, from loss to happiness,
dislocation, regret, longing. Maybe it’s the source music itself which
inspires this, but there are still for me a lot of personal moments in
amongst those albums. Maybe even some of my own memories are intertwined
in there.’

The word ‘research’ keeps coming up in Kirby’s discussion of The
Caretaker project. ‘I have been doing a lot of online research in the
last couple of years and also have been watching a lot of documentaries
about people who suffer from brain disorders and memory problems. The
last release [2008’s _Persistent Repetition of Phrases]_ was based
around a lot of conditions where the sufferer just repeats themselves,
so the audio featured a lot of loops and microloops, it was a lot warmer
and more gentle than the boxset release. Not all memories are
necessarily bad or disturbing memories.’ On _Persistent Repetition of
Phrases_, one of _The Wire’s_ top ten records of last year, there was
accordingly a return of the some of the prettiness that was absent from
_Theoretically Pure Anterograde Amnesia_, but there was also an icy
lucidity, an exquisite poise, about the record. It felt like a
distillation and a consolidation. ‘The challenge now is to move the
sound somewhere else brainwise and memory wise, that will take time to
find the new direction. More research will have to be done before I find
the best pathway for future exploration. I would also love to use this
music on film as it would be perfect for this, so maybe a door will open
somewhere.’



HOME IS WHERE THE HAUNT IS: _THE SHINING’S_ HAUNTOLOGY


_k-punk post, January 23, 2006_

1. The sound of hauntology

Conjecture: hauntology has an intrinsically sonic dimension.

The pun – hauntology, ontology – works in spoken French, after all. In
terms of sound, hauntology is a question of hearing what is not here,
the recorded voice, the voice no longer the guarantor of presence (Ian
P: ‘Where does the Singer’s voice GO, when it is erased from the dub
track?’) Not phonocentrism but phonography, sound coming to occupy the
dis-place of writing.

Nothing here but us recordings…

2. Ghosts of the Real

Derrida’s neologism uncovers the space between Being and Nothingness.

_The Shining_ – in both book and film versions, and here I suggest a
side-stepping of the wearisome struggle between King fans and
Kubrickians and propose treating the novel and the film as a
labyrinth-rhizome, a set of interlocking correspondences and
differences, a row of doors – is about what lurks, unquiet, in that
space. Insofar as they continue to frighten us once we’ve left the
cinema, the ghosts that dwell here are not supernatural. As with
_Vertigo_ (1958), in _The Shining_ it is only when the possibility of
supernatural spooks has been laid to rest that we can confront the Real
ghosts…or the ghosts of the Real.

3. The haunted ballroom

Mark Sinker: ‘ALL [Kubrick’s] films are fantastically ‘listenable’ (if
you use this in sorta the same sense you use watchable)’

_Where does_

The conceit of The Caretaker’s _Memories from the Haunted Ballroom_ has
the simplicity of genius: a whole album’s worth of songs that you might
have heard playing in the Gold Room in The Shining’s Overlook Hotel.
_Memories from the Haunted Ballroom_ is a series of soft-focus
delirial-oneiric versions of 20s and 30s tearoom pop tunes, the original
numbers drenched in so much reverb that they have dissolved into a
suggestive audio-fog, the songs all the more evocative now that they
have been reduced to hints of themselves. Thus Al Bowlly’s ‘It’s All
Forgotten Now’, for instance, one of the tracks actually used by Kubrick
on The Shining soundtrack, is slurred down, faded in and out, as if it
is being heard in the ethereal wireless of the dreaming mind or played
on the winding-down gramophone of memory. As Ian Penman wrote of dub:
‘It makes of the Voice not a self-possession but a dispossession – a
‘re’ possession by the studio, detoured through the hidden circuits of
the recording console.’

_the singer’s voice_

_GO?_

4. In the Gold Room

Jameson: ‘it is by the twenties that the hero is haunted and possessed…’

Kubrick’s editing of the film does not allow any of the polyvalencies of
that phrase, ‘It’s All Forgotten Now’, to go un(re)marked. The
uncanniness of the song, today and 25 years ago when the film was
released, arises from the (false but unavoidable) impression that it is
commenting on itself and its period, as if were an example of the way in
which that era of beautiful and damned decadence and Gatsby glamour were
painfully, delightfully aware of its own butterfly’s wing evanescence
and fragility. Simultaneously, the song’s place in the film – it plays
in the background as a bewildered Jack speaks to Grady in the bathroom
about the fact that Grady has killed himself after brutally murdering
his children – indicates that what is forgotten may also be preserved:
through the mechanism of repression.

I don’t have any recollection of that at all.

Why does this Gold Room Pop, all those moonlight serenades and summer
romances, have such power? The Caretaker’s spectralised versions of
those lost tunes only intensifies something that Kubrick, like Dennis
Potter, had identified in the pop of the 20s and 30s. I’ve tried to
write before about the peculiar aching quality of these songs that are
melancholy even at their most ostensibly joyful, forever condemned to
stand in for states that they can evoke but never instantiate.

For Fredric Jameson, the Gold Room revels bespeak a nostalgia for ‘the
last moment in which a genuine American leisure class led an aggressive
and ostentatious public existence, in which an American ruling class
projected a class-conscious and unapologetic image of itself and enjoyed
its privileges without guilt, openly and armed with its emblems of
top-hat and champagne glass, on the social stage in full view of the
other classes’. But the significance of this genteel, conspicuous
hedonism must be construed psychoanalytically as well as merely
historically. The ‘past’ here is not an actual historical period so much
as a fantasmatic past, a Time that can only ever be retrospectively –
retrospectrally – posited. The ‘haunted ballroom’ functions in Jack’s
libidinal echonomy (to borrow a neologism from Irigaray) as the place of
belonging in which, impossibly, the demands of both the paternal and the
maternal superegos can be met, the honeyed, dreamy utopia where doing
his duty would be equivalent to enjoying himself…Thus, after his
conversations with bartender Lloyd and waiter Grady (Jack’s frustrations
finding a blandly indulgent blank mirror sounding board in the former
and a patrician, patriarchal voice in the latter), Jack comes to believe
that he would be failing in his duty as a man and a father if he didn’t
succumb to his desire to kill his wife and child.

White man’s burden, Lloyd…white man’s burden…

If the Gold Room seems to be a male space (it’s no accident that the
conversation with Grady takes place in the men’s room), the place in
which Jack – via male intermediaries, intercessors working on behalf of
the hotel management, the house, the house that pays for his drinks –
faces up to his ‘man’s burdens’, it is also the space in which he can
succumb to the injunction of the maternal super-ego: ‘Enjoy’.

Michel Ciment: ‘When Jack arrives at the Overlook, he describes this
sensation of familiarity, of well-being (‘It’s very homey’), he would
‘like to stay here forever’, he confesses even to having ‘never been
this happy, or comfortable anywhere’, refers to a sense of dèja vu and
has the feeling that he has ‘been here before’. ‘When someone dreams of
a locality or a landscape,’ according to Freud, ‘and while dreaming
thinks “I know this, I’ve been here before”, one is authorised to
interpret that place as substituting for the genital organs and the
maternal body.’

5. Patriarchy/hauntology

Isn’t Freud`s thesis – first advanced in _Totem and Taboo_ and then
repeated, with a difference, in _Moses and Monotheism_, simply this:
patriarchy is a hauntology? The father – whether the obscene Alpha Ape
Pere-Jouissance of _Totem and Taboo_ or the severe, forbidding patriarch
of Moses and Monotheism – is inherently spectral. In both cases, the
Father is murdered by his resentful children who want to re-take Eden
and access total enjoyment. Their father’s blood on their hands, the
children discover, too late, that total enjoyment is not possible. Now
stricken by guilt, they find that the dead Father survives – in the
mortification of their own flesh, and in the introjected voice which
demands its deadening.

6. A History of Violence

Ciment: ‘The camera itself – with its forward, lateral and reverse
tracking shots…following a rigorously geometric circuit – adds further
to the sense of implacable logic and an almost mathematical
progression.’

Even before he enters the Overlook, Jack is fleeing his ghosts. And the
horror, the absolute horror, is that he – haunter and the hunted – flees
to the place where they are waiting. Such is _The Shining’s_ pitiless
fatality (and the novel is if anything even more brutal in its
diagramming of the network of cause–and–effect, the awful Necessity, the
‘generalized determinism’, of Jack’s plight than the film).

Jack has a history of violence. In both novel and film of _The Shining_,
the Torrance family is haunted by the prospect that Jack will hurt
Danny…again. Jack has already snapped, drunkenly attacked Danny. An
aberration, a miscalculation, ‘a momentary loss of muscular
coordination. A few extra foot-pounds of energy per second, per second’:
so Jack tries to convince Wendy, and Wendy tries to convince herself.
The novel tells us more. How has it come to this, that a proud man, an
educated man, like Jack, is reduced to sitting there, false, greasy grin
plastered all over his face, sucking up everything that a smarmy
corporate non-entity like Stuart Ulman serves up? Why, because he has
been sacked from his teaching job for attacking a pupil, of course. That
is why Jack will accept, and be glad of, Ulman’s menial job in Overlook.

The history of violence goes back even further. One of the things
missing from the film but dealt with at some length in the novel is the
account of Jack’s relationship with his father. It’s another version of
patriarchy’s occult history, now not so secret: abuse begetting abuse.
Jack is to Danny as Jack’s father was to him. And Danny will be to his
child…?

The violence has been passed on, like a virus. It’s there inside Jack,
like a photograph waiting to develop, a recording ready to be played.

Refrain, refrain…

7. Home is where the haunt is

The word ‘haunt’ and all the derivations thereof may be one of the
closest English word to the German ‘unheimlich’, whose polysemic
connotations and etymological echoes Freud so assiduously, and so
famously, unravelled in his essay on ‘The Uncanny’. Just as ‘German
usage allows the familiar (das Heimliche, the ‘homely’) to switch to its
opposite, the uncanny (das Unheimliche, the ‘unhomely’)’ (Freud), so
‘haunt’ signifies both the dwelling-place, the domestic scene and that
which invades or disturbs it. The OED lists one of the earliest meanings
of the word ‘haunt’ as ‘to provide with a home, house.’

Fittingly, then, the best interpretations of The Shining position it
between melodrama and horror, much as Cronenberg’s _History of Violence_
(2005) is positioned between melodrama and the action film. In both
cases, the worst Things, the real Horror, is already Inside…. (and what
could be worse than that?)

You would never hurt Mommie or me, would ya?

8. The house always wins

What horrors does the big, looming house present? For the women of
Horrodrama, it has threatened non-Being, either because the woman will
be unable to differentiate herself from the domestic space or because –
as in Rebecca (itself an echo of Jane Eyre) – she will be unable to take
the place of a spectral-predecessor. Either way, she has no access to
the proper name. Jack’s curse, on the other hand, is that he is nothing
but the carrier of the patronym, and everything he does always will have
been the case.

I’m sorry to differ with you, sir. But you are the caretaker. You’ve
always been the caretaker. I should know, sir. I’ve always been here.

9. I’m right behind you Danny

Metz: ‘When Jack chases Danny into the maze with ax in hand and states,
‘I`m right behind you Danny’, he is predicting Danny`s future as well as
trying to scare the boy.’

Predicting Danny`s future Jack might be, but that is why he could
equally well say ‘I’m just ahead of you Danny…’ Danny may physically
have escaped Jack, but psychically…? The Shining leaves us with the
awful suspicion that Danny may become (his) Daddy, that the damage has
already been done (had already been done even before he was born), that
the photograph has been taken, the recording made; all that is left is
the moment of development, of playing back.

Unmask!

(And how does Danny escape from Jack? By walking backwards in his
father’s footsteps).

10. The No Time of trauma

Jack: Mr. Grady. You were the caretaker here. I recognise ya. I saw your
picture in the newspapers. You, uh, chopped your wife and daughters up
into little bits. And then you blew your brains out.

Grady: That’s strange, sir. I don’t have any recollection of that at
all.

What is the time when Jack meets Grady?

It seems that the murder – and suicide – has already happened, Grady
tells Jack that he had to correct his daughters. Yet – not surprisingly
– Grady has no memory – Bowlly’s ‘It’s All Forgotten Now’ wafting in the
background – of any such events.

‘I don’t have any recollection of that at all.’

(And you think, well, it’s not the sort of thing that you’d forget,
killing yourself and your children, is it? But of course, it’s not the
sort of thing that you could possibly remember. It is an exemplary case
of that which must be repressed, the traumatic Real.)

Jack: Mr. Grady. You were the caretaker here.

Grady: I’m sorry to differ with you, sir. But you are the caretaker.
You’ve always been the caretaker. I should know, sir. I’ve always been
here.

11. Overlooked

Overlook:

To look over or at from a higher place.

To fail to notice or consider; miss.



HAUNTOLOGICAL BLUES: LITTLE AXE


_k-punk post, October 3, 2006_

Since we’re talking about hauntology, we ought to have mentioned
_Beloved_ by now: not only Morrison’s novel, but also Demme’s
astonishing film. It’s telling that Demme is celebrated for his silly
grand guignol, _The Silence of the Lambs_, while _Beloved_ is forgotten,
repressed, screened out. Hopkins’ pantomime ham turn as Lecter surely
spooks no-one, whereas Thandie Newton’s automaton-stiff,
innocent-malevolent performance as Beloved is almost unberable:
grotesque, disturbing, moving in equal measure.

Like _The Shining_ – a film that was also widely dismissed for nigh on a
decade – _Beloved_ (1998) reminds us that America, with its anxious
hankerings after an ‘innocence’ it can never give up on, is haunted by
haunting itself. If there are ghosts, then what was supposed to be a New
Beginning, a clean break, turns out to be a repetition, the same old
story. The ghosts were meant to have been left in the Old World…but here
they are…

Whereas _The Shining_ digs beneath the hauntological structure of the
American family and finds an Indian Burial Ground, _Beloved_ pitches us
right into the atrocious heart of America’s _other_ genocide: slavery
and its aftermath. No doubt the film’s commercial failure was in part
due to the fact that the wounds are too raw, the ghosts too Real. When
you leave the cinema, there is no escape from these spectres, these
apparitions of a Real which will not go away but which cannot be faced.
Some viewers complain that _Beloved_ should have been reclassifed as
Horror…well, so should American history…

_Beloved_ comes to mind often as I listen to _Stone Cold Ohio_, the
outstanding new LP by Little Axe. Little Axe have been releasing records
for over a decade now, but, in the 90s, my nervous system amped up by
jungle’s crazed accelerations, I wasn’t ready to be seduced by their
lugubrious dub blues. In 2006, however, the haunted bayous of _Stone
Cold Ohio_ take their place alongside Burial’s phantom-stalked South
London and Ghost Box’s abandoned television channels in hauntological
Now. Since I received _Stone Cold Ohio_ last week, I’ve listened to
little else; and when I wasn’t immersed in _Stone Cold Ohio_ I was
re-visiting the other four Little Axe LPs. The combination of
skin-tingling voices (some original, some sampled) with dub space and
drift is deeply addictive. Little Axe’s world is entrancing, vivid,
often harrowing; it’s easy to get lost in these thickets and fogs, these
phantom plantations built on casual cruelty, these makeshift churches
that nurtured collective dreams of escape…

_Shepherds…_

_Do you hear the lambs are crying?_

Little Axe’s records are wracked with collective grief. Spectral
harmonicas resemble howling wolves; echoes linger like wounds that will
never heal; the voices of the living harmonise with the voices of the
dead in songs thick with reproach, recrimination and the hunger for
redemption. Yet utopian longings also stir in the fetid swamps and
unmarked graveyards; there are moments of unbowed defiance and fugitive
joy here too.

_I know my name is written in the Kingdom…_.

Little Axe is Skip McDonald’s project. Through his involvement with the
likes of Ohio Players, the Sugarhill Gang and Mark Stewart, McDonald has
always been associated with future-orientated pop. If Little Axe appear
at first sight to be a retreat from full-on future shock – McDonald
returning to his first encounter with music, when he learned blues on
his father’s guitar – we are not dealing here the familiar, tiresome
story of a ‘mature’ disavowal of modernism in the name of a re-treading
of Trad form. In fact, Little Axe’s anachronistic temporality can be
seen as yet another rendering of future shock; except that this time, it
is the vast unassimilable trauma, the SF catastrophe, of slavery that is
being confronted. (Perhaps it always was…)

Even though Little Axe are apt to be described as ‘updating the blues
for the 21st century’ they could equally be seen as downdating the 21st
century into the early 20th. Their dyschronia is reminiscent of those
moments in Stephen King’s _It_ where old photographs come to (a kind of)
life, and there is a hallucinatory suspension of sequentiality. Or,
better, to the time slips in Octavia Butler’s _Kindred_, where
contemporary characters are abducted back into the waking nightmare of
slavery. (The point being: the nightmare never really ended…)

There is no doubt that blues has a privileged position in pop’s
metaphysics of presence: the image of the singer-songwriter alone with
his guitar provides rockism with its emblem of authenticity and
authorship. But Little Axe’s return to the supposed beginnings unsettles
this by showing that there were ghosts at the origin. Hauntology is the
proper temporal mode for a history made up of gaps, erased names and
sudden abductions. The traces of gospel, spirituals and blues out of
which _Stone Cold Ohio_ is assembled are not the relics of a lost
presence, but the fragments of a time permanently out of joint. These
musics were vast collective works of mourning and melancholia. Little
Axe confront American history as a single ‘empire of crime’, where the
War on Terror decried on _Stone Cold Ohio’s_ opening track – a post 9/11
re-channelling of Blind Willie Johnson’s ‘If I had My Way’ – is
continuous with the terrordome of slavery.

When I interviewed Skip, he emphasised that Little Axe tracks always
begins with the samples. The origin is out of joint. He has described
before the anachronising Method-ology he uses to transport himself into
the past. ‘I like to surf time. What I like to do is study time-periods
– get right in to ‘em, so deep it gets real heavy in there.’ McDonald’s
deep immersion in old music allows him to travel back in time and the
ghosts to move forward. It is a kind of possession (recalling Winfrey’s
claim that she and the cast were ‘possessed’ when they were making
_Beloved)_. Little Axe’s records skilfully mystify questions of
authorship and attribution, origination and repetition. It is difficult
to disentangle sampling from songwriting, impossible to draw firm lines
between a cover version and an original song. Songs are texturally-dense
palimpsests, accreted rather than authored. McDonald’s own vocals, by
turns doleful, quietly enraged and affirmatory, are often doubled as
well as dubbed. They and the modern instrumentation repeatedly sink into
grainy sepia and misty trails of reverb, falling into a dyschronic
contemporeanity with the crackly samples.

In his landmark piece on Tricky (the piece, really, in which sonic
hauntology was first broached), Ian Penman complained about Greil
Marcus’ ‘measured humanism which leaves little room for the UNCANNY in
music’. Part of the reason Little Axe are intriguing is that their use
of dub makes it possible for us to encounter blues as uncanny and
untimely again. Little Axe position blues not as part of American
history, as Marcus does, but as one corner of the Black Atlantic. What
makes the combination of blues and dub far more than a gimmick is that
there is an uncanny logic behind the superimposition of two corners of
the Black Atlantic over one another.

Adrian Sherwood’s role in the band is crucial. Sherwood has said that
Little Axe take inspiration from the thought that there is a common
ground to be found in ‘the music of Captain Beefheart and Prince Far I,
King Tubby and Jimi Hendrix’. In the wrong hands, a syncresis like this
could end up as a recipe for stodgy, Whole Earth humanism. But Sherwood
is a designer of OtherWorld music, an expert in eeriness, a kind of
anti-Jools Holland. What is most pernicious about Holland is the way in
which, under his stewardship, pop is de-artificialised, re-naturalised,
blokily traced back to a facialised source. Dub, evidently, goes in
exactly the opposite direction – it estranges the voice, or points up
the voice’s inherent strangeness. When I interviewed Sherwood, he was
delighted by my description of his art as ‘schizophonic’ – Sherwood
detaches sounds from sources, or at least occults the relationship
between the two. The tyranny of Holland’s _Later_ … has corresponded
with the rise of no-nonsense pop which suppresses the role of recording
and production. But ‘Dub was a breakthrough because the seam of its
recording was turned inside out for us to hear and exult in; when we had
been used to the “re” of recording being repressed, recessed, as though
it really were just a re-presentation of something that already existed
in its own right.’ (Penman)

Hence what I have called dubtraction; and what is subtracted, first of
all, is _presence_. Pierre Schaeffer’s term for a sound that is detached
from a source is ‘acousmatic’. The dub producer, then, is an
acousmatician, a manipulator of sonic phantoms that have been detached
from live bodies. Dub time is unlive, and the producer’s necromantic
role – his raising of the dead – is doubled by his treating of the
living as if dead. For Little Axe, as for the bluesmen and the Jamaican
singers and players they channel, hauntology is a political gesture: a
sign that the dead will not be silenced.

_I’m a prisoner_

_Somehow I will be free_



NOSTALGIA FOR MODERNISM: THE FOCUS GROUP AND BELBURY POLY


‘Myself and my friend Jim Jupp had been making music, independently and
together for a while, and also obsessing over the same things – the
cosmic horror of Machen, Lovecraft, the Radiophonic Workshop, weird folk
and the occult. We realised that we wanted to put our music out, but
also create our own world where we could play with all these reference
points. Starting our own label was the only way to do it.’ Julian House
is describing how he and his school-friend Jim Jupp came to found the
Ghost Box label.

Off-kilter bucolic, drenched in an over-exposed post-psyche-delic sun,
Ghost Box recordings are uneasy listening to the letter. If nostalgia
famously means ‘homesickness’, then Ghost Box sound is about
unhomesickness, about the uncanny spectres entering the domestic
environment through the cathode ray tube. At one level, the Ghost Box is
television itself; or a television that has disappeared, itself become a
ghost, a conduit to the Other Side, now only remembered by those of a
certain age. No doubt there comes a point when every generation starts
pining for the artefacts of its childhood – but was there something
special about the TV of the 1970s which Ghost Box releases obsessively
reference?

‘I think there definitely was something powerful about the children’s TV
from that period,’ House maintains. ‘I think it was just after the 60s,
these musicians and animators, film makers had come through the
psychedelic thing and acid folk, they had these strange dark obsessions
that they put into their TV programmes. Also, someone like Nigel Kneale
had obviously come from a tradition of HP Lovecraft – 20th century
science used as a background to cosmic horror and the occult. The themes
he explored in the Quatermass series eventually found their way into
Doctor Who, _Children of the Stones, Sapphire and Steel_. If you look at
the BBC Radiophonic workshop, people like David Cain also studied
medieval music, and he did a great dark folky electronic album called
_The Seasons_. And a few of Paddy Kingsland’s arrangements bring to mind
Pentangle. It’s like there was this strange past/future thing which had
come through psychedelia.’

The affect produced by Ghost Box’s releases (sound _and_ images, the
latter absolutely integral) are the direct inverse of irritating
postmodern citation-blitz. The mark of the postmodern is the extirpation
of the uncanny, the replacing of the unheimlich tingle of unknowingness
with a cocksure knowingness and hyper-awareness. Ghost Box, by contrast,
is a conspiracy of the half-forgotten, the poorly remembered and the
confabulated. Listening to sample-based sonic genres like Jungle and
early hip-hop you typically found yourself experiencing _déjà vudu_ or
_déjà entendu_, in which a familiar sound, estranged by sampling, nagged
just beyond recognisability. Ghost Box releases conjure a sense of
_artificial_ déjà vu, where you are duped into thinking that what you
are hearing has its origin somewhere in the late 60s or early 70s: not
false, but simulated, memory. The spectres in Ghost Box’s hauntology are
the lost contexts which, we imagine, must have prompted the sounds we
are hearing: forgotten programmes, uncommissioned series, pilots that
were never followed-up.

Belbury Poly, The Focus Group, Eric Zann – names from an alternative 70s
that never ended, a digitally-reconstructed world in which analogue
rules forever, a time-scrambled Moorcockian near-past. This return to
the analogue via the digital is one of the ways in which Ghost Box
records are not straight-up simulations of the past. ‘We like to confuse
the boundaries between analogue and digital. Jim uses a combination of
analogue synths and digital technology. In the Focus Group stuff there
are samples of old percussion albums and digital effects, electronic
sounds generated on the computer and processed found sounds. I think
it’s do with this space between what happens in the computer and what
happens outside of it. The recording of space, real reverb/room sound
and the virtual space on the hard drive. Like different dimensions.’

‘It was bang on 1980 when Fairlights and DX7s appeared in electronic
music,’ Jupp points out. ‘I suppose that digital technology is a tipping
point in culture in general, even in the way that television is made.’
Yet Belbury Poly’s sound relies on digital equipment. ‘At the heart of
it is a computer and we don’t hide that fact. Having said that, I’m
sitting in the studio now and it’s mostly analogue synths and a pile of
acoustic instruments, what we do couldn’t exist without hip-hop and
sampling culture and the access to cheap electronic instruments. It’s
revisiting old textures and old imagined worlds with new tools.’

Jupp laughs when I suggest that there was a certain _grain_ to 70s
British culture that got smoothed away by 80s style culture gloss. ‘It’s
almost as if we became totally Americanised, got our teeth fixed and had
a proper wash. I was talking to someone the other day whose girlfriend
can’t stand him watching old sitcoms, she always calls it grot TV. I
know what she means. But maybe in TV, radio and records then there was a
feel that was washed clean in the 80s when everything was angular,
digital, American, upbeat and colourful.’

Ghost Box explore a sonic continuum which stretches from the quirkily
cheery to the insinuatingly sinister. The most obvious predecessors lie
in ‘functional music’, sounds designed to hover at the edge of
perceptibility, not to hog centre-stage: signature tunes, incidental
music, music that is instantly recognizable but whose authors, more
often (self-)styled as technicians rather than artists, remain
anonymous. The Radiophonic Workshop (whose two ‘stars’, Delia Derbyshire
and Daphne Oram, became widely recognised only after their deaths) would
be the obvious template. House agrees: ‘I think the key reference is the
Radiophonic Workshop, which is wildly experimental (Britain’s electronic
avant garde, the equivalent of GRM Pierre Schaeffer in France etc.) but
it’s also incredibly evocative of radio and television with which we
grew up. It’s got a sort of duality to it, it’s haunting in its own
right but also serves as a memory trigger. I think this dim, half
remembered aspect of old Hammer films, Doctor Who, Quatermass is
important – it’s not like an I Love 1974 reminiscence. Rather than being
just nostalgia, it’s triggering something darker, you’re remembering the
strange ideas in these programmes, the stuff under the surface, rather
than just knowing the theme tune. I think this is why Library music is
such an influence – you listen to the albums divorced from context and
it operates on an unconscious level, like musical cues for missing
visuals.

When I grew up Doctor Who episodes like _The Sea Devils_ haunted me, the
way slightly shaky monsters and sets have their own uncanny horror. The
loud blasts of Atonal music. The first time I saw the Hammer film of
_Quatermass and the Pit_ really affected me. And those dimly remembered
eastern European animations had a certain quality. Also, certain public
information films and adverts.’

Ghost Box preside over a (slightly) alternative world in which the
Radiophonic Workshop were more important than the Beatles. In a sense
that is our world, because the Workshop rendered even the most
experimental rock obsolete even before it had happened. But of course
you are not comparing like with like here; the Beatles occupied front
stage in the Pop Spectacle, whereas the Radiophonic Workshop insinuated
their jingles, idents, themes and special FX into the weft of everyday
life. The Workshop was properly unheimlich, unhomely, fundamentally tied
up with a domestic environment that had been invaded by media.

Naturally, Ghost Box have been accused of nostalgia, and of course this
plays a part in their appeal. But their aesthetic in fact exhibits a
more paradoxical impulse: in a culture dominated by retrospection, what
they are nostalgic for is nothing less than (popular) modernism itself.
Ghost Box are at their most beguiling when they foreground dyschronia,
broken time – as on Belbury Poly’s ‘Caermaen’ (from 2004’s _The
Willows)_ and ‘Wetland’ (from 2006’s _The Owl’s Map)_ where folk voices
summoned from beyond the grave are made to sing new songs. Dyschronia is
integral to the Focus Group’s whole methodology; the joins are too
audible, the samples too jagged, for their tracks to sound like
refurbished artefacts.

In any case, at their best, Ghost Box conjure a past that never was.
Their artwork fuses the look of comprehensive school text books and
public service manuals with allusions to weird fiction, a fusion that
has more to do with the compressions and conflations of dreamwork than
with memory. House himself talks of ‘a strange dream of a school
textbook’. The implicit demand for such a space in Ghost Box inevitably
reminds us that the period since 1979 in Britain has seen the gradual
but remorseless destruction of the very concept of the public. At the
same time, Ghost Box also remind us that the people who worked in the
Radiophonic Workshop were effectively public servants, that they were
employed to produce a _weird_ public space – a public space very
different from the bureaucratic dreariness invoked by neoliberal
propaganda.

Public space has been consumed and replaced by something like the third
place exemplified by franchise coffee bars. These spaces are uncanny
only in their power to replicate sameness, and the monotony of the
Starbucks environment is both reassuring and oddly disorientating;
inside the pod, it’s possible to literally forget what city you are in.
What I have called nomadalgia is the sense of unease that these
anonymous environments, more or less the same the world over, provoke;
the travel sickness produced by moving through spaces that could be
anywhere. My, I… what happened to Our Space, or the idea of a public
that was not reducible to an aggregate of consumer preferences?

In Ghost Box, the lost concept of the public has a very palpable
presence-in-absence, via samples of public service announcements.
(Incidentally one connection between rave and Ghost Box is the Prodigy’s
sampling of this kind of announcement on ‘Charly’.) Public service
announcements – remembered because they could often be disquieting,
particularly for children – constitute a kind of reservoir of collective
unconscious material. The disinterment of such broadcasts now cannot but
play as the demand for a return of the very concept of public service.
Ghost Box repeatedly invoke public bodies – through names (Belbury Poly,
the Advisory Circle) and also forms (the tourist brochure, the
textbook).

Confronted with capital’s intense semiotic pollution, its encrustation
of the urban environment with idiotic sigils and imbecilic slogans
no-one – neither the people who wrote them nor those at whom they are
aimed – believes, you often wonder: what if all the effort that went
into this flashy trash were devoted to a public good? If for no other
reason, Ghost Box is worth treasuring because they make us pose that
question with renewed force.



THE ACHE OF NOSTALGIA: THE ADVISORY CIRCLE


_‘The Advisory Circle – helping you make the right decisions.’_ With its
suggestions of a benevolent bureaucracy, The Advisory Circle was always
the perfect name for a Ghost Box act. On _Mind How You Go_ (2005),
producer and vinyl archivist Jon Brooks produced a kind of
Anglo-analogue pastoralism that is as affecting as anything that the
label has released. In what has since been established to be the
customary Ghost Box fashion, Brooks’s analogue synthesizer doodles – all
the more powerful, somehow, for their unassuming slightness – gently
trigger drifts down (false) memory lanes, inducing you to recall a mass
mediated past which you never quite experienced. _Mind How You Go_
frequently invokes that talisman of 1970s paternalism, the Public
Information Film, and it’s perhaps no accident that the rise of Ghost
Box has coincided with the emergence of YouTube, which has made public
information films and other such street furniture of 1970s audio–visual
experience widely available again.

What Brooks captures extremely poignantly is the conflicted cluster of
emotions involved in nostalgic longing. ‘Mind How You Go’ and ‘Nuclear
Substation’ summon remembered sunlight from childhood summers even as
their doleful melodies are laced with a deep sense of loss. Yet there’s
a very definite but subdued joy here, too, in the way that a track such
as ‘Osprey’ achieves a kind of faltering soaring. It’s not for nothing
that the word _ache_ is often associated with nostalgia; and The
Advisory Circle’s music positively aches with a sadness that is
simultaneously painful and enjoyable. 2011’s _As The Crow Flies_ felt
folkier than The Advisory Circle’s previous releases, with acoustic
guitars creeping over the analogue synthesizers like ivy spreading over
the frontage of a brutalist building. The album’s closing track, ‘Lonely
Signalman’, brings these different textures together beautifully: its
vocodered refrain (‘signalman _lives all alone/ signalman is all
alone’)_ is simultaneously playful and plangent, a combination that is
typical of Brooks’s work. I asked Brooks about the roots of the
exquisite sadness that colours his music.

‘A lot of it stems from my childhood. Without wishing to go too far down
the ‘tortured artist’ path, I will say that my upbringing was a cyclic
period of safety, security, contentment, anxiety, despair and sadness.
As an adult, I’ve managed to work through a lot of these childhood
feelings and channel them into what I’m doing musically. Thankfully, I
can now make sense of a lot of stuff that happened back then; I can
balance this against any residual scars I might be left with. I’m not
saying I’m glad that I had a turbulent childhood, but for what it’s
worth, it has shaped my art, quite indelibly.’

A paradoxical impulse lies behind Brooks’s work. He is fascinated by
functional culture – that which we don’t consciously hear or see but
which shapes our experience of environments – yet the attention on what
was background necessarily pushes it into the foreground. 2011’s _Music
For Dieter Rams_, a homage to the designer best known for his work with
Braun released under Brooks’s name, was an attempt to bring functional
music together with functional design. Rams’s slogan ‘less, but better’
could equally apply to the original conception of Ambient music. After
all, What was the ambition for Ambient if not that music attain the
unassuming ubiquity of many of Rams’s products – all those radios,
coffee makers and calculators which were embedded into everyday life,
their designer unknown to the general public? Perhaps for that reason,
Brooks isn’t the first artist to dedicate music to Rams: Alva Noto
devoted two wonderfully eerie tracks on his _For 2_ album to the
designer. It’s those things lurking at the background of attention,
things that we took for granted at the time, which now evoke the past
most powerfully.

‘With hindsight,’ Brooks says, ‘the fact that these things are so
evocative of the past, accentuates and crystallises my interest in them;
but actually, I’ve always been interested in things ‘in the background’
– for me, that’s where the really interesting stuff has always been. As
a kid, I was equally fascinated by library music used on TV (or TV
themes) as I was about pop music; things that we weren’t supposed to
take any real notice of. I used to look out for TV test transmissions,
for example, and of course Public Information Films. Open University
broadcasts held the same fascination; these broadcasts weren’t targeted
at an eight-year-old child, but I was drawn towards them nonetheless. I
was also drawn to logos, branding and so forth. I remember being
particularly entranced by certain record labels’ logos – Polydor, Decca
and Pye were my favourites. I loved the way they looked on the records
and would quite often sit at the turntable and watch them go round, as
the record played. There was something very elegant about them. Again,
these things were presented as ‘functional’, in their own way. So, the
fascination was always there. It’s just stayed with me.’

Those objects and spaces are also functional. Is Brooks particularly
fascinated by culture that operates in this ostensibly functional way?

‘I am absolutely fascinated by that aspect. At the risk of being
slightly tangential, taking the concept of Muzak as an example, I very
much enjoyed reading Joseph Lanza’s _Elevator Music_. This is a great
example of bringing the background to the foreground, in the form of
strictly ‘functional’ music. It goes a step further in this respect than
even Library music does. I have always been fascinated by the cultural
aspect of this – how we can have small speakers installed in ceilings in
shops and the music just filters through and no-one is really supposed
to notice; they called it ‘non-entertainment music’ at the time. Muzak
gained a really bad reputation in the 1970s, but if you go back and
listen to some of the music that was produced for the system, you’ll
find some very tight, compact arrangements hidden in there. Composers
that are highly regarded by record collectors now, for example Sven
Libaek and Syd Dale, did a lot of work for Muzak. In much the same way,
I apply this fascination to domestic design or motorway service
stations. Dieter Rams was interested in creating something that just
worked, with elegance and simplicity. I love the fact that he wasn’t
searching for fame with his designs, but now we can celebrate those
designs publicly and hand him the spotlight, as it were, in much the
same way as we have discovered composers like Sven Libaek.’



SOMEONE ELSE’S MEMORIES: ASHER, PHILIP JECK, BLACK TO COMM, G.E.S., POSITION NORMAL, MORDANT MUSIC


In 2009, an artist known as Asher released an album called _Miniatures_
on the Sourdine label. The only information on the sleeve was the
following terse statement: ‘recorded in Somerville, MA, winter 2007’.
Rumours and mysteries proliferate in a data vacuum, and _Miniatures_
puts the listener into a state of suspension and suspicion: what exactly
are we listening to? Who made it? What does ‘making’ it mean in this
context? And what sense of ‘recorded’ is being used?

Let’s consider the audio facts, such as they are. Even here there is
veiling – all the tracks are covered in a fog of crackle. What we hear
is mostly piano, although occasionally strings can also be detected. The
piano is contemplative, reflective, exquisitely sad: the lugubrious
tempo seems to literalise the notion of longing. The haze of the crackle
and the quietness of the playing mean that you have to ‘lean in’ to hear
the music – played on ipod headphones, it practically disappears into
the background noise of the street.

How were the tracks made? At least two theories circulated online. One,
the closest there seems to be to any official story, maintains that the
tracks on _Miniatures_ were all short sections recorded by Asher from
the radio and then digitally looped. (If so, he should buy himself a
radio with better reception.) The other theory is that the piano pieces
were played by Asher on poor quality tape, then subjected to further
processes of digital distortion to give the impression that they are
found sound objects. The tracks’ unresolved status is not some dry
conceptual riddle detracting from the experience of listening to them;
instead, the enigma actually heightens the music’s fragile, fragmentary
beauty, its uncanny intimacy.

_Miniatures_ was one of a number of records from the 00s whose sound
centred on crackle. Why should crackle resonate now? The first thing we
can say is that crackle exposes a temporal pathology: it makes ‘out of
joint’ time audible. Crackle both invokes the past and marks out our
distance from it, destroying the illusion that we are co-present with
what we are hearing by reminding us we are listening to a recording.
Crackle now calls up a whole disappeared regime of materiality – a
tactile materiality, lost to us in an era where the sources of sound
have retreated from sensory apprehension. Artists like Tricky, Basic
Channel and Pole started to foreground vinyl crackle at the very moment
when records were becoming superseded. Back then, it was the CD that was
making vinyl obsolete. Now, the MP3 can neither be seen nor touched,
still less manipulated by the hand in the way that the vinyl record
could be.

The digital seems to promise nothing less than an escape from
materiality itself, and the story of Willam Basinski’s 2002 album
_Disintegration Loops_ – a recording of tapes that destroyed themselves
in the very process of their transfer to digital – is a parable (almost
too perfect) for the switch from the fragility of analogue to the
infinite replicability of digital. What we have lost, it can often seem,
is the very possibility of loss. Digital archiving means that the
fugitive evanescence that long ago used to characterise, for instance,
the watching of television programmes – seen once, and then only
remembered – has disappeared. Indeed, it turns out that experiences
which we thought were forever lost can – thanks to the likes of YouTube
– not only be recovered, but endlessly repeated.

Crackle, then, connotes the return of a certain sense of loss. At the
same time, it is also the sign of a found (audio) object, the indication
that we are in a scavenger’s space. That is why crackle is a
stock-in-trade of someone like turntable artist Philip Jeck. Jeck’s
first record had appeared in 1999, but his work gained a new currency
because of its convergence with what Burial and The Caretaker were
doing. Jeck had been inspired by hearing mixers like Walter Gibbons,
Larry Levan and Grandmaster Flash in the 80s, but his montages
reconceive DJing as the art of producing sonic phantasmagoria. Using
Dansette turntables, FX units and records found in charity shops, Jeck
defamiliarises the vinyl source material to the point of
near-abstraction. Occasionally, recognizable fragments (60s rock,
Mantovani-like lite classical kitsch) thrillingly bob up out of the
whooshing delirium-stream.

Jeck began the extraordinary 2008 version of Gavin Bryars’ _The Sinking
of the Titanic_ (which he performed in collaboration with Italian
ensemble Alter Ego and Bryars himself) with nearly 14 minutes of
crackle. In this audio-fog, threatening objects loom, barely perceived.
As we listen, we come to distrust our own hearing, begin to lose
confidence in our ability to distinguish what is actually there from
audio hallucinations. Ominous strings and a solitary bell produce an
atmosphere of quiet foreboding, and the ensemble – at first indistinct
shadows in a Turner-esque squall – only gradually emerge from the cloud
of crepitation. Here, as in Asher’s _Miniatures_, crackle suggests radio
static. The sinking of the Titanic in fact prompted the first use of
wireless in sea rescue. As Bryars points out in his sleevenotes, Marconi
had conceived of telegraphy as a spectral science. He ‘became convinced
that sounds once generated never die, they simply become fainter and
fainter until we no longer perceive them. Marconi’s hope was to develop
sufficiently sensitive equipment, extraordinarily powerful and selective
filters I suppose, to pick up and hear these past sounds. Ultimately, he
hoped to be able hear Christ delivering the Sermon on the Mount.’

Jeck has referred to the sonic sources he uses as ‘fragments of memory,
triggering associations’ but it is crucial that the memories are not
necessarily his; the effect is sometimes like sifting through a box of
slides, photographs and postcards from anonymous people, long gone. This
same feeling of coming upon other people’s orphaned memories could be
heard in the 2009 album _Circulations_ by G.E.S. (Gesellschaft zur
Emanzipation des Samples/ Society For The Emancipation Of Sampling).
There is some mystery about who is behind G.E.S., but the project
appears to be a front for genre-hopping dilettante Jan Jelinek, best
known for his _Loop-finding Jazz Records_, which constructed a version
of minimal Techno out of minuscule jazz samples; Jelinek has also
produced microhouse under the name Farben and Ambient as Gramm. G.E.S.’s
idea was to take micro-samples, loop and collage them, play them in
public spaces, and record the results. Would the ordinary laws of
copyright apply if music was sampled in these conditions? The tracks are
like unsigned audio-postcards, recorded sometimes in named places (Mount
Zermatt and Hong Kong are mentioned in the track titles), sometimes in
places we can only guess at, using the voices and background noises to
orientate ourselves. ‘Birds Of Heraklion’ begins with distorted
electronic pulses before being swept up by a backwards rush of very
cinematic strings that sound like they might have come from a black and
white film extolling the benefits of train travel. ‘Orinoco, Bullerbü,
(Crossfade)’ is initially built from the violent juxtaposition of crazed
bird noises with what could be a sample from some forgotten film noir or
a highly strung melodrama, but it ends with echoes, and strange,
abstract whistles. ‘Im Schilf’ puts one in mind of the kind of alien
piping noises you would hear in an Oliver Postgate animation or an early
Cabaret Voltaire tape experiment, while ‘Farnballett’ and ‘Farnballett
(In Dub)’ recall a Binatone tennis game having a HAL-like nervous
breakdown. The random sounds, the passing conversations, make you feel
like you are witnessing stray frames from a film no whole version of
which exists anywhere. This sense that action is continuing beyond what
we are hearing, together with the record’s travelogue-cosmopolitanism,
remind me of nothing so much as the cold, dislocated beauty of
Antonioni’s _The Passenger_. The closing track, ‘Schlaf (Nach Einführung
Der Psychoanalyse)’ – which sounds like windchimes on some dust-blown
alien planet – is like a memory of a Cold War science fiction that never
quite happened. What stops this being a dry exercise or a disparate
mélange is the inescapable sense of anonymous sadness which pervades the
whole record.

This same sense of depersonalised tragedy hung over _Alphabet 1968_, the
2010 album by Black to Comm, aka Marc Richter, the man behind the ‘death
Ambient’ genre and the Hamburg-based Dekorder label. Richter
mischievously described _Alphabet 1968_ – on which the only human voices
are on field recordings at the edge of audibility – as an album of
_songs_. What if we were to take Richter’s provocation seriously – what
would a song without a singer be like? What would it be like, that is to
say, if objects themselves could sing? It’s a question that connects
fairy tales with cybernetics, and listening to _Alphabet 1968_, I’m
fittingly reminded of a filmic space in which magic and mechanism meet:
J F Sebastian’s apartment in _Blade Runner_. The tracks on the album are
crafted with the same minute attention to detail that the genetic
designer and toymaker Sebastian brought to his plaintive automata, with
their bizarre mixture of the clockwork and the computerised, the antique
and the ultramodern, the playful and the sinister. Richter’s pieces have
been built from similarly heterogeneous materials – record crackle,
shortwave radio, glockenspiels, all manner of samples, mostly of
acoustic instruments. Except on ‘Void’ – a steampunk John Carpenter-like
track with susurrating voices conspiring in the background – the music
does not feel very electronic. As with Sebastian’s talking machines, you
get the impression that Richter has used the latest technology in order
to create the illusion of archaism. This is a record in which you feel
that you can smell the dust coming off the retrieved objects. But so
intricately are these sonic palimpsests layered that it’s impossible to
determine what Richter and his collaborators have played and what has
been conjured from the archives. The sounds are treated, reversed and
slowed down in a way that makes their original sources mysterious. There
is a sense of subtle but constant movement, of sound shadows flitting in
and out of earshot.

Richter so successfully effaces himself as author that it is as if he
has snuck into a room and recorded objects as they played (to)
themselves. On the opening track, ‘Jonathan’, crackle, a field recording
of drizzle and cut-aways to white noise set the scene for a pensive
piano. Children’s voices can be heard in the distance, and it is like we
are being ushered out of the human world into the mysterious world of
objects-amongst-themselves, a world just adjacent to ours, yet utterly
foreign to it. It is as if Richter has attuned himself to the
subterranean raptures and sadnesses of objects in unoccupied rooms, and
it is these ‘songs’ that he hears. It’s not for nothing that the theme
of objects coming to life was taken up so often in cinema animation
(for, as its name suggests, what is animation if not a version of this
process?), and most of the tracks on _Alphabet 1968_ could be tunes for
cartoon sequences – the ‘song’ an object sings as it stirs itself into
motion, or declines back into inertia.

In fact, the impression of things winding down is persistent on
_Alphabet 1968_. Richter has made an enchanted sound-world, but one from
which entropy has not been excluded. It feels as if the magic is always
about to wear off, that the enchanted objects will slip back into the
inanimate again at any moment – an effect which only heightens the
tracks’ poignancy. The labouring, looped double bass on ‘Rauschen’ has
all the mechano–melan-choly of a phonograph winding down – or perhaps of
one of Sebastian’s automata running out of power. On ‘Trapez’, reverbed
wind chimes create a gentle Narnian snowfall. As so often on this album,
the track recalls a running-down music box – one parallel might be
Colleen’s 2006 album _Boîtes à Musique_, except that, where Colleen
restricted herself to actually using music boxes, Richter loops and
sequences his sonic material so that it _simulates_ clockwork. But it’s
an uncanny clockwork, running to a crooked time. On ‘Amateur’ – with its
hints of artificial respiration, as if the walls themselves are
breathing – the piano loop seems bent out of shape.

Entropy is everywhere in the work of Position Normal, an act whom Simon
Reynolds once called ‘the godfathers of hauntology’, but it is a very
English kind of entropy. In Position Normal’s music, it is like London
has finally succumbed to the entropy that always threatens to engulf the
city in Michael Moorcock’s Jerry Cornelius mythos. Except there’s
something attractive about the deep daydreamy lassitude that reigns
here: entropy isn’t a threat so much as a lysergic promise, a chance to
uncoil, unwind, unspool. Gradually, you are made to forget all of your
urgencies as your brain is lulled and lured into the sunny Sunday
afternoon when all Position Normal tunes seem to take place. The allure
of this indolent London was touched upon by a certain trajectory in 60s’
rock: the sunny daze of The Kinks’ ‘Sunny Afternoon’, The Small Faces
‘Lazy Sunday Afternoon’, The Beatles’ ‘Tomorrow Never Knows’ and ‘I’m
Only Sleeping’. Yet this particular strand of Anglo-languor didn’t
originate here, in the acid and weed reveries of rockers in repose. You
can look even further back for antecedents, to moments in _Great
Expectations_ – the airless, inertial stasis of Satis House – or to
_Alice’s Adventures in Wonderland_ (especially well captured in the
hookah-hazes and fugues of Jonathan Miller’s 1968 BBC television
_version)_.

Position Normal’s London is a city far distant from the corporate gloss
of busy/ business London as it is from the tourist London of pageantry.
The tour guide for this anachronistic city would be the James Mason in
_The London That Nobody Knows_, the 1969 film directed by Norman Cohen
and based on the book by Geoffrey Fletcher. It’s a palimpsest city, a
space where many times are layered. Sometimes, when you walk down an
unfamiliar street, you might stumble into aspects of it. Street markets
that you’d imagined had closed long ago, shops that (so you think)
couldn’t possibly survive into the 21^(st) century, ripe old voices fit
only for the Victorian music hall…

Position Normal’s tracks are Dadaist dub-doodles, disarming in their
seeming slightness. They feel like skits or sketches;

unwilling to be seen taking themselves too seriously, but at the same
time entirely lacking in knowing smirks. There’s a daydreamy quality to
the way the music is constructed: ideas waft in but trail off
inconclusively while still half-baked. It can be frustrating, at least
initially, yet the effect is accretive and seductive. A Position Normal
album comes off like an anglo-_Fantasia_ scavenged out of charity shops,
all the detritus of the English 20th century made to sing. For the most
part, you are left to guess the sources of all the funny voices. Who are
they, this cheery gang – children’s radio presenters, comedians,
character actors, light entertainers, newsreel announcers, jazz
trumpeters (mutes always at the ready), ragpickers, costermongers,
chancers, idlers, thespians gone to seed, frothy coffee café
proprietors…? And where have they come from – scratchy old shellac,
unmarked tapes, soundtrack LPs? The tracks bleed into one another, and
so do the albums, like failing memories.

It turns out that decaying memory is at the heart of Position Normal’s
music. In an interview with Joakim Norling for Friendly Noise magazine,
Position Normal’s Chris Bailiff has said that the roots of the PN sound
lay in his father’s Alzheimer’s disease. ‘My dad went into hospital and
had to sell the family home, I had to move out and whilst doing this I
found so many old records of his and records that he bought for me.
Nursery rhymes, documentaries and jazz. I didn’t want to throw anything
away so took them with me. I started to listen to all of them and
recorded on to tape my favourite sounds and made incredibly varied mix
tapes. I then edited them down and down until there were what I suppose
are called samples.’ It’s as if Bailiff was simultaneously attempting to
simulate Alzheimer’s and counteract it.

Position Normal can be fitted into the venerable English tradition of
Nonsense. (Another Small Faces parallel: Stanley Unwin provided some of
his trademark gobbledygook for _Ogden’s Nut Gone Flake_, the album which
included ‘Lazy Sunday Afternoon’.)

This same sense of lyrical dementia is at work on Mordant Music’s 2006
masterpiece _Dead Air_. Mordant explicitly affirm decay and
deliquescence as productive processes, and on _Dead Air_ it is as if the
mould growing on the archives is the creative force behind the sound.
The album sounds like an electro/Rave version of _The Disintegration
Loops_, except what was disintegrating here was a moment in British
broadcasting history. The loose concept behind the album was a dead
television studio, and what’s crucial to its unnerving allure is the
presence of former Thames TV continuity announcer Phillip Elsmore.
There’s a lunatic calm about the way that Elsmore reading Baron
Mordant’s Nonsense (best heard in its own right on his collaboration
with Ekoplekz, eMMplekz). Listening to _Dead Air_ is like stumbling into
an abandoned museum 200 years into the future where old Rave tracks play
on an endless loop, degrading, becoming more contaminated with each
repetition; or like being stranded in deep space, picking up fading
radio signals from a far distant earth to which you will never return;
or like memory itself re-imagined as an oneiric television studio, where
fondly recalled continuity announcers, drifting in and out of
audibility, narrate your nightmares in reassuring tones.



‘OLD SUNLIGHT FROM OTHER TIMES AND OTHER LIVES’: JOHN FOXX’S _TINY COLOUR MOVIES_


_k-punk post, June 19, 2006_

He was in the market crowds, wearing a shabby brown suit. Trying to find
me through all the years. My ghost coming home. How do you get home
through all the years? No passport, no photo possible. No resemblance to
anyone living or dead. Tenderly peering into windows

John Foxx’s _Tiny Colour Movies_ is a welcome addition to this decade’s
rich cache of hauntological releases.

Foxx’s music has always had an intimate relationship with film. Like
sound recording, photography – with its capturing of lost moments, its
presentation of absences – has an inherently hauntological dimension. It
wouldn’t be an exaggeration to say that Foxx’s entire musical career has
been about relating the hauntology of the visual with the hauntology of
sound, transposing the eerie calmness and stillness of photography and
painting onto the passional agitation of rock.

In the case of _Tiny Colour Movies_, the relationship between the visual
and the sonic is an explicit motivating factor. The inspiration for the
album was the film collection of Arnold Weizcs-Bryant. Weizcs-Bryant
collects only films that are short – no movie in his collection is
longer than eight minutes long – and that have been ‘made outside
commercial consideration for the sheer pleasure of film. This category
can include found film, the home movie, the repurposed movie fragment.’
The album emerged when, a few weeks after he attended a showing of some
of Weizcs-Bryant films in Baltimore, Foxx found himself unable to forget
‘the beauty and strangeness’ of Weizcs-Bryant’s movies – ‘juxtapositions
of underwater automobiles, the highways of Los Angeles, movies made from
smoke and light, discarded surveillance footage from 1964 New York hotel
rooms’ – so he decided ‘to give in to it – to see what would happen if
[he] made a small collection of musical pieces using the memory of those
Tiny Colour Movies.’

The result is Foxx’s most (un)timely LP since 1980’s _Metamatic_. _Tiny
Colour Movies_ fits right into the out of joint time of hauntology.
Belbury Poly’s Jim Jupp cites _Metamatic_ as a major touchstone, and
time has bent so that the influence and the influenced now share an
uncanny contemporaneity. Certainly, many of the tracks on _Tiny Colour
Movies_ – synthetic but oneiric, psychedelic but artificial – resemble
Ghost Box releases. This is an electronic sound removed from the hustle
and bustle of the present. An obvious comparison for a track like the
majestically mournful ‘Skyscraper’ would be Vangelis’ _Blade Runner_
soundtrack, but, in the main, the synthetic textures are relieved from
the pressure of signifying the Future. Instead, they evoke a timeless
Now where the urgencies of the present have been suspended. Some of the
best tracks – especially the closing quartet of ‘Shadow City’,
‘Interlude’, ‘Thought Experiment’ and ‘Hand Held Skies’ – are slivers of
sheer atmosphere, delicate and slight. They are gateways to what
Heronbone used to call ‘slowtime’, a time of meditative detachment from
the commotions of the current.

I constantly feel a distant kind of longing. The longest song, the song
of longing. I walk the same streets like a fading ghost. Flickering grey
suit. The same avenues, squares, parks, colonnades, like a ghost. Over
the years I find places I can go through, some process of recognition.
Remnants of other almost forgotten places. Always returning.

_Tiny Colour Movies_ is a distillation of an aesthetic Foxx has
dedicatedly explored since Ultravox’s _Systems of Romance_. Although
Foxx is most associated with a future-shocked amnesiac catatonia (‘I
used to remember/ now it’s all gone/ world war something/ we were
somebody’s sons’), there has always been another trance-mode – more
beatific and gently blissful, but no less impersonal or machinic –
operative in Foxx’s sound, even on the McLuhanite _Metamatic_.

Psychedelia had explicitly emerged as a reference point on _Systems of
Romance_ (1978) – particularly on tracks such as ‘When You Walk Through
Me’ and ‘Maximum Acceleration’, with their imagery of liquifying cities
and melting time (‘locations change/ the angles change/ even the streets
get re-arranged’). There might have been the occasional nod to the
psychedelia of the past – ‘When You Walk Through Me’ stole the drum
pattern from ‘Tomorrow Never Knows’ for instance – but _Systems of
Romance_ was remarkable for its attempt to repeat psychedelia
‘in–becoming’ rather than through plodding re-iteration. Foxx’s
psychedelia was sober, clean-shaven, dressed in smartly anonymous
Magritte suits; its locale, elegantly overgrown cities from the dreams
of Wells, Delvaux and Ernst.

The reference to Delvaux and Ernst is not idle, since Foxx’s songs, like
Ballard’s stories and novels, often seemed to take place inside
Surrealist paintings. This is not only a matter of imagery, but also of
mood and tone (or, _catatone);_ there is a certain languor, a radically
depersonalised serenity on loan from dreams here. ‘If anything,’ Ballard
wrote in his 1966 essay on Surrealism, ‘Coming of the Unconscious’,
‘surrealist painting has one dominant characteristic: a glassy
isolation, as if all the objects in its landscapes had been drained of
their emotional associations, the accretions of sentiment and common
usage.’ It’s not surprising that Surrealism should so often turn up as a
reference in psychedelia’s ‘derangement of the senses’.

The derangement in Foxx’s psychedelia has always been a gentle affair,
disquieting in its very quietude. That is perhaps because the machinery
of perceptual re-engineering seemed to be painting, photography and
fiction more than drugs per se. One suspects that the psychotropic agent
most active on/in Foxx’s sensibility is _light_. As he explained in an
interview from 1983: ‘some people at certain times seem to have a light
inside them, it’s just a feeling you get about someone, it’s kind of
radiance – and it’s something that’s always intrigued me – it’s
something I’ve covered before in songs like ‘Slow Motion’ and ‘When You
Walk Through Me’. I like that feeling of calm…It’s like William
Burroughs summed it up perfectly – “I had a feeling of stillness and
wonder.”’

There is a clear Gnostic dimension to this. For the Gnostics, the World
was both _heavy_ and _dark_, and you got a glimpse of the Outside
through _glimmers_ and _shimmers_ (two recurrent words in Foxx’s
vocabulary). Around the time of _Systems of Romance_, Foxx’s cover art
shifted from harsh Warhol/Heartfield cut/paste towards gentle
detournements of Renaissance paintings. What Foxx appeared to discover
in Da Vinci and Botticelli is a Catholicism divested not only of pagan
carnality but of the suffering figure of Christ, and returned to an
impersonal Gnostic encounter with radiance and luminescence.

What is suppressed in postmodern culture is not the Dark but the Light
side. We are far more comfortable with demons than angels. Whereas the
demonic appears cool and sexy, the angelic is deemed to be embarrassing
and sentimental. (Wim Wenders’ excruciatingly cloying and portentous
_Wings of Desire_ is perhaps the most spectacular failed contemporary
attempt to render the angelic.) Yet, as Rudolf Otto establishes in _The
Idea of the Holy_, encounters with angels are as disturbing, traumatic
and overwhelming as encounters with demons. After all, what could be
more shattering, unassimilable and incomprehensible in our
hyper-stressed, constantly disappointing and overstimulated lives, than
the sensation of _calm joy?_ Otto, a conservative Christian, argued that
all religious experience has its roots in what is initially
misrecognised as ‘daemonic dread’; he saw encounters with ghosts,
similarly, as a perverted version of what the Christian person would
experience religiously. But Otto’s account is an attempt to fit the
abstract and traumatic encounter with ‘angels’ and ‘demons’ into a
settled field of meaning.

Otto’s word for religious experience is the numinous. But perhaps we can
rescue the numinous _from_ the religious. Otto delineates many variants
of the numinous; the most familiar to us now would be ‘spasms and
convulsions’ leading to ‘the strangest excitements, to intoxicated
frenzy, to transport, and to ecstasy’. But far more uncanny in the
ultra-agitated, present is that mode of the numinous which ‘come(s)
sweeping like a gentle tide, pervading the mind with a tranquil mood of
deepest worship.’ Foxx’s instrumental music – on _Tiny Colour Movies_
and on the three _Cathedral Oceans_ CDs, and with Harold Budd on the
_Transluscence_ and _Drift Music_ LPs – has been eerily successful in
rendering this alien tranquillity. On _Transluscence_ in particular,
where Budd’s limpid piano chords hang like dust subtly diffusing in
sunlight, you can feel your nervous system slowing to a reptile
placidity. This is not an inner but Outer calm; not a discovery of a
cheap New Age ‘real’ self, but a positive alienation, in which the cold
pastoral freezing into a tableau is experienced as a release from
identity.

Dun Scotus’ concept of the haecceity – the ‘here and now’ – seems
particularly apposite here. Deleuze and Guattari seize upon this in _A
Thousand Plateaus_ as a depersonalised mode of individuation in which
everything – the breath of the wind, the quality of the light – plays a
part. A certain use of film – think, particularly, of the aching
stillness in Kubrick and Tarkovsky – seems especially set up to attune
us to haecceity; as does the polaroid, a capturing of a haecceity which
is _itself_ a haecceity.

The impersonal melancholy that _Tiny Colour Movies_ produces is similar
to the oddly wrenching affect you get from a website like Found Photos.
It is precisely the decontextualised quality of these images, the fact
that there is a discrepancy between the importance that the people in
the photographs place upon what is happening and its complete
irrelevance to us, which produces a charge that can be quietly
overwhelming. Foxx wrote about this effect in his deeply moving short
story, ‘The Quiet Man’. The figure is alone in a depopulated London,
watching home movies made by people he never knew. ‘He was fascinated by
all the tiny intimate details of these films, the jerky figures waving
from seaside and garden at weddings and birthdays and baptisms, records
of whole families and their pets growing and changing through the
years.’

‘Here you see old sunlight from other times and other lives’, Foxx
observes in his evocative sleevenotes for _Tiny Colour Movies_. To leaf
through _other people’s_ family photos, to see moments that were of
intense emotional significance for them but which mean nothing to you,
is, necessarily, to reflect on the times of high drama in your own life,
and to achieve a kind of distance that is at once dispassionate and
powerfully affecting. That is why the – beautifully, painfully – dilated
moment in Tarkovsky’s _Stalker_ where the camera lingers over talismanic
objects that were once saturated with meaning, but are now saturated
only with water is for me the most moving scene in cinema. It is as if
we are seeing the urgencies of our lives through the eyes of an
Alien–God. Otto claims that the sense of the numinous is associated with
feelings of our own fundamental worthlessness, experienced with a
‘piercing acuteness [and] accompanied by the most uncompromising
judgment of self-depreciation’. But, contrary to today’s ego psychology,
which hectors us into reinforcing our sense of self (all the better to
‘sell ourselves’), the awareness of our own Nothingness is of course a
pre-requisite for a feeling of grace. There is a melancholy dimension to
this grace precisely because it involves a radical distanciation from
what is ordinarily most important to us.

He stood in the soft beams of sunshine diffused by the curtains, caught
for a moment in the stillness of the room, watching the dust swirling
slowly golden through patches of light that fell across the carpets and
furniture, feeling a strange closeness to the vanished woman. Being here
and touching her possessions in the dusty intimacy of these rooms was
like walking through her life, everything of her was here but for the
physical presence, and in some ways that was the least important part of
her for him.

_Longing_ and _aching_ are words that recur throughout Foxx’s work.
‘Blurred Girl’ from _Metamatic_ – its lovers ‘standing close, never
quite touching’ – would almost be the perfect Lacanian love song, in
which the desired object is always approached, never attained, and what
is enjoyed is suspension, deferral and circulation _around_ the object,
rather than possession of it – ‘are we running still? or are we standing
still?’ On _Tiny Colour Machines_, as on _Cathedral Oceans_ and the
albums with Budd, where there are no words, this feeling of enjoyable
melancholy is rendered by the minimally disturbed stillness and barely
perturbed poise of the sounds themselves.

I can detect tiny edges of time leaking through. I feel nothing is
completely separate. At some point everything leaks into everything
else. The trick is in finding the places. They are slowly moving.
Drifting. You can only do this accidentally. If you set out to do it
deliberately you will always fail.

It is only when you remember, only then will you realise that you caught
a glimpse. While you were talking to someone, or thinking of something
else. When your attention was diverted. Just a hint, a glimmer, a shade.

Much later, you will remember. Without really knowing why. Vague
peripheral sensations gather. Some fraction of a long rhythm is
beginning to be recognised. The hidden frequencies and tides of the
city. Geometry of coincidence.

Listening to _Tiny Colour Movies_, as with all of Foxx’s best records,
one has a sense of returning to a dream-place. Foxx’s shifting or shadow
city, with its Ernst-like ‘green arcades’ and De Chirico colonnades, is
urban space as seen from the unconscious on a derive; an intensive space
in which elements of London, Rome, Florence and other, more secret
places are given an oneiric consistency.

I lost myself in that city more than 20 years ago.

Sleeping in cheap boarding houses. A ghost with leaves in his pocket and
no address. The good face half blind. A nebula of songs and memories
slipping in and out of focus. Someone told me he was there but it didn’t
register at the time. The voice came unfocussed from all around. Still
and quiet like the shadows of an ocean in the moving trees.

_Indented text from John Foxx’s ‘Quiet Man’ and ‘Shifting City’ texts
and the_ Cathedral Oceans _booklet_.



ELECTRICITY AND GHOSTS: INTERVIEW WITH JOHN FOXX


_k-punk post, September 23, 2006_

MF: Which films were most influential on you early on?

JF: Oh, very cheap science fiction films mostly. There was one
particularly memorable movie called _Robot Monster_, so bad it was
surreal, it had the quality of a dream, an exceptional movie.

I now think it’s one of the best films I’ve ever seen, partly because it
had no regard for plot or anything else recognizable as conventional
cinema of the time. This of course made it an event of inestimable
importance to me, because, as a child I took it all literally –
swallowed it whole, like Alice’s potion.

And like that potion, it allowed entry to an unexpected universe. One
which had unfathomable logic and laws which were endlessly flexible. A
deeply exhilarating experience. I still dream sequences from it, or
rather I seem to have permanently incorporated sections of it into my
dream grammar.

Growing up with movies as a child and being subjected to them before I
could understand the adult preoccupations and motivations involved in
the plots, pitched me into conscripting these films as a personal
grammar. I had no choice, so I ended up with this Lynchian reservoir of
sequences that carried every dread and joy and everything in between.

These events are still imbued with unfathomable, inexplicable,
tantalizing mystery, because I couldn’t really understand them at all.
It was hallucinogenic and vivid, and provided me with an image bank and
a gorgeous range of emotional tones I still haven’t managed to exhaust.

Much later, when I got to ‘Cinema’ – or the official critical view of it
– the more intellectual, often French aspect. I didn’t recognise it at
all.

Later, I ended up enjoying this sort of perspective a little, but in a
rather disengaged, sceptical way. To me, it seems a method of criticism
which is often marvelously baroque and can be engaging, but has little
to do with my own experience of Cinema.

I can only deal with it as a marvelous fictional construct, like
medieval religion or quantum physics – a consensual social hallucination
developed by a priesthood. In the end it’s as tangential as my own
individual one.

But that very crude, improvisational, amateurish side of cinema or
filmmaking, I continue to find deeply fascinating. Take for example Ed
Wood’s films. He made them simply because he was in a place where it
could be done.

I think of Ed Wood as a sort of advanced naive artist. He was among the
first to make cut-up movies. He achieved this by using props he came
across in warehouses and stock footage he discovered in the film vaults
of Hollywood cutting rooms, then he built movies around these fragments.

This is the art of collage and sampling. It is art as found object, as
coincidence, as accident, as Surrealism, as Dada, as Situationism. All
made possible and motivated also by the dynamo of American opportunism,
but with great love and inadequacy and tenderness.

Ed Wood was doing, fifty years ago, what the avant garde are only now
beginning to do with film.

(This is also very similar to the way rock ‘n’ roll often manages to
parallel or prefigure avant garde concepts, by arriving at them from a
totally different direction. Pop is such a virile mongrel it’s capable
of effortlessly demonstrating, realising, manifesting, absorbing,
remaking any sort of academic intellectual concept. It can do this so
well, it often makes any parallel or previous version appear weak or
even redundant).

An admiration for that sort of visceral, sensual, opportunistic, native
intelligence led to an interest in, and respect for, home video and
super-8 – very low grade domestic ways of making films – I suddenly
realised there was a whole other world there, one which hadn’t been
properly discussed, but as real, in fact more real and potentially at
least as powerful, as official cinema.

MF: The film collection you refer to in the sleeve notes to _Tiny Colour
Movies_ – you write about it very beautifully. Are there any plans for
those films to be shown in the UK?

JF: Thanks. I’d like to – there are some problems with these fragments,
because they’re so small. They’re physically difficult things, and
they’re unique irreplaceable and very fragile, so you can only ever show
digital copies of them. But it would be interesting to do something like
that. I’m beginning to look at some possibilities now, working with Mike
Barker, who has accumulated a marvellous archive, and we’re discussing
this with some film festivals.

MF: I noticed you thanked Paul Auster in the sleeve notes, why was that?

JF: Paul Auster has is very interesting to me, because I wrote this
thing called ‘The Quiet Man’ years ago, in the 80s, in fact I’m still
writing it. Then I read the _New York Trilogy_, and it struck so many
chimes. It was as if I’d written it, or it was the book I should have
written. I have to be very careful to find my way around it now.

Such occurrences are simultaneously rewarding and terrifying. They
illustrate the fact that there is something in the air, which is
tremendously heartening after working alone for years, yet they scare
you because it feels as if someone has published first, and therefore
registered their claim to where you discovered gold.

I simply wanted to acknowledge the effect, and the odd sort of
encouragement of recognised themes, as well as a continuing parallel
interest in the idea of lost movies and fragments MF: There’s a certain
kind of London affect that’s interesting, of stillness, and the city
being overgrown, which is sort of recurrent in your work – where’s that
come from do you think?

JF: When I first came to London it seemed a great deal like Lancashire,
where I’d come from. But Lancashire had fallen into ruin. The factories
had closed, the economy had faltered. We felt like the Incas after the
Spaniards had passed. Helpless, nostalgic savages adrift in the ruins.

I grew up playing in empty factories, huge places which were overgrown.
I remember trees growing out of the buildings. I remember a certain
moments of looking at it all and thinking what it would have been like
when it was all working. What life might be like, if it were all working
still.

All of my family worked in mills and factories and mines. And all this
was gently subsiding, spinning away.

Coming to London, I couldn’t help but wonder if it might also fall into
dissolution. Then I saw a picture a friend had. It was a realistic
painting of what appeared to be a view over a jungle from a high place.
Gradually you came to realise that it was a view of an overgrown city
from a tower, then you realised that this panorama was from a ruined
Centre Point and you could see Tottenham Court Road, Oxford Street,
Charing Cross road in the undergrowth. It felt like a revelation. It
manifested so perfectly this vision I’d had of everything becoming
overgrown, an overgrown London. A vision of longing and nostalgia tinged
with fear.

I would often experience a feeling of stillness and wonder as I walked
through certain parts of London. I often walked through empty buildings
and neglected, overlooked places and they would replay that sensation
very strongly.

I went to Shoreditch, in 1982, and made a studio there. When we first
went into the studio building it had trees growing out of the windows on
the upper stories. It was very like Lancashire, that whole area was
derelict, had been abandoned, because that had been the industrial bit
of the East End. Now there was no-one there, it was empty. It gave me
that calm drifting feeling of recognition.

There was some kind of collective image of overgrown and abandoned
cities at that time. Perhaps it’s always there. Such images were present
in Ballard, Burroughs, Philip K Dick. In those science fiction authors
writing about the near future – conducting thought experiments,
exploring likely consequences and views of the unrecognised present,
which I think is very valuable. They offer perspectives and meditations
on our vanity and endeavours. As such they maintain continuity with a
long line of imagery, from religious myths and folk stories to science
fiction.

MF: It seems to have a real unconscious resonance, this idea of
overgrown cities, it’s obviously there in surrealist paintings, which
seem to be a constant reference, especially in your early work –

JF: Yes, there’s that side of it too. In science fiction films you often
get those recurrent images, which I think are very beautiful, of someone
walking through an abandoned city.

We have accumulated a range of such images all along the line, from folk
and fairytales, to the actual construction of follies and romantic
overgrown gardens, to the truly dislocated, such as Piranesi’s ruins and
prisons, to Max Ernst’s paintings, or Breughel’s _Tower of Babel_, or
the background urban locations in Bosch, as well as De Chirico’s
townscapes and shadows.

_Planet of the Apes_ has one of the most shocking and resonant – the end
of original movie, where we see the Statue of Liberty tilted in the
sand. A real jolt, the first time you see it. A modern take on Shelley’s
_Ozymandias_.

The radiance I sometimes refer to occupies this sort of area. I often
see people as if in a frozen moment and they seem to have an internal
glow inside them. Their skin seems translucent and they carry their own
time. I feel calm and distant and warm from this. It can happen in an
instant. In very mundane urban situations. You realise you are not
looking at a single person, but at a sort of stream or cascade.

It happened yesterday in a supermarket. I happened to glance at a young
woman who looked like a transfigured hidden Madonna. She wore jeans and
a teeshirt, an ordinary woman. But equally, she was a continuity, a
lovely genetic physical thread to other times, both previous and ahead
and still unformed. She simply glowed. Quietly and unknowingly luminous.
The Eternal Woman.

MF: The sort of feelings you deal with are more abstract; it’s like you
go to those states without reference to the way they’ve traditionally
been coded, really. You often use the word ‘angelic’, or ‘angel’…

JF: Yes, very perilous territory, especially since these terms have
since been co-opted by New Agers. I’ll put on the grey suit to dispel
all that.

Many of these spring from what I think of as ‘thought exper-iments’ –
things I employ all the time, as a tool to get at half buried or
emerging realisations. If you’re at all interested, I’ll try to outline
a few.

Firstly, the idea interested me – still does – of parallel evolutions –
imagine something that may have evolved alongside us, something we’re
not quite aware of yet, that we haven’t yet discovered.

That may include things which exist in other planes or by other means,
or things which resemble human beings so well that we assume them to be
human, but they may not be. Yet they live among us undetected – the
possibility that other forms of life may have evolved alongside us, but
invisible because of their proximity.

‘Hiding in plain sight’ is a great idea, something that’s very
interesting in itself – on one level connected with sleight of hand and
parlour tricks and conmen, but on the other hand, very subtle, intuition
led perceptions. It could give rise to situations that are tremendously
moving, fragile, tender. Metaphorically very resonant.

Another one – I’m also very interested in the concept of a singularity.
An event that only happens once, or once every thousand or million
years.

There may be rhythms which extend over tens of millions of years and are
therefore unrecognisable to us, except as single unconnectable and
unexplainable events.

But the fact that we have no context to fit them into doesn’t mean they
don’t happen.

Yet another thought experiments posits the concept of Angels as a
connection between things. An entity that only exists between. A sort of
web or connection. They arise purely as an intrinsic, invisible and
unsuspected component of the evolution of the ecology that supports
whatever they exist between. They cannot exist on their own.

Many of us have these little incidents – everything from coincidences
onward – things that we can’t explain using the references we commonly
employ.

I’m very interested in those things, always have been. Through those odd
things, we glimpse something that’s outside the way we usually look at
the world, and realise there might be another way of looking at it, an
alternate perception to the one we have, and I think that’s a very
valuable possibility to keep hold of. The awareness that maybe there are
gaps in our perception that we aren’t able to fill yet.

MF: Yes, because I think one of the most powerful things – which comes
out in _Tiny Colour Movies_ but in retrospect has always been there – is
that you’re able to deal with positive, affirmatory feelings that are
eerie and uncanny, and possess a certain kind of calm serenity.

JF: Good, somehow that’s always been a vital component of that sort of
experience, for me. A sensation of utter calm and stillness. Miles away
from any agitation. It seems deeply positive.

It’s an opposite to the excitement you get from, say, rock and roll…I
think in general we like to stir ourselves up in various ways, using art
or using media or whatever, and I think it’s just as valid to move
against the norm, and the norm at the moment is to speed everything up.

I mean, that’s what we’re trying to attain, aren’t we, through media? –
That awful maximisation of time and efficient transmission of
‘information’. Some of this is economic – time equals money – and some
is simply done because it can be done, and has become an unquestioned
convention.

If you could time-jump to show the average TV ad of today to someone 20
or 30 years ago, they wouldn’t understand it. The ad would depend on the
viewer’s perception speed and also on a series of recent references. Our
parents simply weren’t fast enough, they hadn’t been accelerated as we
have been by media and the pace of modern life, and they also don’t have
the inculcated, busy reference chain.

Acceleration is also kind of exciting and interesting, I mean I really
enjoy it, sometimes – but it equally leads you to think ‘what happens if
you do the opposite?’–it might be just as pleasurable and just as valid
to do that.

So, one of the things I want to try to do is work on the other end of
this spectrum – see what happens when you slow things down.

I was surprised when I was doing the first music for _Cathedral Oceans_,
using echoes that were 30 seconds long, so the rhythms were 30 seconds
between the beats.

It was very interesting slowing down enough to work with that
intuitively. You had to do it, you had to synchronise with the track in
order to be able to work with it. And it’s very interesting what kind of
state you get into – intense, yet calm and tranquil. A sort of trance
state.

MF: I think it’s particularly on the LPs with Harold Budd, where you get
that sort of aching plateau, where you slow down so much that any
peturbation has a massive effect really.

Harold was one of the first people who got that right, I think. One of
the very first to have sufficient courage to leave enough space in the
music and not fill spaces unnecessarily. Not decorate. Takes an awful
lot of quiet courage to do that.

When this is done, it allows an alternative ecology to emerge – one
based on events that are much less frequent. And that, of course,
affects their significance. You are drawn to them in a sort of smiling
fascination, rather than the usual pop music method of lapel grabbing
bombardment.

MF: It seems to be something similar to what you get in Tarkovsky films
– where either people say ‘oh, this is too slow I can’t stand it’, or
they enter into the slow time of the film and anything that happens
almost becomes too much.

JF: Exactly, you can concentrate on any event very thoroughly, when that
mode of perception is made available. Events become stately and welcome
and valued and significant, and their arrival and departure can be fully
experienced. The lack of jostling allows that sort of elegant notional
space to open up.

It functions at the other end of the spectrum from commercial TV and
cinema, and of rock & roll. Both ends can be equally interesting, I
think.

MF: It seems to me that you’ve always imposed the stillness and calmness
of painting and photography or a certain type of film onto the agitation
of rock, really. Certain kind of dreams - the dreams we’re most familiar
with – are hyper-agitated, full of urgency etc, but there’s another type
of dream quality you seem to get to where those urgencies are suspended
and you’re out of that everyday life push-and-pull, really. I wondered -
there seems to be a certain aching, or longing quality - these are words
you seem to use a lot in your music…

JF: Well, dreams are a very important component. I realised that it is
not simply the image you present yourself with, in a dream, which is
important – it’s also the emotional tone of the scene. You can see a
cloud, but this will be accompanied by a sense of wonder or by a sense
of dread, and it is that accompaniment which determines its meaning.

The employment of these images and tones are some of the things that
everyone shares, aren’t they? They’re composed of bits of unique
personal events and references and memories, such as longings that you
might have had when you’re a child.

When your parents are away even for an hour it feel as though it goes on
forever and you really deeply miss them – and the abstraction, the tone
component of that just carries on through life. Gets applied to
different situations. These longings – and all other emotional parts of
the spectrum – join the repertoire of tones we carry and apply. Some
moments last forever.

MF: But there’s almost a positive side, almost an enjoyment of longing
and ache.

JF: Oh yes, where the observer part of you acknowledges an emotional
connection with the rest. Simultaneously you feel as though you are very
integrated, yet you are being gently pulled away from yourself. Gently
disengaged.

MF: Isn’t the ‘emotionless’ quality of your music more to do with a
certain kind of calm?

JF: Yes, it’s quite a complex thing, a compound. There are states where
there’s a sensation of time passing, things changing, knowing the world
is changing, falling in on itself, and reforming. And you may even be in
the process of doing just that yourself.

But there are moments where you just stand by and watch it all, where
you’re aware of it, in a moment that seems to go on forever. So it’s
something of standing in a still place and watching the patterns in
passing crowds and even in your own life. It can be a very powerful
experience.

That stillness, and the maintenance of a quiet dignity in the face of
insurmountable circumstances can be immensely moving to witness.

It can be much more effective and moving if someone tells the story in
an unemotional or undramatic way. You find that in Ishiguro. _Remains of
the Day_ or _Never Let Me Go_ are good examples of that kind of writing,
where the most important components remain unstated. _The Leopard_ is
suffused with, and is dependent on a variant of this.

It’s also allied to a device used in different ways by Charlie Chaplin,
Buster Keaton and Cary Grant. – An archetypical figure attempts to
retain dignity in the face of the worldly chaos while remaining ever
hopeful of romance.

And with Ballard and Burroughs, you get an almost gentlemanly, middle
class version of a similar sort of stance – mayhem of all kinds observed
from a disengaged viewpoint.



ANOTHER GREY WORLD: DARKSTAR, JAMES BLAKE, KANYE WEST, DRAKE AND ‘PARTY HAUNTOLOGY’


‘It’s a really grey-sounding synth, really organic and grainy. We call
them “swells” – where synthesisers start quite minimal and then develop
into a huge chord, before progressing. I felt like it wouldn’t be right
if we just carried on with that dayglo Hyperdub sound of a couple of
years ago. I mean I love those songs, but it already feels like a
lifetime away.’ I felt vindicated when I read these remarks of
Darkstar’s James Young in an interview with Dan Hancox. When I first
heard the album about which Young is talking – 2010’s _North_ – the
phrase that came to my mind was ‘Another Grey World’. The landscape of
_North_ felt like the verdant Max Ernst forest of Eno’s _Another Green
World_ become ash.

_…with winter ahead of us_

The depressive’s world is black and/ or white, (you only have to
remember the covers of Joy Division’s _Unknown Pleasures_ and _Closer)_,
but _North_ does not (yet) project a cold world entirely swathed in
snow. North is the direction that the album is heading towards, not a
destination it has reached. Its landscape is colourless rather than
black, its mood tentative – it is grey as in unresolved, a grey area.
This is an album defined by its negative capability of remaining in
doubts, disquiet and dissatisfactions that it unable to name. It is grey
as in The Cure’s ‘All Cats Are Grey’ from _Faith_, a record that stood
between the spidery psychedelia of _Seventeen Seconds_ and the
unrelieved darkness of _Pornography_. Yet _North_ is ultimately too
jittery to muster the glacial fatalism of _Faith_ but what _North_ has
in common with The Cure’s great records is the sense of total immersion
in a mood. It is a work that came out of method immersion: Young told
Dan Hancox that, as they recorded _North_, the group had listened
obsessively to Radiohead, Burial, the Human League and the first album
by Orchestral Manouevres in the Dark. The record demands the same kind
of involvement, which is perhaps why some found it unengaging. On a
casual listen, the very unresolved quality of the tracks could seem
simply undercooked. James Buttery’s vocals could come off as limp,
anaemic. In addition, many were disappointed by Darkstar’s failure to
provide an album full of the ‘robotic 2-step’ that they had invented on
‘Aidy’s Girl is a Computer’. In fact, they made the robotic 2-step album
but ditched it, dissatisfied with its lack of ambition. (This wholly
completed album that was never released is one of several parallels with
Burial.) ‘Aidy’s Girl is a Computer’ apart, if you heard _North_ without
knowing the history, you wouldn’t assume any connection with dubstep. At
the same time, _North_ isn’t straightforwardly a return to a pre-dance
sound. It is more a continuation of a certain mode of electronic pop
that was prematurely terminated sometime in the mid-80s: like New Order
if they hadn’t abandoned the sleek cybernetic mausoleum that Martin
Hannett built for them on _Movement_.

Except, of course, that it is not possible to simply continue that
trajectory as if nothing had happened. Darkstar acknowledge the present
only negatively. It impinges on their music in perhaps the only way it
can, as a failure of the future, as a temporal disorder that has
infected the voice, causing it to stutter and sibilate, to fragment into
strange slithering shards. Part of what separates Darkstar from their
synthpop forebears is the fact that the synthesiser no longer connotes
futurity. But Darkstar are not retreating from a vivid sense of futurity
– because there is no such futurity from which they could retreat. This
becomes clear when you compare the Darkstar cover of ‘Gold’ to the Human
League original. It’s not just that one is no more futuristic than the
other; it’s that _neither_ are futuristic. The Human League track is
clearly a superseded futurism, while the Darkstar track seems to come
after the future.

It’s this sense of living in an interregnum, that makes _North_ so
(un)timely. Where Burial made contact with the secret sadness underlying
the boom, Darkstar articulate the sense of foreboding that is everywhere
after the economic crash of 2008. _North_ is certainly full of
references to lost companionship: the album can be read as an oblique
take on a love affair gone wrong.

_Our fate’s not to share…_.

_The connection between us gone…_.

But the very focus on the love couple rather than the rave massive is
itself symptomatic of a turn inward. In a discussion that Simon Reynolds
and I had about _North_ shortly after it was released, Reynolds argued
that it was a mistake to talk as if rave was bereft of emotion. Rave was
a music saturated with affect, but the affect involved wasn’t associated
with romance or introspection The introspective turn in 21st century
(post)dance music was therefore not a turn towards emotion, it was a
shift from collectively experienced affect to privatised emotions. There
was an intrinsic and inevitable sadness to this inward turn, regardless
of whether the music was officially sad or not. The twinning of romance
and introspection, love and its disappointments, runs through 20th
century pop. By contrast, dance music since disco offered up another
kind of emotional palette, based in a different model of escape from the
miseries of individual selfhood.

The 21st century has often felt like the comedown after a speed binge,
or the exile back into privatised selfhood, and the songs on _North_
have the jittery clarity of Prozac withdrawal.

It’s significant that most of the digital interference on _North_ is
applied to James Buttery’s voice. Much of the vocal sounds as if it has
been recorded on a shaky mobile phone connection. I’m reminded of Franco
Berardi’s arguments about the relationship between informational
overload and depression. Berardi’s argument is not that the dot.com
crash caused depression, but the reverse: the crash was caused by the
excessive strain put on people’s nervous systems by new informational
technologies. Now, more than a decade after the dot.com crash and the
density of data has massively increased. The paradigmatic labourer is
now the call centre worker – the banal cyborg, punished whenever they
unplug from the communicative matrix. On _North_, James Buttery,
afflicted by all manner of digital palsies, sounds like a cyborg whose
implants and interfaces have come loose, learning to be a man again, and
not liking it very much.

_North_ is like Kanye West’s 2008 album _808s and Heartbreak_ with all
the gloss removed. There is the same method melancholia, the same
anchoring in early 80s synthpop, explicitly flagged in _808’s_ case by
the cover design’s echo of Peter Saville’s sleeves for New Order’s _Blue
Monday_ and _Power, Corruption and Lies_. The opening track ‘Say You
Will’ sounds like it has been worked up out of the crisp synthetic chill
of Joy Division’s ‘Atmosphere’ and the funereal drum tattoo of New
Order’s ‘In A Lonely Place’. As with _North_, though, the 80s parallels
are disrupted by the digital effects used on the voice. _808s and
Heartbreak_ pioneered the use of Auto–Tune, which would subsequently
come to dominate R&B and hip-hop from the late 00s onwards. In a sense,
the conspicuous use of Auto-Tune – that is to say, its use as an effect,
as opposed to its official purpose as a device to correct a singer’s
pitch – was a 90s throwback, since this was popularised by Cher on her
1998 single ‘Believe’. Auto-Tune is in many ways the sonic equivalent of
digital airbrushing, and the (over) use of the two technologies
(alongside the increasing prevalence of cosmetic surgery) result in a
look and feel that is hyperbolically enhanced rather than conspicuously
artificial. If anything is the signature of 21st century consumer
culture, is this feeling of a digitally upgraded normality – a perverse
yet ultra-banal normality, from which all flaws have been erased.

On _808s and Heartbreak_, we hear the sobs in the heart of the 21st
century pleasuredome. Kanye’s lachrymose android shtick reaches its
maudlin depths on the astonishing ‘Pinocchio Story’. This is the kind of
Auto-Tuned lament you might expect neo-Pinocchio and android-Oedipus
David from Spielberg’s _AI_ (2001) to sing; a little like Britney
Spears’s ‘Piece Of Me’, you can either hear this as the moment when a
commodity achieves selfconsciousness, or when a human realises he or she
has become a commodity. It’s the soured sound at the end of the rainbow,
an electro as desolated as Suicide’s infernal synth-opera ‘Frankie
Teardrop’.

A secret sadness lurks behind the 21st century’s forced smile. This
sadness concerns hedonism itself, and it’s no surprise that it is in
hip-hop – a genre that has become increasingly aligned with consumerist
pleasure over the past 20-odd years – that this melancholy has
registered most deeply. Drake and Kanye West are both morbidly fixated
on exploring the miserable hollowness at the core of super-affluent
hedonism. No longer motivated by hip-hop’s drive to conspicuously
consume – they long ago acquired anything they could have wanted – Drake
and West instead dissolutely cycle through easily available pleasures,
feeling a combination of frustration, anger, and self-disgust, aware
that something is missing, but unsure exactly what it is. This
hedonist’s sadness – a sadness as widespread as it is disavowed – was
nowhere better captured than in the doleful way that Drake sings, ‘we
threw a party/ yeah, we threw a party,’ on _Take Care’s_ ‘Marvin’s
Room’.

It’s no surprise to learn that Kanye West is an admirer of James Blake.
There’s an affective as well as sonic affinity between parts of Kanye’s
_808s and Heartbreak_ and _My Beautiful Dark Twisted Fantasy_ and
Blake’s two albums. You might say that Blake’s whole MO is a partial
re-naturalisation of the digitally manipulated melancholy Kanye
auditioned on _808s:_ soul music after the Auto-Tune cyborg. But
liberated from the penthouse-prison of West’s ego, unsure of itself,
caught up in all kinds of impasses, the disaffection languishes
listlessly, not always even capable of recognizing itself as sadness.

You might go so far as to say that the introspective turn reached a kind
of conclusion with Blake’s 2013 album _Overgrown_. In his transformation
from dubstep to pop, Blake had gone from digitally manipulating his own
voice to becoming a singer; from constructing tracks to writing songs.
The initial motivation for Blake’s approach to the song no doubt came
from Burial, whose combination of jittery 2-step beats and R&B vocal
samples pointed the way to a possible vision of 21st century pop. It was
as if Burial had produced the dub versions; now the task was to
construct the originals, and that entailed replacing the samples with an
actual vocalist.

Listening back to Blake’s records in chronological sequence is like
hearing a ghost gradually assume material form; or it’s like hearing the
song form (re)coalescing out of digital ether. A track such as ‘I Only
Know (What I Know Now)’ from the _Klavierwerke_ EP is gorgeously
insubstantial – it’s the merest ache, Blake’s voice a series of sighs
and unintelligible pitch-shifted hooks, the production mottled and
waterlogged, the arrangement intricate and fragile, conspicuously
inorganic in the way that it makes no attempt to smooth out the elements
of the montage. The voice is a smattering of traces and tics, a spectral
special effect scattered across the mix. But with Blake’s self-titled
debut album, something like traditional sonic priorities were restored.
The reinvention of pop that his early releases promised was now
seemingly given up, as Blake’s de-fragmented voice moved to the front of
the mix, and implied or partially disassembled songs became ‘proper’
songs, complete with un-deconstructed piano and organ. Electronics and
some vocal manipulation remained, but they were now assigned a
decorative function. Blake’s blue-eyed soul vocals, and the way that his
tracks combined organ (or organ-like sounds) with electronica, made him
reminiscent of a half-speed Steve Winwood.

Just as with Darkstar’s _North_, Blake’s turn to songs met with a mixed
response. Many who were enthusiastic about the early EPs were
disappointed or mildly dismayed by _James Blake_. Veiling and implying
an object is the surest route to producing the impression of sublimity.
Removing the veils and bringing that object to the fore risks
de-sublimation, and some found Blake’s actual songs unequal to the
virtual ones his early records had induced them into hallucinating.
Blake’s voice was as cloyingly overpowering as it was non-specific in
its feeling. The result was a quavering, tremulous vagueness, which was
by no means clarified by lyrics that were similarly allusive/elusive.
The album came over as if it were earnestly entreating us to feel,
without really telling us what is was we were supposed to be feeling.
Perhaps it’s this emotional obliqueness that contributes to what Angus
Finlayson, in his review of _Overgrown_ for FACT, characterised as the
strangeness of the songs on _James Blake_. They seemed, Finlayson said,
like ‘half-songs, skeletal place-markers for some fuller arrangement yet
to come.’ The journey into ‘proper’ songs was not as complete as it
first appeared. It was like Blake had tried to reconstruct the song form
with only dub versions or dance mixes as his guide. The result was
something scrambled, garbled, solipsistic, a bleary version of the song
form that was as frustrating as it was fascinating. The delicate
insubstantiality of the early EPs had given way to something that felt
overfull. It was like drowning in a warm bath (perhaps with your wrists
cut).

On Blake’s albums, there is a simultaneous feeling that the tracks are
both congested and unfinished, and that incompleteness – the sketchy
melodies, the half-hooks, the repeated lines that play like clues to
some emotional event never disclosed in the songs themselves – may be
why they eventually get under your skin. The oddly indeterminate –
irresolute and unresolved – character of Blake’s music gives it the
quality of gospel music for those who have lost their faith so
completely that they have forgotten they ever had it. What survives is
only a quavering longing, without object or context, Blake coming off
like an amnesiac holding on to images from a life and a narrative that
he cannot recover. This negative capability means that _Overgrown_ is
like an inversion of the oversaturated high-gloss emotional stridency of
chart and reality TV pop, which is always perfectly certain of what it
is feeling.

Yet there’s an unconvincing – or perhaps unconvinced – quality to so
much of mainstream culture’s hedonism now. Oddly, this is most evident
in the annexing of R&B by club music. When former R&B producers and
performers embraced dance music, you might have expected an increase in
euphoria, an influx of ecstasy. But the reverse has happened, and it’s
as if many of the dancefloor tracks are pulled down by a hidden gravity,
a disowned sadness. The digitally–enhanced uplift in the records by
producers such as Flo-Rida, Pitbull and will.i.am is like a poorly
photoshopped image or a drug that we’ve hammered so much we’ve become
immune to its effects. It’s hard not to hear these records’ demands that
we enjoy ourselves as thin attempts to distract from a depression that
they can only mask, never dissipate.

In a brilliant essay on The Quietus website, Dan Barrow analysed the
tendency in a slew of chartpop over the past few years – including Jay-Z
and Alicia Keys’s ‘Empire State of Mind’ Kesha’s ‘Tik Tok’, Flo Rida’s
‘Club Can’t Even Handle Me Yet’ – ‘to give the listener the pay–off, the
sonic money-shot, as soon and as obviously as possible’. Pop has always
delivered sugar-sweet pleasure, of course, but, Barrow argues, there’s a
tyrannical desperation about this new steroid-driven pop. It doesn’t
seduce; it tyrannises. This, Barrow argues, is ‘a crude, overdetermined
excess, as if pop were forcing itself back to its defining
characteristics – chorus hooks, melody, “accessibility” – and blowing
them up to cartoonish size.’ There’s an analogy to be drawn between this
artificially inflated pop and Berardi’s discussion of internet
pornography and drugs such as Viagra, which, similarly, dispense with
seduction and aim directly at pleasure. According to Berardi, remember,
we are so overwhelmed by the incessant demands of digital
communications, we are simply too busy to engage in arts of enjoyment –
highs have to come in a no-fuss, hyperbolic form so that we can quickly
return to checking email or updates on social networking sites.
Berardi’s remarks can give us an angle on the pressures that dance music
has been subject to over the last decade. Whereas the digital technology
of the 80s and 90s fed the collective experience of the dancefloor, the
communicative technology of the 21st century has undermined it, with
even clubbers obsessively checking their smartphones. (Beyoncé and Lady
Gaga’s ‘Telephone’ – which sees the pair begging a caller to stop
bugging them so they can dance – now seems like a last failed attempt to
keep the dancefloor free of communicational intrusion.)

Even the most apparently uncomplicated calls to enjoyment can’t fully
suppress a certain sadness. Take Katy Perry’s ‘Last Friday Night’. On
the face of it, the track is a simple celebration of pleasure (‘Last
Friday night/ Yeah we maxed our credit cards/ And got kicked out of the
bar’). Yet it’s not hard to hear something Sisyphean, something
purgatorial, in the song’s evocation of a (not so) merry-go-round of
pleasure that Perry and her friends can never get off: ‘Always say we’re
gonna stop/ This Friday night/ Do it all again…’ Played at half-speed,
this would sound as bleak as early Swans. David Guetta’s ‘Play Hard’
calls up a similarly interminable repetition. Pleasure becomes an
obligation that will never let up – ‘us hustler’s work is never through/
We work hard, play hard’ – and hedonism is explicitly paralleled with
work: ‘Keep partyin’ like it’s your job’. It’s the perfect anthem for an
era in which the boundaries between work and non-work are eroded – by
the requirement that we are always-on (that, for instance, we will
answer emails at any hour of the day), and that we never lose an
opportunity to marketise our own subjectivity. In a (not at all trivial)
sense, partying _is_ now a job. Images of hedonistic excess provide much
of the content on Facebook, uploaded by users who are effectively unpaid
workers, creating value for the site without being remunerated for it.
Partying is a job in another sense – in conditions of objective
immiseration and economic downturn, making up the affective deficit is
outsourced to us.

Sometimes, a free-floating sadness seeps into the grain of the music
itself. On their blog No Good Advice, the blogger J describes the use of
a sample from Kaoma’s 1989 track ‘Lambada’ on Jennifer Lopez’s 2011 hit
‘On The Floor’: ‘The snatch of ‘Lambada’ functions as a buried-memory
trigger, a sort of party hauntology that lends the song a slight edge of
wistful, nostalgic sadness.’ There is no reference to sadness in the
official text of the track, which is a simple exhortation to dance. So
it’s as if the sorrow comes from outside, like traces of the waking
world incorporated into a dream, or like the grief which creeps into all
the embedded worlds in _Inception_ (2010).

‘Party hauntology’ might even be the best name for the dominant 21st
century form of pop, the transnational club music produced by Guetta,
Flo-Rida, Calvin Harris and will.i.am. But the debts to the past, the
failure of the future are repressed here, meaning that the hauntology
takes a disavowed form. Take a track like the Black Eyed Peas’ immensely
popular ‘I Gotta Feeling’. Although ‘I Gotta Feeling’ is ostensibly an
optimistic record, there’s something forlorn about it. Perhaps that’s
because of will.i.am’s use of Auto-Tune – there seems to be Sparky’s
Magic Piano-like machinic melancholy intrinsic to the technology itself,
something which Kanye drew out rather than invented on _808s and
Heartbreak_. In spite of the track’s declamatory repetitions, there’s a
fragile, fugitive quality about the pleasures ‘I Gotta Feeling’ so
confidently expects. That’s partly because ‘I Gotta Feeling’ comes off
more like a memory of a past pleasure than an anticipation of a pleasure
that is yet to be felt. The album from which the track comes, _The
E.N.D. (The Energy Never Dies)_ was – like its predecessor, _The
Beginning_ – so immersed in Rave that it effectively operated as an act
of homage to the genre. _The Beginning’s_ ‘Time (Dirty Bit)’ could have
actually passed for a Rave track from the early 90s – the crudeness of
its cut and paste montage recalls the ruff ‘n’ ready textures that
samplers would construct at that time, and its borrowing from _Dirty
Dancing’s_ ‘(I’ve Had) The Time of my Life’ was just the kind of
subversion/sublimation of cheesy source material that Rave producers
delighted in. Yet, the Black Eyed Peas’ Rave-appropri-ations didn’t
function so much as revivals of Rave as denials that the genre had ever
happened in the first place. If Rave hasn’t yet happened, then there is
no need to mourn it. We can act as if we’re experiencing all this for
the first time, that the future is still ahead of us. The sadness ceases
to be something we feel, and instead consists in our temporal
predicament itself, and we are like Jack in the Gold Room of the
Overlook Hotel, dancing to ghost songs, convincing ourselves that the
music of yesteryear is really the music of today.



03: THE STAIN OF PLACE


[]



‘ALWAYS YEARNING FOR THE TIME THAT JUST ELUDED US’ – INTRODUCTION TO LAURA OLDFIELD FORD’S _SAVAGE MESSIAH_ (VERSO, 2011)


_June 2011_

‘I regard my work as diaristic; the city can be read as a palimpsest, of
layers of erasure and overwriting,’ Laura Oldfield Ford has said. ‘The
need to document the transient and ephemeral nature of the city is
becoming increasingly urgent as the process of enclosure and
privatisation continues apace.’ The city in question is of course
London, and Ford’s _Savage Messiah_ offers a samizdat counter-history of
the capital during the period of neoliberal domination. If _Savage
Messiah_ is ‘diaristic’, it is also much more than a memoir. The stories
of Ford’s own life necessarily bleed into the stories of others, and it
is impossible to see the joins. ‘This decaying fabric, this unknowable
terrain has become my biography, the euphoria then the anguish, layers
of memories colliding, splintering and reconfiguring.’ The perspective
Ford adopts, the voices she speaks in – and which speak through her –
are those of the officially defeated: the punks, squatters, ravers,
football hooligans and militants left behind by a history which has
ruthlessly photoshopped them out of its finance-friendly SimCity.
_Savage Messiah_ uncovers another city, a city in the process of being
buried, and takes us on a tour of its landmarks: The Isle of Dogs…The
Elephant…Westway…Lea Bridge…North Acton…Canary Wharf…Dalston…Kings
Cross…Hackney Wick…

In one of many echoes of punk culture, Ford calls _Savage Messiah_ a
‘zine’. She began producing it in 2005, eight years into a New Labour
government that had consolidated rather than overturned Thatcherism. The
context is bleak. London is a conquered city; it belongs to the enemy.
‘The translucent edifices of Starbucks and Costa Coffee line these
shimmering promenades, ‘young professionals’ sit outside gently
conversing in sympathetic tones.’ The dominant mood is one of
restoration and reaction, but it calls itself modernisation, and it
calls its divisive and exclusionary work – making London safe for the
super-rich – _regeneration_. The struggle over space is also a struggle
over time and who controls it. Resist neoliberal modernisation and (so
we are told) you consign yourself to the past. _Savage Messiah’s_ London
is overshadowed by the looming megalith of ‘London 2012’, which over the
course of the last decade has subsumed more and more of the city into
its banal science fiction _telos_, as the Olympic Delivery Authority
transformed whole areas of East London into a temporary photo
opportunity for global capitalism. Where once there were ‘fridge
mountains and abandoned factories’ out of Tarkovsky and Ballard, a
semi-wilderness in the heart of the city, now a much blander desert
grows: spaces for wandering are eliminated, making way for shopping
malls and soon-to-be-abandoned Olympic stadia. ‘When I was writing the
zines,’ Ford remembers, ‘I was drifting through a London haunted by
traces and remnants of rave, anarcho-punk scenes and hybrid subcultures
at a time when all these incongruous urban regeneration schemes were
happening. The idea that I was moving through a spectral city was really
strong, it was as if everything prosaic and dull about the New Labour
version of the city was being resisted by these ghosts of brutalist
architecture, of ‘90s convoy culture, rave scenes, ‘80s political
movements and a virulent black economy of scavengers, peddlers and
shoplifters. I think the book could be seen in the context of the
aftermath of an era, where residues and traces of euphoric moments haunt
a melancholy landscape.’

All of these traces are to be eliminated from the Restoration London
that will be celebrated at London 2012. With their lovingly reproduced
junk-strata, overgrowing vegetation and derelict spaces, _Savage
Messiah’s_ images offer a direct riposte to the slick digital images
which the Olympic Delivery Authority has pasted up in the now heavily
policed, restricted and surveilled Lee valley. Blair’s Cool Britannia
provides the template for an anodyne vision of London designed by the
‘creative indus-tries’. Everything comes back as an advertising
campaign. It isn’t just that the alternatives are written over, or out,
it is that they return as their own simulacra. A familiar story. Take
the Westway, West London’s formerly deplored dual carriageway, once a
cursed space to be mythologised by Ballard, punks and Chris Petit, now
just another edgy film set:

This liminal territory, cast in a negative light in the 70s was
recuperated by MTV and boring media types in the 90s. The Westway became
the backdrop for Gorillaz imbecility, bland drum & bass record sleeves
and photo shoots in corporate skate parks.

Cool Britannia. Old joke.

‘Space’ becomes the over arching commodity. Notting Hill. New Age cranks
peddling expensive junk. Homeopathy and boutiques, angel cards and
crystal healing.

Media and high finance on the one hand, faux-mysticism and superstition
on the other: all the strategies of the hopeless and those who exploit
them in Restoration London…Space is indeed the commodity here. A trend
that started 30 years ago, and intensified as council housing was sold
off and not replaced, culminated in the insane super-inflation of
property prices in the first years of the 21st century. If you want a
simple explanation for the growth in cultural conservatism, for London’s
seizure by the forces of Restoration, you need look no further than
this. As Jon Savage points out in _England’s Dreaming_, the London of
punk was still a bombed-out city, full of chasms, caverns, spaces that
could be temporarily occupied and squatted. Once those spaces are
enclosed, practically all of the city’s energy is put into paying the
mortgage or the rent. There’s no time to experiment, to journey without
already knowing where you will end up. Your aims and objectives have to
be stated up front. ‘Free time’ becomes convalescence. You turn to what
reassures you, what will most refresh you for the working day: the old
familiar tunes (or what sound like them). London becomes a city of
pinched-face drones plugged into iPods.

_Savage Messiah_ rediscovers the city as a site for drift and daydreams,
a labyrinth of side streets and spaces resistant to the process of
gentrification and ‘development’ set to culminate in the miserable
hyper-spectacle of 2012. The struggle here is not only over the
(historical) direction of time but over different uses of time. Capital
demands that we always look busy, even if there’s no work to do. If
neoliberalism’s magical voluntarism is to be believed, there are always
opportunities to be chased or created; any time not spent hustling and
hassling is time wasted. The whole city is forced into a gigantic
simulation of activity, a fantacism of productivism in which nothing
much is actually produced, an economy made out of hot air and bland
delirium. _Savage Messiah_ is about another kind of delirium: the
releasing of the pressure to be yourself, the slow unravelling of
biopolitical identity, a depersonalised journey out to the erotic city
that exists alongside the business city. The eroticism here is not
primarily to do with sexuality, although it sometimes includes it: it is
an art of collective enjoyment, in which a world beyond work can –
however briefly – be glimpsed and grasped. Fugitive time, lost
afternoons, conversations that dilate and drift like smoke, walks that
have no particular direction and go on for hours, free parties in old
industrial spaces, still reverberating days later. The movement between
anonymity and encounter can be very quick in the city. Suddenly, you are
off the street and into someone’s life-space. Sometimes, it’s easier to
talk to people you don’t know. There are fleeting intimacies before we
melt back into the crowd, but the city has its own systems of recall: a
block of flats or a street you haven’t focused on for a long time will
remind you of people you met only once, years ago. Will you ever see
them again?

I got invited up for a cup of tea in one of those Tecton flats on the
Harrow road, one of the old men from the day centre I work in. I took
him up Kilburn High Road shopping and watered the fuchsias on his
balcony. We talked about the Blitz and hospitals mostly. He used to be a
scientist and wrote shopping lists on brown envelopes dated and filed in
a stack of biscuit tins.

I miss him.

I miss them all.

_Savage Messiah_ deploys anachronism as a weapon. At first sight, at
first touch – and tactility is crucial to the experience: the zine
doesn’t feel the same when it’s JPEGed on screen – _Savage Messiah_
seems like something familiar. The form itself, the mix of photographs,
typeface-text and drawings, the use of scissors and glue rather than
digital cut and paste; all of this make Savage Messiah seem out of time,
which is not to say out of date. There were deliberate echoes of the
para-art found on punk and postpunk record sleeves and fanzines from the
1970s and 1980s. Most insistently, I’m reminded of Gee Vaucher, who
produced the paradoxically photorealistically delirious record covers
and posters for anarcho-punk collective Crass. ‘I think with the look of
the zine I was trying to restore radical politics to an aesthetic that
had been rendered anodyne by advertising campaigns, Shoreditch club
nights etc.,’ Ford says. ‘That anarcho-punk look was everywhere but
totally emptied of its radical critique. It seemed important to go back
to that moment of the late ‘70s and early ‘80s to a point where there
was social upheaval, where there were riots and strikes, exciting
cultural scenes and ruptures in the fabric of everyday life.’ The
‘return’ to the postpunk moment is the route to an alternative present.
Yet this is a return only to a certain ensemble of styles and methods –
nothing quite like _Savage Messiah_ actually existed back then.

_Savage Messiah_ is a gigantic, unfinished collage, which – like the
city – is constantly reconfiguring itself. Macro-and micro-narratives
proliferate tuberously; spidery slogans recur; figures migrate through
various versions of London, sometimes trapped inside the drearily glossy
spaces imagined by advertising and regeneration propaganda, sometimes
free to drift. She deploys collage in much the same way William
Burroughs used it: as a weapon in time-war. The cut-up can dislocate
established narratives, break habits, allow new associations to
coalesce. In _Savage Messiah_, the seamless, already-established
capitalist reality of London dissolves into a riot of potentials.

_Savage Messiah_ is written for those who could not be regenerated, even
if they wanted to be. They are the unregenerated, a lost generation,
‘always yearning for the time that just eluded us’: those who were born
too late for punk but whose expectations were raised by its incendiary
afterglow; those who watched the Miners’ Strike with partisan adolescent
eyes but who were too young to really participate in the militancy;
those who experienced the future-rush euphoria of rave as their
birthright, never dreaming that it could burn out like fried synapses;
those, in short, who simply did not find the ‘reality’ imposed by the
conquering forces of neoliberalism liveable. It’s adapt or die, and
there are many different forms of death available to those who can’t
pick up the business buzz or muster the requisite enthusiasm for the
creative industries. Six million ways to die, choose one: drugs,
depression, destitution. So many forms of catatonic collapse. In earlier
times, ‘deviants, psychotics and the mentally collapsed’ inspired
militant-poets, situationists, Rave-dreamers. Now they are incarcerated
in hospitals, or languishing in the gutter.

No Pedestrian Access To Shopping Centre

Still, the mood of _Savage Messiah_ is far from hopeless. It’s not about
caving in, it’s about different strategies for surviving the deep
midwinter of Restoration London. People living on next to nothing, no
longer living the dream, but not giving up either: ‘Five years since the
last party but he held his plot, scavenging for food like a Ballardian
crash victim.’ You can go into suspended animation, knowing that the
time is not yet right, but waiting with cold reptile patience until it
is. Or you can flee Dystopian London without ever leaving the city,
avoiding the central business district, finding friendly passages
through the occupied territory, picking your way through the city via
cafes, comrade’s flats, public parks. _Savage Messiah_ is an inventory
of such routes, such passages through ‘territories of commerce and
control’.

The zines are saturated in music culture. First of all, there are the
names of groups: Infa Riot and Blitz. Fragments of Abba, Heaven 17 on
the radio. Japan, Rudimentary Peni, Einstürzende Neubauten, Throbbing
Gristle, Spiral Tribe. Whether the groups are sublime or sub-charity
shop undesirable, these litanies have an evocative power that is quietly
lacerating. Gig posters from 30 years ago – Mob, Poison Girls, Conflict
– call up older versions of you, half-forgotten haircuts, long-lost
longings, stirring again. But the role of music culture goes much deeper
in _Savage Messiah_. The way the zine is put together owes as much to
the rogue dance and drug cultures that mutated from Rave as to punk
fanzines; its montage methodology has as much in common with the DJ mix
as with any precursor in visual culture. _Savage Messiah_ is also about
the relationship between music and place: the zine is also a testament
to the way in which the sensitive membranes of the city are reshaped by
music.

This sombre place is haunted by the sounds of lost acid house parties
and the distant reverberations of 1986. Test Department. 303. 808.
Traces of industrial noise.

The roundhouse was easy to get into, and the depot itself, disused for
years is lit up with tags and dubs.

You can hear these deserted places, feel the tendrils creeping across
the abandoned caverns, the derelict bunkers and broken terraces. Mid
summer, blistering heat under the concrete, Armagideon Time(s), a hidden
garden, to be found, and lost again.

Superficially, the obvious tag for _Savage Messiah_ would be
psychogeography, but the label makes Ford chafe. ‘I think a lot of what
is called psychogeography now is just middle-class men acting like
colonial explorers, showing us their discoveries and guarding their
plot. I have spent the last twenty years walking around London and
living here in a precarious fashion, I’ve had about fifty addresses. I
think my understanding and negotiation of the city is very different to
theirs.’ Rather than subsuming _Savage Messiah_ under the increasingly
played-out discourses of psychogeography, I believe it is better
understood as an example of a cultural coalescence that started to
become visible (and audible) at the moment when Ford began to produce
the zine: hauntology. ‘The London I conjure up…is imbued with a sense of
mourning,’ Ford says. ‘These are the liminal zones where the free party
rave scene once illuminated the bleak swathes of marshland and
industrial estates.’ So many dreams of collectivity have died in
neoliberal London. A new kind of human being was supposed to live here,
but that all had to be cleared away so that the restoration could begin.

Haunting is about a staining of place with particularly intense moments
of time, and, like David Peace, with whom her work shares a number of
affinities, Ford is alive to the poetry of dates. 1979, 1981, 2013:
these years recur throughout _Savage Messiah_, moments of transition and
threshold, moments when a whole alternative time-track opens. 2013 has a
post-apocalyptic quality (in addition to being the year of the London
Olympics, 2012 is also, according to some, the year that the Mayans
predicted for the end of the world). But 2013 could also be Year Zero:
the reversal of 1979, the time when all the cheated hopes and missed
chances are finally realised. _Savage Messiah_ invites us to see the
contours of another world in the gaps and cracks of an occupied London:

Perhaps it is here that the space can be opened up to forge a collective
resistance to this neo liberal expansion, to the endless proliferation
of banalities and the homogenising effects of globalisation. Here in the
burnt out shopping arcades, the boarded up precincts, the lost citadels
of consumerism one might find the truth, new territories might be
opened, there might be a rupturing of this collective amnesia.



NOMADALGIA: THE JUNIOR BOYS’ _SO THIS IS GOODBYE_


_k-punk post, March 4, 2006_

Space comes as standard with the Junior Boys. The synthpop that inspired
them remained attached, for the most part, to the three-minute format;
‘extended’ remixes were a concession to the imperatives of dance. Only
one of _So This is Goodbye’s_ 10 tracks is under four minutes. Space is
_integral_, not only to their sound, but to their songs. Space is a
compositional component, a presupposition of the songs, not something
retrospectively inserted at a producer’s whim. The pauses, the
imagist-allusiveness of the lyrics, the breathy phrasing would not work,
or make much sense, outside a plateau-architecture imported from dance;
crushed into three minutes Junior Boys’ songs would lose more than
length.

House references are everywhere: the title track is gorgeously,
oneirically poised on a honeyed Mr Fingers’ plateau, and it is not only
the arpeggiated synth which drives many of the tracks that is
reminiscent of Jamie Principle. Yet the LP does not sound either like
House or like most previous attempts to synthesize pop with House. _So
This is Goodbye_ is like House if it had started in the wilds of Canada
rather the clubs of Chicago. Too many House-pop hybrids fill up House’s
space with business, hectic activity. On _Vocalcity_ and, to some extent
_The Present Lover_, Luomo did the opposite: dilating the Song into an
unfolding driftwork. But the Luomo LPs were more pop House than pop per
se. _So This is Goodbye_ is, however, very definitely a pop record; if
anything, it’s even more seductively catchy than _Last Exit_.

The obvious difference between _So This is Goodbye_ and its predecessor
is the absence of the tricksy stop-start stutter beats on the new
record. If Junior Boys’ inventiveness is no longer concentrated on
beats, that is a reflection as much of a decline of the surrounding pop
context as it a sign of the JB’s newfound taste for rhythmic classicism.
_Last Exit’s_ reworkings of Timbaland/Dem 2 tic-beats meant that it had
a relationship with a rhythmic psychedelia that was, then, still
mutating pop into new shapes. In the intervening period, of course, both
hip hop and British garage have taken a turn for the brutalist, and pop
has consequently been deprived of any modernising force. Timbaland’s
beat surrealism became water-treading repetition years ago, displaced by
the ultra-realist thuggish plod of corporate hip hop and the ugly
carnality of crunk; and 2 Step’s ‘feminine pressure’ has long since been
crushed by the testos-terone-saturated bluntness of Grime and Dubstep.
That skunk-fugged heaviness remains the antipodes of the Junior Boys’
cyberian, etherealised, plaintive physicality; listening to the Junior
Boys after Grime or Dubstep is like walking out of a locker room thick
with dope smoke out onto a Caspar David Friedrich mountain. A
lung-cleansing experience. (Significant also that those other
ultra-heterosexual post-Garage musics should have bred out the influence
of House, while the Junior Boys return to it so emphatically.)

But the removal of rhythmic tricksiness perhaps also indicates something
of the scale of the Junior Boys’ pop ambitions, which are best seen as
the pioneering of a New MOR rather than another attempt at New Pop. If
there is no cutting edge, then it makes more sense to abandon the former
margins and refurbish the middle of the road. The Junior Boys’ songs
have always had more in common with a certain type of modernist MOR –
Hall and Oates, Prefab Sprout, Blue Nile, Lindsay Buckingham – than with
any rock. Modernist MOR is the opposite of the discredited strategy of
entryism: it doesn’t ‘conform to deform’, it locates the alien right in
the heart of the familiar. The problem with current Pop is not the
predominance of MOR, but the fact that MOR has been corrupted by the
wheedling whine of Indie authenticity. In any just world, the Junior
Boys, not the drippy moroseness of James Blunt nor the earthy
earnestness of KT Tunstall, would be the globally dominant MOR brand in
2006.

Ultimately, though, _So This is Goodbye_ sounds more middle of the
tundra than middle of the road. It’s as if the Junior Boys’ journey into
North America Endless has continued beyond the late-night freeways of
_Last Exit_. It’s like the first LP’s city lights and Edward Hopper
coffee bars have receded, and we’re taken out, beyond even the small
towns, into the depopulated wildernesses of Canada’s Northern
Territories. Or rather, it’s as if those wildernesses have crept into
the very marrow of the record. In _The Idea of North_, Glenn Gould
suggests that the North’s icy desolation has a special pull on the
Canadian imagination. You hear this on _So This is Goodbye_ not in any
positive content so much as in the songs’ gaps and absences; the gaps
and absences that make the song what they are.

Those crevices and grottoes seem to multiply as the album progresses.
The second half of the album (what I hear as the ‘second side’; one of
the most gratifying things about _So This is Goodbye_ is that it is
structured like a classic pop album, not an extras-clogged CD) diffuses
forward motion into trails of electro-cumulae. The title track sets
stately synths against the anticlimactic urgency of Acid House’s Forever
Now: the effect like running up a down escalator, frozen in an aching
moment of transition. ‘Like a child’ and ‘Caught in a Wave’ immerse the
agitated drive of the LP’s signature arpeggiated synth in a vapour trail
of opiated atmospherics.

The reading of Sinatra’s ‘When No-one Cares’ is the knot which holds
together all of _So This is Goodbye_, a clue to its modernist MOR
intentions (lines from the song – ‘count souvenirs’, ‘like a child’ –
provide the titles for other tracks, almost as if the song is a puzzle
the whole album is trying to solve). _So This is Goodbye’s_ songs bear
much the same relation to high-energy as the late Sinatra’s bore to big
band jazz: what was once a communal, dance-oriented music has been
hollowed out into a cavernous, contemplative space for the most solitary
of musings. On the Junior Boys’ ‘When No-one Cares’ beats are abandoned
altogether, the track’s ‘endless night’ lit only by the dying-star
flares and stalactite-by-flashlight pulse of reverbed electronics.

The Junior Boys have transformed the song from the lonely-crowd
melancholy of the original – Frank at the bar staring into his whisky
sour, happy couples partying obliviously behind him (or in his
imagination) – into a lament whispered in the wilderness, icy-breathed
into the black mirror indifference of a Great Lake at midnight. It is as
cosmically desolated as the Young Gods’ version of ‘September Song’, as
arctic-white as Miles Davis’ _Aura_. ‘When No-one Cares’ is one of my
favourite Sinatra songs, and I must have first heard it 20 years ago,
but with the Junior Boys’ version – which makes the catatonic stasis of
the original’s grief seem positively busy – it is as if I am hearing the
words for the first time.

Sinatra’s _No-One Cares_ (which could have been subtitled: _From
Penthouse to Satis House)_ was like pop’s take on literary modernism, an
_affect_ (rather than a concept) album, a series of takes on a
particular theme – disconnection from a hyper-connected world – with
Frank the ageing sophisticate adrift in the McLuhan wasteland of the
late 50s, Elvis already here, the Beatles on the way (who is the
‘no-one’ who doesn’t care if not the teen audience who have found new
objects of adoration?), the telephone and the television offering only
new ways to be lonely. _So This is Goodbye_ is like a globalised update
of _No-One Cares_, its images of ‘hotel lobbies’, ‘shopping malls we’ll
never see again’ and ‘homes for sale’ sketching a world in a state of
permanent impermance (should we say precarity?). The songs are
overwhelmingly preoccupied with leave-taking and change, fixated on
doing things for the first or the last time. ‘So This is Goodbye’ is not
the title track for nothing.

Sinatra’s melancholy was the melancholy of mass (old) media technology –
the ‘extimacy’ of the records facilitated by the phonograph and the
microphone, and expressing a peculiarly cosmopolitan and urban sadness.
‘I’ve flown around the world in plane/ designed the latest IBM brain/
but lately I’m so downhearted’, Sinatra song on _No-One Cares’_ ‘I Can’t
Get Started’. Jetsetting is now not the privilege of the elite so much
as a veritiginous mundanity for a permanently dispossessed global
workforce. Every town has become the ‘tourist town’ alluded to in _So
This is Goodbye’s_ final track, ‘FM’, because now at home everyone is a
tourist, both in the sense of permanently on the move but also in the
sense of having the world at their fingertips, via the net. If Sinatra’s
best records, like Hopper’s paintings, were about the way in which the
urban experience produces new forms of isolation (and also: that such
mass mediated private moments are the only mode of affective connection
in a fragmented world), then _So this is Goodbye_ is a response to the
cyberspatial commonplace that, with the net, even the most remote spot
can be connected up (and also: that such connection often amounts to a
communion of lonely souls). Hence the impression that, if Sinatra’s
‘When No-one Cars’ was an unanswered call from the heartless heart of
the Big Apple, then the Junior Boys’ version has been phoned-in down a
digital line from the edge of Lake Ontario. (Is it accidental that the
term ‘cyberspace’ was invented by a Canadian?)

_So this is Goodbye_ is a very _travel sick_ record. It expresses what
we might call _nomadalgia_. Nomadalgia, the sickness _of_ travel, would
be a complement to, not the opposite of, the sickness _for_ home,
nostalgia. (And what of the relation between nomadalgia and hauntology?)
It’s entirely fitting that the final track, ‘FM’, should invoke both ‘a
return home’ and radio (not the only reference to that ghost-medium on
the album), since internet radio – with local stations available from
any hotel in the world – is perhaps more than anything else the
objective correlative of our current condition. A condition in which, as
Žižek so aptly puts it, ‘global harmony and solipsism strangely
coincide. That is to say, does not our immersion in cyberspace go hand
in hand with our reduction to a Leibnizian monad which, although
“without windows” that would directly open up to external reality,
mirrors in itself the entire universe? Are we not more and more monads,
interacting alone with the PC screen, encountering only the virtual
simulacra, and yet immersed more than ever in the global network,
synchronously communicating with the entire globe?’ (‘No Sex Please, We
Are Post-humans’,
http://www.egs.edu/faculty/slavoj-zizek/articles/no-sex-please-we-are-post-humans/)



GREY AREA: CHRIS PETIT’S _CONTENT_


_BFI/ Sight & Sound Website, March 2010_

At one point in Chris Petit’s haunting new film _Content_, we drive
through Felixstowe container port. It was an uncanny moment for me,
since Felixstowe is only a couple of miles from where I now live – what
Petit filmed could have been shot from our car window. What made it all
the more uncanny was the fact that Petit never mentions that he is in
Felixstowe; the hangars and looming cranes are so generic that I began
to wonder if this might not be a doppelgänger container port somewhere
else in the world. All of this somehow underlined the way Petit’s text
describes these ‘blind buildings’ while his camera tracks along them:
‘non-places’, ‘prosaic sheds’, ‘the first buildings of a new age’ which
render ‘architecture redundant’.

_Content_ could be classified as an essay film, but it’s less essayistic
than aphoristic. This isn’t to say that it’s disconnected or incoherent:
Petit himself has called _Content_ a ‘21st-century road movie, ambient’,
and its reflections on ageing and parenthood, terrorism and new media
are woven into a consistency that’s non-linear, but certainly not
fragmentary.

_Content_ is about ‘correspondence’, in different senses of the word. It
was in part generated by electronic correspondence between Petit and his
two major collaborators: Ian Penman (whose text is voiced by the German
actor Hanns Zischler) and the German musician Antye Greie. Penman’s text
is a series of reflections on the subject of email, that ‘anonymous yet
intimate’ ethereal communication. Some of Penman’s disquisitions on
email are accompanied by images of postcards – the poignant tactility of
this obsolete form of correspondence all the more affecting because the
senders and addressees are now forgotten. Greie, meanwhile, produces
skeins of electronica that provide _Content_ with a kind of sonic
unconscious in which terms and concepts referred to in the images and
the voice track are refracted, extrapolated and supplemented.

One of the first phrases cited in Greie’s soundwork – which resembles
sketches for unrealised songs – is a quotation from Roy Batty’s famous
speech in _Blade Runner:_ ‘If only you could see what I have seen with
your eyes.’ This is a phrase Penman has made much of in his own writings
on recording, technology and haunting – and it brings us to the other
meaning of ‘correspon-dence’ _Content_ plays with: correspondences in
the sense of connections and associations. Some of these are underscored
by Petit in his dryly-poetic text; others he leaves the viewers to make
for themselves.

One of the most gratifying aspects of _Content_, in fact, is that by
contrast with so many contemporary television documentaries, which
neurotically hector the audience by incessantly reiterating their core
thesis, Petit trusts in the intelligence and speculative power of the
viewer. Where so much television now involves a mutual redundancy of
image and voice – the image is slaved into illustrating the text; the
voice merely glosses the image – _Content_ is in large part about the
spaces between image and text, what is unsaid in (and about) the images.

The use of a German actor and musician and the many references to Europe
in _Content_ reflect Petit’s childhood which, as he describes in the
film, was partly spent as a forces child in Germany. But it also
reflects Petit’s long-standing desire for some kind of reconciliation
between British culture and European modernism. Petit has described
_Content_ as an ‘informal coda’ to his 1979 film _Radio On_ (recently
reissued on BFI DVD). With its strong debt to European art cinema,
_Radio On_ projected a rapprochement between British and European film
that never happened – a rapprochement anticipated in the 1970s art pop
(Kraftwerk, Bowie) used so prominently in that film. Petit imagined a
British cinema that, like that music, could assert its Europeanness not
by rejecting America, but by confidently absorbing American influences.
Yet this future never arrived.

_‘Radio On,’_ Petit said in a recent interview, ‘ended with a car
‘stalled on the edge of the future’, which we didn’t know then would be
Thatcherism.’ Ahead lay a bizarre yet banal mix of the unprecedented and
the archaic. Instead of accelerating down Kraftwerk’s autobahn, we found
ourselves, as Petit puts it in _Content_, ‘reversing into a tomorrow
based on a non-existent past’, as the popular modernism _Radio On_ was
part of found itself eclipsed by a toxic-addictive confection of
consumer-driven populism, heritage kitsch, xenophobia and US corporate
culture. In this light, _Content_ stands as a quiet but emphatic
reproach to the British cinema of the last 30 years, which in its
dominant variants – drab social realism, faux gangster, picture-book
costume drama or mid-Atlantic middle-class fantasia – has retreated from
modernity. It isn’t only the poor and the nonwhite who are edited out of
_Notting Hill_, for example – it’s also the Westway, west London’s
Ballardian flyover, which now stands as a relic of ‘the modern city that
London never became’.

Yet _Content_ isn’t just a requiem for the lost possibilities of the
last 30 years. In its use of stunning but underused locations – the
ready-made post-Fordist science-fiction landscapes of Felixstowe
container port, the eerie Cold War terrain of nearby Orford Ness –
_Content_ demonstrates not only what British cinema overlooks, but what
it could still be.



POSTMODERN ANTIQUES: _PATIENCE (AFTER SEBALD)_


_Sight & Sound, April 2011_

The first time I saw Andrei Tarkovsky’s _Stalker –_ when it was
broadcast by Channel 4 in the early 1980s – I was immediately reminded
of the Suffolk landscapes where I had holidayed as a child. The
overgrown pill boxes, the squat Martello towers, the rusting groynes
which resembled gravestones: this all added up to a readymade science
fiction scene. At one point in Grant Gee’s _Patience (After Sebald)_
(2011) – an essay film inspired by W G Sebald’s novel _The Rings of
Saturn_ – theatre director Katie Williams makes the same connection,
drawing a comparison between the demilitarised expanses of the Suffolk
coast and Tarkovsky’s Zone.

When I read _Rings of Saturn_, I was hoping that it would be an
exploration of these eerily numinous spaces. Yet what I found was
something rather different: a book that, it seemed to me at least,
morosely trudged through the Suffolk spaces without really looking at
them; that offered a Mittel–brow miserabilism, a stock disdain, in which
the human settlements are routinely dismissed as shabby and the inhuman
spaces are oppressive. The landscape in _The Rings of Saturn_ functions
as a thin conceit, the places operating as triggers for a literary
ramble which reads less like a travelogue than a librarian’s listless
daydream. Instead of engaging with previous literary encounters with the
Suffolk – Henry James went on a walking tour of the county; his namesake
MR James set two of his most atmospheric ghost stories there – Sebald
tends to reach for the likes of Borges. My scepticism was fed by the
solemn cult that settled around Sebald suspiciously quickly, and which
seemed all-too-ready to admire those well-wrought sentences. Sebald
offered a rather _easy difficulty_, an anachronistic, antiqued model of
‘good literature’ which acted as if many of the developments in 20th
century experimental fiction and popular culture had never happened. It
is not hard to see why a German writer would want to blank out the
middle part of the 20th century; and many of the formal anachronisms of
Sebald’s writing – its strange sense that this is the 21st century seen
through the restrained yet ornate prose of an early 20th century
essayist – perhaps arise from this desire, just as the novels themselves
are about the various, ultimately failed, ruses – conscious and
unconscious – that damaged psyches deploy to erase traumas and construct
new identities. The writer Robert Macfarlane has called Sebald a
‘postmodern antiquarian’, and the indeterminate status of _The Rings of
Saturn –_ is it autobiography, a novel or a travelogue? – points to a
certain playfulness, but this never emerges at the level of the book’s
content. It was necessary for Sebald to remain po-faced in order for the
‘antiquing’ to be successful. Some of Gee’s images of Suffolk take their
cue from the black and white photographs which illustrate _The Rings Of
Saturn_. But the photographs were a contrivance: Sebald would photocopy
them many times until they achieved the required graininess.

Gee’s film was premiered as part of a weekend of events superbly curated
by Gareth Evans of Artevents under the rubric _After Sebald: Place and
Re-Enchantment_ at Snape Maltings, near Aldeburgh, in Suffolk. In the
end, however, Sebald’s novels fits into any discussion of place and
enchantment only very awkwardly: his work is more about displacement and
disenchantment than their opposites. In _Patience (After Sebald)_, the
artist Tacita Dean observes that only children have a real sense of
home. Adults are always aware of the precariousness and transitoriness
of their dwelling place: none more so than Sebald, a German writer who
spent most of his life in Norfolk.

_Patience (After Sebald)_ follows Gee’s documentaries about Radiohead
and Joy Division. The shift from rock to literature, Gee told
Macfarlane, was one that came naturally to someone whose sensibilities
were formed by the UK music culture of the 1970s. If Sebald had been
writing in the 1970s, Gee claimed, he would surely have been mentioned
in the NME alongside other luminaries of avant-garde literature. Gee
started reading Sebald in 2004, after a recommendation from his friend,
the novelist Jeff Noon. The film’s somewhat gnomic title was a relic of
an earlier version of what the film would be. It now suggests the
slowing of time that the Suffolk landscape imposes, a release from urban
urgencies, but it is actually a reference to a passage in Sebald’s novel
_Austerlitz:_ ‘Austerlitz told me that he sometimes sat here for hours,
laying out these photographs or others from his collection the wrong way
up, as if playing a game of patience, and that then one by one, he
turned them over, always with a new sense of surprise at what he saw,
pushing the pictures back and forth and over each other, arranging them
in an order depending on their family resemblances, or withdrawing them
from the game until either there was nothing left but the grey tabletop,
or he felt exhausted from the constant effort of thinking and
remembering and had to rest on the ottoman.’

Gee had originally intended to make a film about the non-places in
Sebald’s work: the hotel rooms or railway station waiting rooms in which
characters ruminate, converse or break down (Austerlitz himself comes to
a shattering revelation about his own identity in the waiting room at
Liverpool Street station). In the end, however, Gee was drawn to the
book which – osten-sibly at least – is most focused on a single
landscape.

Gee filmed practically everything himself, using a converted 16 mm Bolex
camera. He wanted something that would produce frames that were ‘tighter
than normal’, he said, ‘as if a single character is looking’. Gee sees
_Patience (After Sebald)_ as an essay film, in the tradition of Chris
Petit’s work and Patrick Keiller’s Robinson trilogy. But when I put it
to him that _Patience_ lacks the single voice that defines Petit or
Keiller’s essay films, Gee responded self-deprecatingly. He had tried to
insert himself into his own films, but he had always been dissatisfied
with the results: his voice didn’t sound right; his acting didn’t
convince; his writing wasn’t strong enough. In _Patience_, as in the Joy
Division documentary, the story is therefore told by others: Macfarlane,
Dean, Iain Sinclair, Petit, the literary critic Marina Warner and the
artist Jeremy Millar. Millar provided one of the most uncanny images in
_Patience_. When he lit a firework in tribute to Sebald, the smoke
unexpectedly formed a shape which resembled Sebald’s face, something
which Gee underlines in the film by animating a transition between
Millar’s photograph and an image of the novelist.

More than one of the speakers at the Towards Re-Enchantment symposium
acknowledged that they misremem-bered _The Rings of Saturn_. There’s
something fitting about this, of course, given that the duplicity of
memory might have been Sebald’s major theme; but my suspicion is that
misremembering of a different kind contributes to the _Rings of Saturn_
cult; that the book induces its readers to hallucinate a text that is
not there, but which meets their desires – for a kind of modernist
travelogue, a novel that would do justice to the Suffolk landscape –
better than Sebald’s actually novel does. _Patience (After Sebald)_ is
itself a misremembering of _The Rings of Saturn_ which could not help
but reverse many of the novel’s priorities and emphases. In _The Rings
of Saturn_, Suffolk frequently (and frustratingly) recedes from
attention, as Sebald follows his own lines of association. By contrast,
the main substance of the film consists of images of the Suffolk
landscape – the heathland over which you can walk for miles without
seeing a soul, the crumbling cliffs of the lost city of Dunwich, the
enigma of Orford Ness, its inscrutable pagodas silently presiding over
Cold War military experiments which remain secret. Sebald’s reflections,
voiced in _Patience_ by Jonathan Pryce, anchor these images far less
securely than they do in the novel. At Snape, some of those who had
re-created Sebald’s walk – including Gee himself – confessed that they
had failed to attain the author’s lugubrious mood: the landscape turned
out to be too energising, its sublime desolation proving to be fallow
ground for gloomy psychological interiority. In a conversation with
Robert Macfarlane after the screening of the film, Gee said that it was
not really necessary that Sebald had taken the walk. He meant that it
was not important whether or not Sebald actually did the walk exactly as
_The Rings of Saturn’s_ narrator described it, in one go: that the novel
could have been based on a number of different walks which took place
over a longer period of time. But I couldn’t help but hear Gee’s remark
in a different way: that it was not necessary for Sebald to have taken
the walk _at all:_ that, far from being a close engagement with the
Suffolk terrain, _The Rings of Saturn_ could have been written had
Sebald never set foot in Suffolk.

This was the view of Richard Mabey, cast in the role of doubting Thomas
at the Towards Re-Enchantment symposium. Mabey – who has written and
broadcast about nature for 40 years, and whose latest book _Weeds_ has
the glorious subtitle _How Vagabond Plants Gatecrashed Civilisation and
Changed the Way We Think About Nature_ – argued that Sebald was guilty
of the pathetic fallacy. When he read _The Rings Of Saturn_, Mabey said,
he felt as if a very close friend had been belittled; although he had
walked the Suffolk coastland countless times, he couldn’t recognise it
from Sebald’s descriptions. But perhaps the issue with Sebald is that he
wasn’t guilty enough of the pathetic fallacy, that instead of staining
the landscape with his passions, as Thomas Hardy did with Wessex, or the
Brontes did with Yorkshire, or, more recently, as the musician Richard
Skelton has done with the Lancashire moorland – Sebald used Suffolk as a
kind of Rorschach blot, a trigger for associative processes that take
flight from the landscape rather than take root in it. In any case,
Mabey wanted a confrontation with nature in all its inhuman exteriority.
He sounded like a Deleuzean philosopher when he expostulated about the
‘nested heterogeneity’ and ‘autonomous poetry’ of micro-ecosytems to be
found in a cow’s hoof print; of how it was necessary to ‘think like a
mountain’, and quoted approvingly Virginia Woolf’s evocation of a
‘philosophising and dreaming land’. I was struck by the parallels
between Mabey’s account of nature and Patrick Keiller’s invocation of
lichen as ‘a non-human intelligence’ in _Robinson in Ruins_. With its
examination of the ‘undiscovered country of nearby’, Robert Macfarlane’s
film for the BBC, _The Wild Places of Essex_, shown as part of the
Towards Re-Enchantment symposium, was also close to Mabey’s vision of a
nature thriving in the spaces abandoned by, or inhospitable to, humans.
(Macfarlane’s film now seems like a counterpart to Julien Temple’s
wonderful _Oil City Confidential_, which rooted Dr Feelgood’s febrile
rhythm and blues in the lunar landscape of Essex’s Canvey Island.)
_Patience (After Sebald)_ could appeal to a Sebald sceptic like me
because – in spite of Sebald – it reaches the wilds of Suffolk. At the
same time, Gee’s quietly powerful film caused me to doubt my own
scepticism, sending me back to Sebald’s novels, in search of what others
had seen, but which had so far eluded me.



THE LOST UNCONSCIOUS: CHRISTOPHER NOLAN’S _INCEPTION_


_Film Quarterly, Vol. 64, No. 3, 2011_

In Christopher Nolan’s breakthrough memory-loss thriller _Memento_ from
2000, the traumatised and heavily tattooed protagonist Lenny has a
suggestive conversation with a detective:

TEDDY: Look at your police file. It was complete when I gave it to you.
Who took the twelve pages out?

LEONARD: You, probably.

TEDDY: No, you took them out.

LEONARD: Why would I do that?

TEDDY: To set yourself a puzzle you won’t ever solve.

Like Lenny, Christopher Nolan has specialised in setting puzzles that
can’t be solved. Duplicity – in the sense of both deception and doubling
– runs right through his work. It’s not only the case that Nolan’s work
is _about_ duplicity; it is itself duplicitous, drawing audiences into
labyrinths of indeterminacy.

Nolan’s films have a coolly obsessive quality, in which a number of
repeating elements – a traumatised hero and his antagonist; a dead
woman; a plot involving manipulation and dissimulation – are reshuffled.
These film noir tropes are then further scrambled in the manner of a
certain kind of neo-noir. Nolan acknowledges _Angel Heart_ (1987) and
_The Usual Suspects_ (1995) as touchstones (he mentions both in an
interview which is included on the _Memento_ DVD, singling out Parker’s
film as a particular inspiration), but one can also see parallels with
the meta-detective fictions of Robbe-Grillet and Paul Auster. There’s a
shift from the epistemological problems posed by unreliable narrators to
a more general ontological indeterminacy, in which the nature of the
whole fictional world is put into doubt.

_Memento_ remains emblematic in this respect. At first glance, the
film’s enigma resolves relatively simply. Lenny, who suffers from
anterograde amnesiac condition which means that he can’t make new
memories, is ‘setting puzzles for himself that can’t be solved’ so that
he can always be pursuing his wife’s murderer, long after Lenny has
killed him. But after repeated viewings, the critic Andy Klein – in a
piece for Salon.com pointedly entitled ‘Everything You Wanted To Know
About _Memento’–_ conceded that he wasn’t ‘able to come up with the
‘truth’ about what transpired prior to the film’s action. Every
explanation seems to involve some breach of the apparent ‘rules’ of
Leonard’s disability – not merely the rules as he explains them, but the
rules as we witness them operating throughout most of the film.) The
rules are crucial to Nolan’s method. If _Memento_ is a kind of
impossible object, then its impossibility is generated not via an
anything-goes ontological anarchy but by the setting up of rules which
it violates in particular ways – just as the effect of Escher’s
paintings depend upon unsettling rather than ignoring the rules of
perspective.

Nolan nevertheless maintains that, however intractable his films might
appear, they are always based on a definitive truth which he knows but
will not reveal. As he said of _Inception_ in the interview with _Wired,
‘I’ve_ always believed that if you make a film with ambiguity, it needs
to be based on a true interpretation. If it’s not, then it will
contradict itself, or it will be somehow insubstantial and end up making
the audience feel cheated. Ambiguity has to come from the inability of
the character to know – and the alignment of the audience with that
character’. When the interviewer Robert Capps puts it to Nolan that
there might be several explanations of the film’s ending, that the
‘right answer’ is impossible to find, the director flatly contradicts
him: ‘Oh no, I’ve got an answer.’ But Nolan’s remarks may only be
another act of misdirection; and, if a century of cultural theory has
taught us anything, it is that an author’s supposed intentions can only
ever constitute a supplementary (para)text, never a final word. What are
Nolan’s films about, after all, but the instability of any master
position? They are full of moments in which the manipulator – the one
who looks, writes or narrates – becomes the manipulated – the object of
the gaze, the character in a story written or told by someone else.

In _Inception_, Cobb is an ‘extractor’, an expert at a special kind of
industrial espionage, which involves entering into people’s dreams and
stealing their secrets. He and his team have been hired by hyper-wealthy
businessman Saito to infiltrate the dreams of Robert Fischer, the heir
to a massive energy conglomerate. But this time Cobb’s team is not
required to extract information, but to do something which the film
tells is much more difficult: they are tasked with implanting an idea
into Fischer’s mind. Cobb’s effectiveness as a dream thief is
compromised by the projection of his dead wife, Mal, the pathological
stain he now brings with him into any dream caper. Mal died after she
suffered an apparent psychotic break. She and Cobb set up a lover’s
retreat in the ‘unconstructed dreamspace’ that the dream thieves call
Limbo. But after she became too attached to this virtual love nest, Cobb
‘incepted’ in her the idea that the world in which they were living was
not real. As Cobb mordantly observes, there is nothing more resilient
than an idea. Even when she is restored to what Cobb takes to be
reality, Mal remains obsessed with the idea that she the world around
her is not real, so she throws herself from a hotel window in order to
return to what she believes is the real world. The film turns on how
Cobb deals with this traumatic event – in order to incept Fischer, Cobb
has first of all to descend into Limbo and defeat Mal. He achieves this
by simultaneously accepting his part in Mal’s death and by repudiating
the Mal projection as an inadequate copy of his dead wife. With the Mal
projection vanquished and the dream-heist successfully completed, Cobb
is finally able to return to the children from whom he has been
separated. Yet this ending has more than a suggestion of wish fulfilment
fantasy about it, and the suspicion that Cobb might be marooned
somewhere in a multi-layered oneirc labyrinth, a psychotic who has
mistaken dreams for reality, makes _Inception_ deeply ambiguous. Nolan’s
own remarks have carefully maintained the ambiguity.’ I choose to
believe that Cobb gets back to his kids,’ Nolan told Robert Capps.

Nolan’s films are preoccupied with, to paraphrase _Memento’s_ Teddy,
‘the lies that we tell ourselves to stay happy’. Yet the situation is
worse even than that. It’s one thing to lie to oneself; it’s another to
not even know whether one is lying to oneself or not. This might be the
case with Cobb in _Inception_, and it’s notable that, in the _Wired_
interview, Nolan says that ‘The most important emotional thing about the
top spinning at the end is that Cobb is not looking at it. He doesn’t
care.’ Not caring whether we are lying to ourselves may be the price for
happiness – or at least the price one pays for release from excruciating
mental anguish. In this respect, Dormer in _Insomnia_ (2002) could be
the anti-Cobb. His inability to sleep – which naturally also means an
inability to dream – correlates with the breakdown of his capacity to
tell himself a comforting story about who he is. After the shooting of
his partner, Dormer’s identity collapses into a terrifying
epistemological void, a black box that cannot be opened. He simply
doesn’t know whether or not he intended to kill his partner (just as
Borden in _The Prestige_ cannot remember which knot he tied on the night
that Angier’s wife died in a bungled escapology act.) But in Nolan’s
worlds, it is not only that we deceive ourselves; it is also that we are
deceived about having a self. There is no separating identity from
fiction. In _Memento_, Lenny literally writes (on) himself, but the very
fact that he can write a script for future versions of himself is a
horrifying demonstration of his lack of any coherent identity – a
revelation that his Sisyphian quest both exemplifies and is in flight
from. _Inception_ leaves us with the possibility that Cobb’s quest and
apparent rediscovery of his children could be a version of the same kind
of loop: a Purgatorio to _Memento’s_ Inferno.

‘The urge to rewrite ourselves as real-seeming fictions is present in us
all,’ writes Christopher Priest in his novel _The Glamour_. It’s not at
all surprising that Nolan has adapted a novel by Priest, since there are
striking parallels between the two men’s methods and interests. Priest’s
novels are also ‘puzzles that can’t be solved’, in which writing,
biography and psychosis slide into one another, posing troubling
ontological questions about memory, identity and fiction. The idea of
minds as datascapes which can be infiltrated inevitably puts one in mind
of the ‘consensual hallucination’ of Gibson’s cyberspace, but the
dreamsharing concept can be traced back to Priest and his extraordinary
1977 novel, _A Dream of Wessex_. In Priest’s novel, a group of
researcher-volunteers use a ‘dream projector’ to enter into a shared
dream of a (then) future England. Like the dreamsharing addicts we
briefly glimpse in one of _Inception’s_ most suggestive scenes, some of
the characters in _A Dream of Wessex_ inevitably prefer the simulated
environment to the real world, and, unlike Cobb, they choose to stay
there. The differences in the way that the concept of shared dreaming is
handled in 1977 and 2010 tell us a great deal about the contrasts
between social democracy and neoliberalism. While _Inception’s_
dreamsharing technology is – like the internet – a military invention
turned into a commercial application, Priest’s shared dream project is
government-run. The Wessex dream world is lyrical and languid, still
part of the hazy afterglow of 60s psychedelia. It’s all a far cry from
_Inception’s_ noise and fury, the mind as a militarised zone.

_Inception_ (not entirely satisfactorily) synthesizes the intellectual
and metaphysical puzzles of _Memento_ and _The Prestige_ (2006) with the
big budget ballistics of _Batman Begins_ (2005) and _The Dark Knight_
(2008). The problem is the prolonged action sequences, which come off as
perfunctory at best. At points, it as if _Inception’s_ achievement is to
have provided a baroquely sophisticated motivation for some very dumb
action sequences. An unkind viewer might think that the entirety of
_Inception’s_ complex ontological structure had been constructed to
justify clichés of action cinema – such as the ludicrous amount of
things that characters can do in the time that it takes for a van to
fall from a bridge into a river. Blogger Carl Neville complains that
_Inception_ amounts to ‘three uninvolving action movies playing out
simultaneously’ ‘What could have been a fascinatingly vertiginous trip
into successively fantastic, impossible worlds, not to mention the limbo
of the raw unconscious into which a couple of the central characters
plunge,’ Neville argues,

ends up looking wholly like a series of action movies, one within the
other: “reality” looks and feels like a “globalisation” movie, jumping
from Tokyo to Paris to Mombasa to Sydney with a team of basically decent
technical geniuses who are forced to live outside the law, making sure
there are lots of helicopter shots of cityscapes and exotic local
colour. Level one dream is basically _The Bourne Identity_…rainy, grey,
urban. Level two is the _Matrix_, zero gravity fistfights in a modernist
hotel, level three, depressingly, turns out to be a 70s Bond film while
the raw Id is basically just a collapsing cityscape.

The ‘level three’ snow scenes at least resemble one of the most visually
striking Bond films – 1969’s _On Her Majesty’s Secret Service –_ but
it’s hard not to share Neville’s sense of anti-climax. Rather than
picking up pace and ramping up the metaphysical complexity, the film
rushes towards its disappointing denouement. The elaborate set-up
involving the ‘dream architect’ Ariadne is summarily abandoned, as she
is told to forget the labyrinth and ‘find the most direct route
through.’ When Ariadne and the film accede to these demands, it as if
the imperatives of the action thriller have crashed through the
intricacies of Nolan’s puzzle narrative with all the subtlety of the
freight train that erupts into the cityscape in an earlier scene.

Neville is right that _Inception_ is very far from being a
‘fascinat-ingly vertiginous trip into successively fantastic, impossible
worlds’, but it is worth thinking about why Nolan showed such restraint.
(His parsimony couldn’t contrast more starkly with the stylistic
extravagances of something like Peter Jackson’s _The Lovely Bones_
(2009), which aims at the fantastic and the impossible, but ends up
CGI-onanistic rather than lyrically oneiric.) One initially strange
thing about _Inception_ is how _un-dreamlike_ the dreams in the film
are. It’s tempting to see the Nolan of _Inception_ as a reverse
Hitchcock – where Hitchcock took De Chirico-like dream topographies and
remotivated them as thriller spaces, Nolan takes standard action flick
sequences and repackages them as dreams. Except in a scene where the
walls seem to close in around Cobb when he is being pursued – which,
interestingly, takes place in the film’s apparent ‘reality’ – the
spatial distortions at work in _Inception_ do not resemble the ways in
which dreams distend or collapse space. There are none of the bizarre
adjacencies or distances that do not diminish that we see in Welles’s
_The Trial_ (1962), a film which, perhaps better than any other,
captures the uncanny topographies of the anxiety dream. When, in one of
_Inception’s_ most remarked upon scenes, Ariadne causes the Paris
cityspace to fold up around herself and Cobb, she is behaving more like
the CGI engineer who is creating the scene than any dreamer. This is a
display of technical prowess, devoid of any charge of the uncanny. The
Limbo scenes, meanwhile, are like an inverted version of Fredric
Jameson’s ‘surrealism without the unconscious’: this is an unconscious
without surrealism. The world that Cobb and Mal ‘create’ out of their
memories is like a Powerpoint presentation of a love affair rendered as
some walk-through simulation: faintly haunting in its very lack of
allure, quietly horrifying in its solipsistic emptiness. Where the
unconscious was, there CGI shall be.

In an influential blog post, Devin Faraci argues that the whole film is
a metaphor for cinematic production itself: Cobb is the director, Arthur
the producer, Ariadne the screenwriter, Saito ‘the big corporate suit
who fancies himself a part of the game’, Fischer the audience. ‘Cobb, as
a director, takes Fischer through an engaging, stimulating and exciting
journey,’ Faraci argues, ‘one that leads him to an understanding about
himself. Cobb is the big time movie director…who brings the action, who
brings the spectacle, but who also brings the meaning and the humanity
and the emotion.’ In fact, as a director Cobb is something of a
mediocrity (who we must conclude is far less accomplished than Nolan) –
as Neville argues, Fischer’s ‘journey’ takes him through a series of
standard-issue action set pieces, which are ‘engaging, stimulating and
exciting’ only in some weakly generic way. Significantly and
symptomatically, Faraci’s hyperbole here sounds as if it might belong in
a marketing pitch for Cobb and his team; just as when Cobb and the
others eulogise the ‘creativity’ of the dream architecture process –
_you can create worlds that never existed!_ – they sound like they are
reciting advertising copy or the script from a corporate video. The
scenes in which the team prepare for Fischer’s inception might have been
designed to bring out the depressing vacuousness of the concept of the
‘creative industries’. They play like a marketing team’s own fantasies
about what they themselves are doing: the view from inside an
_Apprentice_ contestant’s head, perhaps. In any case, _Inception_ seems
to be less a meta-meditation on the power of cinema than a reflection of
the way in which cinematic techniques have become imbricated into a
banal spectacle which – fusing business machismo, entertainment
protocols and breathless hype – enjoys an unprecedented dominion over
our working lives and our dreaming minds.

It is no doubt this sense of pervasive mediation, of generalised
simulation, that tempts Faraci into claiming that _‘Inception_ is a
dream to the point where even the dream-sharing stuff is a dream. Dom
Cobb isn’t an extractor. He can’t go into other people’s dreams. He
isn’t on the run from the Cobol Corporation. At one point he tells
himself this, through the voice of Mal, who is a projection of his own
subconscious. She asks him how real he thinks his world is, where he’s
being chased across the globe by faceless corporate goons.’ The moment
when Mal confronts Cobb with all this is reminiscent of the scene in
Verhoeven’s _Total Recall_ (1990) when a psychiatrist attempts to
persuade Arnold Schwarzenegger’s Quaid that he is having a psychotic
breakdown. But while _Total Recall_ presents us with a strong
distinction between Quaid’s quotidian identity as a construction worker
and his life as a secret agent at the centre of an interplanetary
struggle – a distinction that the film very quickly unsettles –
_Inception_ gives us only Cobb the generic hero: handsome, dapper, yet
troubled. If, as Faraci claims, Cobb isn’t an extractor and he isn’t on
the run from faceless corporate goons, then who is he? The ‘real’ Cobb
would then be an unrepresented X, outside the film’s reality labyrinth –
the empty figure who identifies with (and as) Cobb the
commercially-constructed fiction; ourselves, in other words, insofar as
we are successfully interpellated by the film.

This leads to another difference between _Inception_ and its Philip K
Dick-inspired 80s and 90s precursors such as _Total Recall_,
_Videodrome_ (1983) and _Existenz_ (1999). There is very little of the
‘reality bleed’, the confusion of ontological hierarchy, that defined
those films: throughout _Inception_, it is surprisingly easy for both
the audience and the characters to remember where they are in the film’s
ontological architecture. When Ariadne is being trained by Cobb’s
partner, Arthur, she is taken round a virtual model of the impossible
Penrose Steps. On the face of it, however, _Inception_ is remarkable for
its seeming failure to explore any paradoxical Escheresque topologies.
The four different reality levels remain distinct, just as the causality
between them remains well-formed. But this apparently stable hierarchy
might be violated by the object upon which much of the discussion of the
film’s ending has centred: the thimble, the ‘totem’ that Cobb ostensibly
uses to determine whether he is in waking reality or not. If it spins
without falling, then he is in a dream. If it falls, then he is not.
Many have noted the inadequacy of this supposed proof. At best, it can
only establish that Cobb is not in his ‘own’ dream, for what is there to
stop his dreaming mind simulating the properties of the real thimble?
Besides, in the film’s chronology, the thimble – that ostensible token
of the empirical actual – first of all appears as a _virtual_ object,
secreted by Mal inside a doll’s house in Limbo. And a totem, it should
be remembered, is an object of faith (it’s worth noting in passing that
there are many references to faith throughout the film).

The association of the thimble with Mal – there are online debates as to
whether the thimble was first of all Cobb’s or Mal’s – is suggestive.
Both Mal and the thimble represent competing versions of the Real. For
Cobb, the thimble stands in for the Anglo-Saxon empiricist tradition’s
account of what reality is – something sensible, tangible. Mal, by
contrast, represents a psychoanalytic Real – a trauma that disrupts any
attempt to maintain a stable sense of reality; that which the subject
cannot help bringing with him no matter where he goes. (Mal’s
malevolent, indestructible persistence recalls the sad resilience of the
projections which haunt the occupants of the space station in
Tarkovsky’s _Solaris_ (1972).) No matter what ‘reality level’ Cobb is
on, Mal and the thimble are always there. But where the thimble
supposedly ‘belongs’ to the ‘highest’ reality level, Mal ‘belongs’ to
the ‘lowest’ level, the lover’s limbo which Cobb repudiated.

Mal conflates two roles that had been kept separate in Nolan’s films –
the antagonist-double and the grief object. In Nolan’s _debut,
Following_ (1998), the antagonist-double of the unnamed protagonist is
the thief who shares his name with _Inception’s_ hero. The theme of the
antagonist-double is nowhere more apparent than in Nolan’s remake of
_Insomnia_ and _The Dark Knight_, films which are in many ways _about_
the proximity between the ostensible hero and his beyond-good-and-evil
rival. Nolan’s adaptation of Christopher Priest’s novel, _The Prestige_,
meanwhile, is in effect a film in which there is a defining antagonism
but no single protagonist: by the end of the film, the illusionists
Angier and Borden are doubled in multiple ways, just as they are defined
and destroyed by their struggle with one another. More often than not,
grief is the source of these antagonistic doublings. Grief itself is a
puzzle that cannot be solved, and there’s a certain (psychic) economy in
collapsing the antagonist into the grief object, since the work of grief
is not only about mourning the lost object, it is also about struggling
against the object’s implacable refusal to let go. Yet there’s something
hollow about Cobb’s grief; on its own terms, it doesn’t convince as
anything other than a genre-required character trait. It instead to
stand in for something else, another sadness – a loss that the film
points to but can’t name.

One aspect of this loss concerns the unconscious itself, and here we
might take Nolan’s script quite literally. For those with a
psychoanalytic _bent_, the script’s repeated references to the
‘subconscious’ – as opposed to the unconscious – no doubt grate, but
this might have been a Freudian slip of a particularly revealing kind.
The terrain that _Inception_ lays out is no longer that of the classical
unconscious, that impersonal factory which, Jean-Francois Lyotard says,
psychoanalysis described ‘with the help of images of foreign towns or
countries such as Rome or Egypt, just like Piranesi’s _Prisons_ or
Escher’s _Other Worlds’. (Libidinal Economy_, Athlone, 1993, 164)
_Inception’s_ arcades and hotel corridors are indeed those of a
globalised capital, whose reach easily extends into the former depths of
what was once the unconscious. There is nothing alien, no _other place_
here, only a ‘subconscious’ recirculating deeply familiar images mined
from an ersatz psychoanalysis. So in place of the eerie enigmas of the
unconscious, we are instead offered an Oedipal-lite scene played out
between Robert Fischer and a projection of his dead father. The
off-the-shelf pre-masticated quality of this encounter is entirely
lacking in any of the weird idiosyncrasies which give Freud’s case
histories their power to haunt. Cod Freudianism has long been
metabolised by an advertising-entertainment culture which is now
ubiquitous, as psychoanalysis gives way to a psychotherapeutic self-help
that is diffused through mass media. It’s possible to read _Inception_
as a staging of this superseding of psychoanalysis, with Cobb’s apparent
victory over the Mal projection, his talking himself around to accepting
that she is just a fantasmatic substitute for his dead wife, almost a
parody of psychotherapy’s blunt pragmatism.

The question of whether Cobb is still dreaming or not at the film’s end
is ultimately too simple. For there is also the problem of _whose_ dream
Cobb might be in, if not his ‘own’. The old Freudian paradigm made this
a problem too, of course – but there the issue was the fact that the ego
was not master in its own house because the subject was constitutively
split by the unconscious. In _Inception_, the ego is still not a master
in its own house, but that is because the forces of predatory business
are everywhere. Dreams have ceased to be the spaces where private
pyschopathologies are worked through and have become the scenes where
competing corporate interests play out their banal struggles.
_Inception’s_ ‘militarised subconscious’ converts the infernal urgencies
and languid poise of the old unconscious into panicked persecution and a
consolatory familialism: pursued at work by videogame gunmen, you later
unwind with the kids building sandcastles on a beach. This is another
reason that the dreams in _Inception_ appear so undream-like. For, after
all, these are not ‘dreams’ in any conventional sense. The designed
virtual spaces of _Inception’s_ dreams, with their nested ‘levels’,
evidently resemble a videogame more than they recall dreams. In the era
of neuromarketing, we are presided over by what J G Ballard called
‘fictions of every kind’, the embedded literature of branding
consultancies, advertising agencies and games manufacturers. All of
which makes one of _Inception’s_ premisses – that it is difficult to
implant an idea in someone’s mind – strangely quaint. Isn’t ‘inception’
what so much late capitalist cognitive labour is about?

For inception to work, Arthur and Cobb tell Saito early in the film, the
subject must believe that the implanted idea is their own. The self-help
dictums of psychotherapy – which Cobb affirms at the end of _Inception
–_ offer invaluable assistance in this ideological operation. As Eva
Illouz argues, discussing the very conversion of psychoanalysis into
self-help that _Inception_ dramatises, ‘if we secretly desire our
misery, then the self can be made directly responsible for alleviating
it…The contemporary Freudian legacy is, and ironically so, that we are
in the full masters in our own house, even when, or perhaps especially
when, it is on fire.’ _(Cold Intimacies: The Making of Emotional
Capitalism_, Polity, 2007, 47) Yet our misery, like our dreams, our cars
and our refrigerators, is in fact the work of many anonymous hands. This
impersonal misery may be what _Inception_ is ultimately about. The
ostensibly upbeat ending and all the distracting boy-toy action cannot
dispel the non-specific but pervasive pathos that hangs over the film.
It’s a sadness that arises from the impasses of a culture in which
business has closed down any possibility of an outside – a situation
that _Inception_ exemplifies, rather than comments on. You yearn for
foreign places, but everywhere you go looks like local colour for the
film set of a commercial; you want to be lost in Escheresque mazes, but
you end up in an interminable car chase.



_HANDSWORTH SONGS_ AND THE ENGLISH RIOTS


_BFI/ Sight and Sound Website, September 2011_

‘I’m sure that a group of people who brought the British state to its
knees can organise themselves.’ So argued John Akomfrah, the director of
the Black Audio Film Collective’s _Handsworth Songs_ at a screening of
the film at Tate Modern last month. The film was released in 1986, a
year after riots in Handsworth, Birmingham and Tottenham. Not
surprisingly, given that the Tate had convened the event as a
consequence of the recent uprisings in England, the question of the
continuities and discontinuities between the 80s and now hung over the
whole evening, dominating the discussion that followed the screening.

Watched – and listened to – now, _Handsworth Songs_ seems eerily
(un)timely. The continuities between the 80s and now impose themselves
on the contemporary viewer with a breathtaking force: just as with the
recent insurrections, the events in 1985 were triggered by police
violence; and the 1985 denunciations of the riots as senseless acts of
criminality could have been made by Tory politicians yesterday. This is
why it is important to resist the casual story that things have
‘progressed’ in any simple linear fashion since _Handsworth Songs_ was
made. Yes, the BAFC can now appear at Tate Modern in the wake of new
riots in England, something unthinkable in 1985; but, as Rob White
pointed out in the discussion at the Tate event, there is little chance
now of _Handsworth Songs_ or its like appearing on Channel 4 now, still
less being commissioned. The assumption that brutal policing and racism
were relics of a bygone era was part of the reactionary narrativisation
of the recent riots: _yes, there was politics and racism_ back then,
_but not now, not any more_…The lesson to be remembered – especially now
that we are being asked to defend abortion and oppose the death penalty
again – is that struggles are never definitively won. As the academic
George Shire pointed out in the Tate discussion, many struggles have not
been lost so much as diverted into what he called ‘the privatisation of
politics’, as former activists become hired as ‘consultants’. Shire’s
remarks strikingly echoed recent comments made by Paul Gilroy. ‘When you
look at the layer of political leaders from our communities,’ Gilroy
observed, ‘the generation who came of age during that time 30 years ago,
many of those people have accepted the logic of privatization. They’ve
privatised that movement, and they’ve sold their services as consultants
and managers and diversity trainers.’ (See
http://dreamof-safety.blogspot.com/2011/08/paul-gilroy-speaks-on-riots-august-2011.html)
This points to one major discontinuity between now and 25 years ago. In
1985, political collectivities were in the process of being violently
decomposed – this was also the year in which the Miners’ Strike ended in
bitter defeat – as the neoliberal political programme began to impose
the ‘privatisation of the mind’ which is now everywhere taken for
granted. Akomfrah’s optimistic take on the current riots – that those
who rioted will come to constitute themselves as a collective agent –
suggests that we might be seeing the reversal of this psychic
privatisation.

One of many striking things about _Handsworth Songs_ is the serene
confidence of its experimental essayism. Instead of easy didacticism,
the film offers a complex palimpsest comprising archive material,
anempathic sound design and footage shot by the Collective during and
after the riots. The Collective’s practice coolly assumed, not only that
‘black’, ‘avant garde’ and ‘politics’ could co-exist, but that they must
entail one another. Such assumptions, such confidence, were all the more
remarkable for the fact that they were so hard won: the Collective’s
Lina Gopaul remembered that the idea of a black avant-garde was greeted
with incomprehension when the BAFC began their work. Even the sight of
young black people carrying cameras provoked bemusement: _are they
real?_ Gopaul recalled police officers asking as the Collective filmed
events in Handsworth and Broadwater Farm 25 years ago.

At a time when reactionaries once again feel able to make racist
generalisations about ‘black culture’ in mainstream media, the
Collective’s undoing of received ideas of what ‘black’ supposedly means
remains an urgent project. In _The Ghost of Songs: The Film Art of the
Black Audio Film Collective_, the outstanding survey of the BAFC’s work
that he co-edited with fellow Otolith Group member Anjalika Sagar, Kodwo
Eshun argued that, for the Collective, ‘black’ ‘might be profitably
understood…as a dimension of potentiality.’ At the Tate discussion,
which he chaired, Eshun pointed to the use in _Handsworth Songs_ of Mark
Stewart and the Maffia’s dub-refracted cut-up version of ‘Jerusalem’:
the track makes a bid for an account of Englishness from which
‘blackness’, far from being something that can be excluded, becomes
instead the only possible fulfilment of the millenarian promise of
Blake’s revolutionary poem. The use of Stewart’s music also brings home
the extent to which _Handsworth Songs_ belonged to a postpunk moment
which was defined by its unsettling of concepts of ‘white’ and ‘black’
culture. Trevor Mathison’s astonishing sound design certainly draws upon
dub, but its voice loops and seething electronics are equally
reminiscent of the work of Test Department and Cabaret Voltaire. So much
film and television now deploys sound as a crude bludgeon which closes
down the polyvalency of images. Whooshing sound effects subordinate
audiences to the audio equivalent of a spectacle, while the redundant
use of pop music enforces a terroristic sentimentalism. By strong and
refreshing contrast, Mathison’s sound – which is simultaneously
seductive and estranging – liberates lyricism from personalised emotion,
and frees up the potentials of the audio from the strictures of ‘music’.
Subtract the images entirely, and _Handsworth Songs_ can function as a
gripping audio-essay.

Mathison’s sound recording equipment captured one of the most
extraordinary moments in the film, an exchange between the floor manager
and the producer of the long-defunct documentary series _TV Eye_ in the
run-up to a special edition of the programme which was about to be
filmed in front of a Tottenham audience. The exchange reveals that it is
not possible to securely delimit ‘merely technical’ issues from
political questions. The producer’s anxieties about lighting quickly
shade into concerns about the proportion of non-whites in the audience.
The matter-of-fact tone of the discussions make this sudden peek into
the reality studio all the more disturbing – and illuminating.

The screening and the discussion at the Tate were a reminder that
‘mainstream media’ is not a monolith but a terrain. It wasn’t because of
the largesse of broadcasters that the BBC and Channel 4 became host to
popular experimentalism between the 60s and the 90s. No: this was only
possible on the basis of a struggle by forces – which were political at
the same time as they were cultural – that were content neither to
remain in the margins nor to replicate the existing form of mainstream.
_Handsworth Songs_ is a glorious artefact of that struggle – and a call
for us to resume it.



‘TREMORS OF AN IMPERCEPTIBLE FUTURE’: PATRICK KEILLER’S _ROBINSON IN RUINS_


_Sight & Sound, November 2010_

In Ellis Sharp’s short story ‘The Hay Wain’, a Poll Tax rioter in 1990
takes refuge in the National Gallery and ‘notices what he has never
noticed before on biscuit tins or calendars, or plastic trays on the
walls of his aunt’s flat in Bradford, those tiny figures bending in the
field beyond.’ Constable’s supposedly timeless painting of English
landscape ceases to be a kind of pastoral screensaver and becomes what
it always really was: a snapshot of agricultural labour. Far from being
some refuge from political strife, the English landscape is the site of
numerous struggles between the forces of power and privilege and those
who sought to resist them. Sharp replaces the dominant pastoral image of
the English countryside, not with a deflated quotidian realism, but with
a different kind of lyricism, one coloured by revolt: fields and ditches
become hiding places or battlegrounds; landscapes that on the surface
seem tranquil still reverberate with the unavenged spectral rage of
murdered working class martyrs. It is not the sunlit English afternoon
that is ‘timeless’, but the ability of the agents of reaction to escape
justice. When the Poll tax rioter is clubbed by police and his blood
starts to stain Constable’s emblem of English nationhood, we’re
uncomfortably reminded of more recent episodes. _‘He was resisting
arrest, right? Right mates?_ (Right, Sarge.)… _We used minimal force,
right?_ … _Don’t piss yourself and we’ll see this thing through
together, right mates?…Everyone’ll be on our side, remember that. The
commissioner. The Federation. The papers. And, if it comes to it, the
Coroner_. _Now fucking go and call for an ambulance.’_

Patrick Keiller’s latest film, _Robinson in Ruins_, the long-awaited
sequel to his two 1990s films, _London_ (1994) and _Robinson in Space_
(1997), performs a similar politicisation of landscape. Or rather, it
exposes the way in which the rural landscape is always-already intensely
politicised. ‘I had embarked on landscape film-making in 1981, early in
the Thatcher era, after encountering a surrealist tradition in the UK
and elsewhere, so that cinematography involved the pursuit of a
transformation, radical or otherwise, of everyday reality,’ Keiller
wrote in 2008, as he was preparing _Robinson in Ruins_. ‘I had forgotten
that landscape photography is often motivated by utopian or ideological
imperatives, both as a critique of the world, and to demonstrate the
possibility of creating a better one.’ _London_ was a melancholy,
quietly angry study of the city after 13 years of Tory rule. Its unnamed
narrator, voiced by Paul Scofield, told of the obsessive researches
undertaken by Robinson, a rogue – and fictional – theorist, into the
‘problem of London’. London was the capital of the first capitalist
country, but Keiller was interested in the way that the city was now at
the heart of a new, ‘post-Fordist’ capitalism, in which manufacturing
industry had been superseded by the spectral weightlessness of the
so-called service economy. Robinson and his narrator friend bitterly
surveyed this brave new world with the doleful eyes of men formed in a
very different era: a world in which public service broadcasters could
commission films of this nature.

_London_ was as remarkable for the unique way that it combined fiction
with the film-essay form. The film was composed of a series of striking
images captured by Keiller’s static camera, which unblinkingly caught
the city in unguarded epiphanic moments. _Robinson in Space_ retained
the same methodology, but broadened the focus from London to the rest of
England. Rural landscapes featured in _Robinson in Space_, but as
something which Keiller’s camera looked _over_ rather than _at_. In the
first two films, Robinson’s interest was in the cities where capitalism
was first built, and in the non-places where it now silently spreads:
the distribution centres and container ports that are unvisited by
practically anyone except Robinson and his narrator-companion, but which
web Britain into the global market. Keiller saw that, contrary to
certain dominant narratives, the British economy was not ‘declining’.
Rather, this post-industrial economy was thriving, and that was the
basis of its oppressive and profoundly inegalitarian power.

_London_ and _Robinson in Space_ were made in the space between two
political non-events, the general elections of 1992 and 1997. 1992 was
the year when change was supposed to come – the end of Tory rule was
widely expected, not least by the Conservative Party itself, yet John
Major was re-elected. 1997 saw the long–anticipated change finally
arrive, but it turned out to be no kind of change at all. Far from
ending the neoliberal culture that Keiller anatomised, Tony Blair’s
government would consolidate it. _Robinson in Space_, largely assembled
in the dying days of the Major government, was made too early for it to
properly register this. Yet its focus on the banal, Ballardian
infrastructure of British post–Fordist capitalism made it a deeply
prophetic film. The England of _Robinson in Space_ was still the England
presided over by Gordon Brown a decade later.

The traumatic event which reverberates through _Robinson in Ruins_ is
the financial crisis of 2008. It’s still too early to properly assess
the implications of this crisis, but _Robinson in Ruins_ shares with
Chris Petit’s _Content_ – a film with which it has many preoccupations
in common – the tentative sense that a historical sequence which began
in 1979 ended in 2008. The ‘ruins’ which Robinson walks through here are
partly the new ruins of a neoliberal culture that has not yet accepted
its own demise, and which, for the moment, continues with the same old
gestures like a zombie that does not know that it is dead. Citing
Fredric Jameson’s observation in _The Seeds of Time_ that ‘it seems to
be easier for us today to imagine the thoroughgoing deterioration of the
earth and of nature than the breakdown of late capitalism; perhaps that
is due to some weakness in our imaginations’, Robinson nevertheless
dares to hope, if only for a moment, that the so-called credit crunch is
something more than one of the crises by which capitalism periodically
renews itself.

Perhaps strangely, it is the ‘thoroughgoing deterioration of the earth
and nature’ that seem to give Robinson some grounds for hope, and the
most evident difference between _Robinson in Ruins_ and the previous
films is the emergence of a radical Green perspective. In part,
Keiller’s turn towards Green themes reflects changes in mainstream
political culture. At the time of the previous two Robinson films, Green
politics could still appear to be a fringe concern. In the last decade
or so, however, anxieties about global warming in particular have come
into the very centre of culture. Now, every corporation, no matter how
exploitative, is required to present itself as Green. The emergence of
ecological concerns gives Keiller’s treatment of landscape a properly
dialectical poise. In the opposition between capital and ecology, we
confront what are in effect two totalities. Keiller shows that
capitalism – in principle at least – saturates everything (especially in
England, a claustrophobic country that long ago enclosed most of its
common land, there is no landscape outside politics); there is nothing
intrinsically resistant to capital’s drive to commoditisation, certainly
not in the ‘natural world’. Keiller demonstrates this with a long
excursus on how the prices of weight increased in the immediate wake of
the 2008 crisis. Yet from the equally inhuman perspective of a radical
ecology, capital, for all that it may burn out the human environment and
take large swathes of the nonhuman world with it, is still a merely
local episode.

Environmental catastrophe provides what a political unconscious totally
colonised by neoliberalism cannot: an image of life after capitalism.
Still, this life may not be a human life, and there is the feeling that,
like the narrator’s father in Margaret Atwood’s coldly visionary novel
_Surfacing_, Robinson may have headed off into some kind of dark
Deleuzean communion with Nature. As with _Surfacing, Robinson in Ruins_
begins with a disappearance: Robinson’s own. Paul Scofield having died
in 2010, the narration is no longer handled by Robinson’s friend, but by
Vanessa Redgrave, playing the head of a group seeking to reconstruct
Robinson’s thinking from notes and films recovered from the caravan
where he was last known to live. If the Redgrave narration doesn’t quite
work, then that is partly because there is a feeling that Keiller has
slightly tired of the Robinson fiction, or it has ceased to serve much
of a function for him. For what seems like large parts of the film, the
Robinson framing narrative disappears from view, to the extent that it
can be something of a jolt when Robinson is mentioned again. Lacking
Paul Scofield’s sardonic insouciance, Redgrave’s narrative is often
oddly tentative, her emphasis not quite mustering Scofield’s assured
mastery of Keiller’s tone.

In tracking the historical development of capitalism in England, and the
sites of struggle against it, _Robinson in Ruins_ shows a sensitivity to
the way that landscape silently registers (and engenders) politics that
echoes the concerns of Danièle Huillet and Jean-Marie Straub. As in
Straub-Huillet’s films, _Robinson in Ruins_ returns to landscapes where
antagonism and martyrdom once took place: Greenham Common, the woodland
where Professor David Kelly committed suicide.

Keiller’s decision to retain film rather than switch to a digital medium
carries more charge now than it did when he used a cine camera for
_London_ and _Robinson in Space_. In many ways, even in 1997, we had yet
to really enter the digital realm; now, with cyberspace available on
every smartphone handset, we are never outside it. The return to film
made him appreciate the materiality of the medium in a new way.
‘Compared with videotape,’ Keiller has written, ‘film stock is expensive
to purchase and process, and the camera’s magazine holds only 122m of
stock, just over 4 minutes at 25fps. Film hence tends to involve a
greater commitment to an image before starting to turn the camera, and
there is pressure to stop as soon as possible, both to limit expenditure
and to avoid running out of loaded film. Results are visible only after
processing, which, in this case, was usually several days later, by
which time some subjects were no longer available and others had
changed, so as to rule out the possibility of a retake. I began to
wonder why I had never noticed these difficulties before, or whether I
had simply forgotten them. Another problem was that, with computer
editing, it is no longer usual to make a print to edit. Instead, camera
rolls are transferred to video after processing, so that the footage is
never seen at its best until the end of the production process. This
hybridity of photographic and digital media so emphasises the value of
the material, mineral characteristics of film that one begins to
reimagine cinematography as a variety of stone-carving.’

When we hear early on in the film that Robinson has made contact with a
series of ‘non-human intelligences’, we initially suspect that he has
finally succumbed to madness. Yet the ‘non-human intelligences’ turn out
not to be the extra-terrestrials of a florid pulp science
fiction-inspired psychosis, but the intra-terrestrial lifeforms that an
ecological awareness reveals growing with a silent stubbornness that
matches the brute tenacity of capitalism. In one of the many slow
spirals that typify Keiller’s approach in _Robinson in Ruins_, the
lichen that his camera lingers on in an early shot, apparently for
merely picturesque effect, will eventually come to take centre stage in
the film’s narrative. Lichen, Robinson comes to realise, is already the
dominant life-form on large areas of the planet. Inspired by the work of
American biologist Lynn Margulis, Robinson confesses to a growing
feeling of ‘biophilia’, which Keiller seems to share. While his camera
lingers tenderly on wildflowers, the film’s verbal narrative is
suspended, projecting us for a few long moments into this world without
humans. These moments, these unnarrativised surveys of a non-human
landscape, are like Keiller’s version of the famous ‘Straubian shot’,
the cut-aways to depopulated landscapes in Straub and Huillet’s films.
Robinson is drawn to Margulis because she rejects the analogies between
capitalism and the biological that are so often used to naturalise
capitalist economic relations. Instead of the ruthless competition which
social Darwinians find in nature, Margulis discovers organisms engaging
in co-operative strategies. When Keiller turns his camera on these
‘non-human intelligences’, these mute heralds of a future without
humanity, I’m reminded of the black orchids in Troy Kennedy Martin’s
_Edge Of Darkness_, those harbingers of an ecology that is readying to
take revenge on a humanity that thoughtlessly disdained it. Kennedy
Martin’s inspiration was the anti-humanist ecology of James Lovelock,
and Lovelock’s apocalyptic message seems to haunt _Robinson in Ruins_
too. Keiller finds extinction looming everywhere – species dying off at
a far faster rate than scientists had thought possible only a few years
ago. The emphasis on extinction means that the concerns of _Robinson in
Ruins_ rhyme with the preoccupations that have emerged in speculative
realist philosophy, which has focused on the spaces prior to, beyond and
after human life. In some respects, the work of philosophers such as Ray
Brassier and Tim Morton re-stages the old confrontation between human
finitude and the sublime which was the former subject of a certain kind
of landscape art. But where the older sublime concentrated on local
natural phenomenon such as the ocean or volcanic eruptions which could
overwhelm and destroy the individual organism or whole cities,
speculative realism contemplates the extinction, not only of the human
world, but of life and indeed matter itself. The prospect of ecological
catastrophe means that disjunction between the lived time of human
experience and longer durations is now not just a question of
metaphysical contemplation, but a matter of urgent political concern, as
one of Robinson’s touchstones, Fredric Jameson, noted. ‘[A]s organisms
of a particular life span,’ Jameson writes in his essay ‘Actually
Existing Marxism’,

we are poorly placed as biological individuals to witness the more
fundamental dynamics of history, glimpsing this or that incomplete
moment, which we hasten to translate into the alltoo-human terms of
success or failure. But neither stoic wisdom nor the reminder of a
longer-term view are really satisfactory responses to this peculiar
existential and epistemological dilemma, comparable to the
science-fictional one of beings inhabiting a cosmos they do not have
organs to perceive or identify. Perhaps only the acknowledgement of this
radical incommensurability between human existence and the dynamic of
collective history and production is capable of generating new kinds of
political attitudes; new kinds of political perception, as well as of
political patience; and new methods for decoding the age as well, and
reading the imperceptible tremors within it of an inconceivable future.
_(Valences of the Dialectic_, Verso, 2010, pp369-70)

Amongst its requiem for neoliberal England, _Robinson in Ruins_ gives us
some intimations of those imperceptible tremors and inconceivable
futures.

[]

Contemporary culture has eliminated both the concept of the public and
the figure of the intellectual. Former public spaces – both physical and
cultural – are now either derelict or colonized by advertising. A
cretinous anti-intellectualism presides, cheerled by expensively
educated hacks in the pay of multinational corporations who reassure
their bored readers that there is no need to rouse themselves from their
interpassive stupor. The informal censorship internalized and propagated
by the cultural workers of late capitalism generates a banal conformity
that the propaganda chiefs of Stalinism could only ever have dreamt of
imposing. Zer0 Books knows that another kind of discourse – intellectual
without being academic, popular without being populist – is not only
possible: it is already flourishing, in the regions beyond the striplit
malls of so-called mass media and the neurotically bureaucratic halls of
the academy. Zer0 is committed to the idea of publishing as a making
public of the intellectual. It is convinced that in the unthinking,
blandly consensual culture in which we live, critical and engaged
theoretical reflection is more important than ever before.
